Abdullah The Butcher
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Special attraction and upper mid-card; often utilized in grudge matches or as a foreign menace.
Wrestling style: Hardcore brawler with a focus on brutal, weapon-heavy matches.
Signature moves: Fork stab, Sudanese meat cleaver chop, elbow drop.
Brief description: Abdullah the Butcher's appearances in JCP were rare but impactful, often as a chaotic force brought in to escalate rivalries or participate in brutal stipulation matches like steel cages. Known for his unpredictability and extreme style, he was a draw in territories where hardcore wrestling had an appeal. Though not a regular, his legacy left an imprint on the hardcore niche of wrestling history.

Abe Jacobs
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Active in the 1970s as a regular performer.
Position on the card: Mid-card talent; enhancement talent for larger stars.
Wrestling style: Traditional mat-based technician with a straightforward approach.
Signature moves: Kiwi roll, side headlock, atomic drop.
Brief description: A journeyman wrestler originally from New Zealand, Abe Jacobs had a steady presence in the Mid-Atlantic territory. Known for his reliability and classic in-ring style, Jacobs worked as an enhancement talent who helped elevate future stars. Though not a major headliner, he contributed significantly to the day-to-day wrestling cards, reflecting the depth of the JCP roster during his era.

Abe Yourist
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Not verified as part of JCP.
Position on the card: N/A.
Wrestling style: Old-school grappling with limited documentation in major promotions.
Signature moves: N/A.
Brief description: Abe Yourist's career is not associated with Jim Crockett Promotions. His contributions appear in regional and independent promotions during the earlier eras of professional wrestling.

Adrian Street
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early to mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card performer with a flamboyant persona that drew significant attention.
Wrestling style: Technical with elements of psychological warfare, complemented by his charismatic antics.
Signature moves: Cobra clutch, crucifix pin, sleeper hold.
Brief description: Known for his eccentric androgynous persona and mind games, Adrian Street was a trailblazer in character work. His time in JCP included entertaining rivalries and segments that showcased his ability to captivate audiences. Though not a mainstay in JCP, his work remains a vivid part of the territory’s colorful roster during the 1980s.

Al Perez
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Active from 1987 to 1988.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; occasionally positioned as a title contender.
Wrestling style: Technical with a mix of power and grappling techniques.
Signature moves: Spinning toe hold, belly-to-belly suplex, flying crossbody.
Brief description: Al Perez was a polished wrestler known for his smooth technical skills and versatility. During his time in JCP, he was managed by Gary Hart and competed in singles matches, occasionally finding himself in high-profile bouts. While his tenure was relatively short, he was a solid worker who added depth to the roster during a competitive period in the promotion.

Alan Martin
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Active in the mid-1980s as enhancement talent.
Position on the card: Lower card; primarily utilized to elevate other wrestlers.
Wrestling style: Traditional grappler with a focus on basic moves and selling for opponents.
Signature moves: Arm drag, body slam, headlock takedown.
Brief description: Alan Martin was a reliable enhancement talent in JCP, frequently appearing on television to help establish the dominance of rising stars and established names. While he rarely picked up wins, his role was essential to the structure of weekly wrestling programming, showcasing the abilities of JCP’s top competitors.

Alan West
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Active in 1986 to 1987.
Position on the card: Mid-card talent; occasionally teamed with other wrestlers.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with a straightforward, no-frills approach to wrestling.
Signature moves: Powerslam, shoulder block, vertical suplex.
Brief description: Alan West was a short-term performer in JCP who brought a powerful presence to the mid-card. Although not a major player in significant storylines, his physicality and energy made him a reliable addition to tag team matches and undercard bouts, where he showcased his potential as a rising star during his stint.

Alberto Torres
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances during the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event talent, depending on the storyline.
Wrestling style: Technical and traditional, emphasizing clean wrestling moves and storytelling.
Signature moves: Boston crab, dropkick, abdominal stretch.
Brief description: Alberto Torres was part of a family legacy of wrestlers, known for his technical skills and ability to captivate audiences with his in-ring storytelling. In JCP, Torres competed in both singles and tag team matches, where he often played a heroic figure. His time in JCP was impactful, contributing to the promotion’s reputation for athletic and compelling wrestling during the 1960s.

Aldo Bogni
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Active in the late 1950s through the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team specialist.
Wrestling style: Rugged brawler with a focus on rule-breaking tactics.
Signature moves: Backbreaker, chokeholds, piledriver.
Brief description: Aldo Bogni was a heel wrestler known for his alliance with manager Homer O'Dell and frequent partner Bronko Lubich. Together, they formed a notorious tag team that terrorized the JCP territory with their underhanded tactics and physicality. Bogni’s presence added grit to JCP's roster, and his performances helped solidify the heel dynamics of the era.

Alfred Hayes
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances during the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card wrestler, occasionally featured in special attraction matches.
Wrestling style: Technical with a focus on European grappling techniques.
Signature moves: Knee lift, European uppercut, single-leg Boston crab.
Brief description: Alfred Hayes, later known as a prominent manager and commentator, had a wrestling career rooted in technical expertise and British grappling traditions. His appearances in JCP during the 1960s were brief but showcased his polished skill set. While his in-ring contributions to JCP were limited, his later contributions to wrestling as a personality cemented his place in the industry.

Allen Martin
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Active in the mid-1980s as enhancement talent.
Position on the card: Lower card; primarily utilized to elevate other wrestlers.
Wrestling style: Traditional grappler with fundamental moves and selling focus.
Signature moves: Arm drag, headlock takedown, body slam.
Brief description: Allen Martin was a dependable enhancement talent in JCP, frequently seen in televised matches where he played a key role in showcasing the dominance of rising stars and established talent. His contributions were essential to maintaining the structure of JCP's competitive roster.

Amazing Zuma
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1950s and early 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and acrobatic, unusual for the era.
Signature moves: Flying crossbody, sunset flip, dropkick.
Brief description: Amazing Zuma brought a dynamic style to JCP, performing moves that captivated audiences and set him apart during his era. His appearances were not consistent, but his high-flying acrobatics left a lasting impression on fans of Mid-Atlantic wrestling during the early days of televised wrestling.

America's Team (Dusty Rhodes & Magnum T.A.)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1985 to 1986.
Position on the card: Main event and top babyface tag team.
Wrestling style: Power and charisma-driven, blending technical wrestling with crowd-pleasing offense.
Signature moves: Rhodes' Bionic Elbow, Magnum's Belly-to-Belly Suplex, double-team shoulder tackle.
Brief description: America's Team was one of JCP's most popular tag teams during the mid-1980s, consisting of two of its biggest babyfaces. They were frequently involved in feuds with top heel teams, including the Four Horsemen, and represented the "everyman" appeal in opposition to the villains of the promotion. Their run was cut short by Magnum T.A.'s tragic car accident in 1986.

American Starship (Coyote & Eagle)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Brief stint in 1985.
Position on the card: Mid-card tag team.
Wrestling style: Power-based with basic tag team fundamentals.
Signature moves: Double suplex, powerslam, running shoulder tackle.
Brief description: American Starship consisted of Dan Spivey (Eagle) and Scott Hall (Coyote), both in the early stages of their careers. While their tenure in JCP was short-lived and largely unremarkable, both wrestlers went on to achieve significant fame in other promotions, with Hall later becoming Razor Ramon in WWE and a founding member of the nWo in WCW.

American Starship Coyote (Scott Hall)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Brief stint in 1985 as part of American Starship.
Position on the card: Mid-card tag team member.
Wrestling style: Power-based with a focus on strength and agility.
Signature moves: Scoop slam, lariat, backbreaker.
Brief description: Wrestling as American Starship Coyote, Scott Hall was part of a young and relatively inexperienced tag team. His time in JCP provided him with valuable early exposure to the wrestling business before he developed into a major star in WWE and WCW.

American Starship Eagle (Dan Spivey)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Brief stint in 1985 as part of American Starship.
Position on the card: Mid-card tag team member.
Wrestling style: Power-based with high-impact moves.
Signature moves: Big boot, powerslam, gutwrench suplex.
Brief description: Dan Spivey wrestled as American Starship Eagle during his early career in JCP. While his time in the promotion was brief and not heavily impactful, Spivey later found success in promotions like WWE and All Japan Pro Wrestling.

Andersons (Ole Anderson & Gene Anderson)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular from the 1960s to the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Top-tier tag team; pioneers of the "Minnesota Wrecking Crew."
Wrestling style: Methodical, technical, and grounded in classic tag team psychology.
Signature moves: Hammerlock slam, double-team armbar, Anderson Snapmare.
Brief description: The Andersons were one of the most dominant and influential tag teams in JCP history. Known for their precision and brutal working of opponents' arms, they embodied tag team excellence and were often positioned as a top heel act. Their legacy set the foundation for later Anderson-associated teams, including Arn Anderson's Four Horsemen.

Andre the Giant
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances from the 1970s to the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Special attraction, often featured in main events.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with a focus on size and intimidation.
Signature moves: Giant headbutt, big boot, body slam.
Brief description: Andre the Giant was a global phenomenon and appeared in JCP as part of his world tours. His appearances were always a major draw, as he was marketed as an unbeatable giant who transcended wrestling promotions. Andre’s matches in JCP often involved him teaming with top babyfaces to face villainous factions, providing fans with unforgettable spectacles.

Angel of Death (David Sheldon)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card performer and enforcer for heel factions.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with a focus on high-impact moves.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, powerbomb, bearhug.
Brief description: The Angel of Death was a journeyman wrestler who made sporadic appearances in JCP, often working as a heel enforcer in storylines involving larger stables or villains. His intimidating presence and physical style added depth to the roster, though his time in JCP was not heavily featured compared to his roles in other territories.

Angelo Mosca
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event; key heel and occasional babyface.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with a focus on physical dominance.
Signature moves: Sleeper hold, backbreaker, running powerslam.
Brief description: Angelo Mosca, a former Canadian Football League star, transitioned into professional wrestling as a dominant and charismatic competitor. During his time in JCP, he was a key heel who feuded with some of the promotion's top stars. His intense promos and physical style made him a standout performer. Mosca later transitioned to occasional commentary roles, solidifying his presence as an all-around contributor to the promotion.

Angelo Mosca Jr.
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Active from 1984 to 1985.
Position on the card: Mid-card, with attempts to push him as a rising babyface.
Wrestling style: Power and technical hybrid with an emphasis on basic fundamentals.
Signature moves: Dropkick, body slam, vertical suplex.
Brief description: The son of Angelo Mosca Sr., Angelo Mosca Jr. debuted in JCP with significant fanfare but struggled to connect with audiences at the level of his father. Despite his physicality and solid in-ring work, his run in JCP was short-lived, and he never reached the same prominence as his father.

Animal (Road Warrior Animal – Joe Laurinaitis)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1986 to 1988 as part of the Road Warriors.
Position on the card: Main event; one of the top tag teams in the promotion.
Wrestling style: Power-based, high-impact brawler.
Signature moves: Powerslam, shoulder tackle, Doomsday Device (with Hawk).
Brief description: As one-half of the legendary Road Warriors, Animal was a dominant force in JCP’s tag team division. Managed by Paul Ellering, the Road Warriors captivated audiences with their unparalleled strength, face paint, and intimidating presence. They competed against top teams like the Midnight Express, the Four Horsemen, and the Rock 'n' Roll Express, leaving a lasting legacy as one of the most iconic tag teams in wrestling history.

Arn Anderson
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular from 1985 to 1988.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event; a cornerstone of the Four Horsemen.
Wrestling style: Technical, methodical, and psychology-driven.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, DDT, gourdbuster.
Brief description: Arn Anderson was a key figure in JCP, both as a tag team specialist and a singles competitor. Known as "The Enforcer" of the Four Horsemen, he exuded toughness and intelligence in the ring. Alongside Tully Blanchard, he held the NWA World Tag Team Championship and was instrumental in defining the Horsemen’s dominance. His promos, laced with realism and confidence, further solidified his legacy as one of the best technical wrestlers of his time.

Armstrongs
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1980s (primarily Brad Armstrong).
Position on the card: Mid-card; Brad Armstrong also appeared in occasional tag matches.
Wrestling style: Versatile, with a mix of technical, high-flying, and southern-style brawling.
Signature moves: Brad Armstrong: Russian leg sweep, dropkick, side suplex.
Brief description: The Armstrong family, led by patriarch Bob Armstrong, was a respected wrestling dynasty. Brad Armstrong, in particular, showcased his talent in JCP, competing in singles and tag matches. Known for his fluid in-ring ability, Brad often competed against rising stars and provided solid matches that highlighted his technical expertise.

Art Nelson
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based with a rugged approach.
Signature moves: Atomic drop, bearhug, piledriver.
Brief description: Art Nelson was a consistent presence in JCP during the 1960s, often working as a tough opponent for rising stars. Known for his no-nonsense approach and physical style, Nelson added depth to the roster and was a dependable performer for the promotion during its earlier years.

Assassin (Jody Hamilton)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular from the late 1960s through the 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card and main event tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawler with excellent tag team psychology.
Signature moves: Loaded mask headbutt, sleeper hold, body slam.
Brief description: Jody Hamilton, as the original Assassin, was one-half of the legendary masked team, The Assassins. Known for their cunning tactics and devastating teamwork, The Assassins were one of the most dominant heel tag teams in JCP, feuding with fan favorites like George Becker and Johnny Weaver. Jody Hamilton’s menacing promos and in-ring craft helped cement The Assassins’ reputation as one of wrestling’s greatest duos.

Assassin #2 (Tom Renesto)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular from the late 1960s through the 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card and main event tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Strategic brawler with a focus on teamwork.
Signature moves: Double-team knee lift, neckbreaker, masked headbutt.
Brief description: As the second half of The Assassins, Tom Renesto played a vital role in establishing the team as one of the most feared duos in JCP history. His ability to sell and work the crowd complemented Jody Hamilton’s intensity, creating a balance that made The Assassins a top-drawing act in the territory.

The Assassins (Jody Hamilton & Tom Renesto)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Late 1960s through the 1970s.
Position on the card: Main event tag team and dominant heels.
Wrestling style: Tag team specialists focused on psychological warfare and underhanded tactics.
Signature moves: Double-team moves like the masked headbutt and double knee lift, illegal weapon use.
Brief description: The Assassins were a top heel tag team in JCP, known for their deviousness and crowd manipulation. Their feuds with top babyfaces like George Becker, Johnny Weaver, and other fan favorites elevated tag team wrestling in the territory. Their iconic masked look and heel persona remain synonymous with classic tag team wrestling in the Mid-Atlantic region.

Austin Idol
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; occasionally featured in main events.
Wrestling style: Charismatic power and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: Las Vegas leglock (figure-four leglock), piledriver, powerslam.
Brief description: Known as “The Universal Heartthrob,” Austin Idol was a flamboyant and charismatic wrestler who made waves in various territories. His time in JCP was limited but impactful, often appearing in feuds or as a special attraction. Idol’s promo skills and character work made him stand out, even in an era filled with larger-than-life personalities.

Baby Doll (Nickla Roberts)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1984 to 1986.
Position on the card: Manager and valet for top-tier talent.
Wrestling style: Non-wrestler; played an essential managerial role.
Signature moves: Slaps, distraction tactics, occasional physical altercations.
Brief description: Baby Doll was a pivotal figure in JCP, initially managing Tully Blanchard as his "Perfect 10." Her presence elevated Blanchard's heel persona, and her eventual split from him created engaging storylines, including her alliance with Dusty Rhodes. Baby Doll's charisma, on-screen chemistry with top talent, and ability to incite crowd reactions made her one of the most memorable managers of the era.

Bam Bam Bigelow
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in 1987.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; special attraction.
Wrestling style: Agile powerhouse with high-flying capabilities unusual for his size.
Signature moves: Diving headbutt, enzuigiri, press slam.
Brief description: Bam Bam Bigelow, known for his imposing size and agility, made limited appearances in JCP during his early career. Though not a long-term competitor in the promotion, his talent and unique look, including his famous head tattoos, helped him stand out. He later became a major star in promotions like WWE, WCW, and ECW.

Barbarian (Sione Vailahi)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1986 to 1988.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event; frequently part of tag teams and factions.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with a focus on striking and brute strength.
Signature moves: Big boot, diving headbutt, bearhug.
Brief description: The Barbarian was a fierce competitor in JCP, often aligned with other heels such as The Warlord in The Powers of Pain or Paul Jones’ Army. His imposing physical presence and hard-hitting style made him a credible threat in both singles and tag team competition. The Barbarian’s feuds with teams like the Road Warriors showcased his versatility and ability to compete at the top level.

Baron von Raschke (James Raschke)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card; a menacing heel character.
Wrestling style: Power-based with a focus on intimidation and submission wrestling.
Signature moves: The Claw, backbreaker, bearhug.
Brief description: Baron von Raschke was a menacing heel known for his intimidating presence and signature "Claw" hold. His sporadic appearances in JCP typically involved feuds against popular babyfaces and participation in tag matches. While his time in JCP was limited compared to his work in other territories, his imposing character added a strong heel presence to the promotion.

Barry Hart (Barry Horowitz)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Technical with a focus on fundamental grappling.
Signature moves: Back suplex, roll-up pin, abdominal stretch.
Brief description: Barry Hart, who would later gain more fame as Barry Horowitz, worked as enhancement talent in JCP. Though his role was primarily to elevate other wrestlers, his technical proficiency and ability to sell made him a respected figure among his peers.

Barry Windham
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular from 1986 to 1988.
Position on the card: Main event; one of the top babyfaces and later a key member of the Four Horsemen.
Wrestling style: All-arounder with technical skills, speed, and power.
Signature moves: Superplex, lariat, bulldog.
Brief description: Barry Windham was a standout performer in JCP, excelling as both a heroic babyface and a cunning heel. His feuds with top stars like Ric Flair and Lex Luger showcased his versatility, while his eventual turn as a member of the Four Horsemen solidified his legacy as one of the best wrestlers of the 1980s. Windham’s combination of athleticism and in-ring psychology made him a cornerstone of JCP during its peak years.

Bearcat Brown
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; occasional feature in tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Brawler with a focus on strength and high energy.
Signature moves: Body slam, forearm smash, headbutt.
Brief description: Bearcat Brown was a trailblazing African-American wrestler known for his charisma and ability to connect with fans. His time in JCP included sporadic appearances where his fiery personality and hard-hitting style helped him stand out on the card. While his appearances in JCP were limited, he left a strong impression on fans during his runs in the territory.

Becker Brothers (George Becker & Johnny Weaver)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular from the 1950s through the early 1970s.
Position on the card: Main event tag team; top babyfaces in the territory.
Wrestling style: Technical and psychology-driven with a focus on storytelling.
Signature moves: Double dropkick, abdominal stretch, sleeper hold.
Brief description: The Becker Brothers, led by George Becker and later teaming with Johnny Weaver, were one of the most beloved tag teams in JCP history. Known for their clean wrestling style and ability to rally fans, they headlined numerous cards and feuded with top heel teams like The Assassins. Their legacy as pioneers in tag team wrestling is a cornerstone of JCP's early success.

Ben Alexander
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Active in the 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Traditional with a focus on fundamental techniques.
Signature moves: Arm drag, headlock, side suplex.
Brief description: Ben Alexander was a reliable enhancement talent in JCP, often appearing on television to elevate other wrestlers. While he was rarely victorious, his ability to sell and make opponents look strong was a key asset in the promotion’s weekly programming.

Benny Becker
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Active during the 1950s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; often featured in tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Traditional with a focus on teamwork and fundamentals.
Signature moves: Arm drag, hip toss, dropkick.
Brief description: Benny Becker was a consistent presence in JCP’s early years, often teaming with George Becker as part of the Becker Brothers tag team. While George was the star of the team, Benny contributed to their success with his technical ability and reliable performances in the ring.

Bette Boucher
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and special attraction in the women's division.
Wrestling style: Technical with a focus on grappling and holds.
Signature moves: Headlock, flying mare, Boston crab.
Brief description: Bette Boucher was a trailblazer in women’s wrestling, competing in various territories, including JCP. Known for her technical skills and professionalism, Boucher helped elevate the women’s division during her era. Her appearances in JCP were limited but impactful, showcasing her as a talented competitor in an often-overlooked segment of wrestling at the time.

Big Bubba Rogers (Ray Traylor)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1986 to 1987.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; enforcer for Jim Cornette and the Midnight Express.
Wrestling style: Power-based with a focus on brawling and brute strength.
Signature moves: Bossman Slam (spinning side slam), big boot, powerslam.
Brief description: Big Bubba Rogers made an immediate impact in JCP as the bodyguard for Jim Cornette and his Midnight Express. His size and physicality allowed him to stand out, and he frequently clashed with top babyfaces such as Dusty Rhodes and the Road Warriors. Rogers' presence added legitimacy to Cornette’s faction and showcased his potential, which he later fulfilled as a major star in other promotions like WWF.

Big John Studd (John Minton)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Main event; towering heel attraction.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse, emphasizing strength and dominance.
Signature moves: Bearhug, backbreaker, over-the-top rope slam.
Brief description: Big John Studd was a massive presence in JCP, frequently booked as an imposing villain who tested the resilience of the promotion's top babyfaces. His feuds with Andre the Giant and other top stars across different promotions elevated his reputation. In JCP, his intimidating size and heel persona made him a strong draw, even in a territory brimming with talent.

Bill Ash
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Lower mid-card and enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Traditional with a focus on technical grappling and rule-breaking.
Signature moves: Backbreaker, armbar, elbow drop.
Brief description: Known as a journeyman wrestler, Bill Ash made occasional appearances in JCP, primarily as enhancement talent. His ability to work with a variety of opponents and put over rising stars made him a valuable utility performer in the territories during his time.

Bill Bowman
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Active in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Basic grappler with a focus on selling and putting over opponents.
Signature moves: Arm drag, headlock takedown, body slam.
Brief description: Bill Bowman was a reliable enhancement talent who frequently appeared on television to help elevate other wrestlers. While he did not achieve major success in terms of wins or storylines, his role was essential in showcasing the dominance of JCP's main roster stars.

Bill Crouch
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Active in the late 1970s to early 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Traditional, with an emphasis on basics and clean execution.
Signature moves: Dropkick, armbar, hip toss.
Brief description: Bill Crouch was a consistent presence on JCP television, often appearing in matches against established stars to help build their credibility. His professionalism and willingness to make his opponents look strong were hallmarks of his contributions to the promotion.

Bill Dromo
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Active in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Traditional grappler with a focus on clean wrestling and storytelling.
Signature moves: Dropkick, arm drag, abdominal stretch.
Brief description: Bill Dromo was a beloved babyface in JCP during his tenure, known for his straightforward wrestling style and ability to connect with audiences. His matches were often used to provide solid, technical wrestling and showcase up-and-coming stars in the Mid-Atlantic region.

Bill Dundee
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; occasional involvement in tag teams.
Wrestling style: High-energy with a mix of technical grappling and striking.
Signature moves: Flying knee drop, atomic drop, sleeper hold.
Brief description: Best known for his work in Memphis, Bill Dundee had a brief stint in JCP where his charisma and experience made him a reliable addition to the roster. Though not heavily featured, Dundee's performances were consistent with his reputation as a veteran capable of elevating any match or storyline.

Bill Irwin
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; primarily a singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with a focus on striking.
Signature moves: Big boot, running clothesline, gutwrench suplex.
Brief description: Bill Irwin, also known later as "The Goon" in WWE, made limited appearances in JCP, showcasing his physicality and rugged in-ring style. While his time in JCP was brief, his tough demeanor and solid in-ring work made him a credible opponent for rising stars.

Bill Miller (Dr. Bill Miller)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; occasional main event competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and powerhouse hybrid, with a focus on submission holds.
Signature moves: Full nelson, bearhug, knee drop.
Brief description: Bill Miller, known as "Dr. Bill Miller" due to his background in veterinary medicine, brought a combination of technical skill and power to his appearances in JCP. A former NCAA wrestling champion, Miller’s legitimate athletic background added credibility to his persona, making him a respected competitor during his time in the territory.

Bill Mulkey
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Active in the 1980s as part of the Mulkey Brothers.
Position on the card: Enhancement talent in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: Basic and fundamental, with a focus on selling for opponents.
Signature moves: Arm drag, headlock takedown, double-team hip toss (with Randy Mulkey).
Brief description: Bill Mulkey, alongside his brother Randy, formed the Mulkey Brothers, a team known for their comedic losses and underdog status. Despite being enhancement talent, they gained a cult following due to their consistent appearances and the term "Mulkey Mania," which humorously celebrated their underdog spirit.

Bill Tabb
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Mid to late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Power-based with basic grappling techniques.
Signature moves: Powerslam, shoulder block, body slam.
Brief description: Bill Tabb was a regular enhancement talent in JCP, frequently used in televised matches to showcase rising stars and established talent. His size and strength made him a credible opponent, even though he rarely achieved victories.

Bill Watts
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances as a wrestler in the late 1960s; later had indirect influence as a promoter.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as a wrestler.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with an emphasis on toughness and storytelling.
Signature moves: Oklahoma Stampede (running powerslam), bearhug, body slam.
Brief description: Bill Watts had a brief wrestling career in JCP, known for his tough, no-nonsense style. While he later became a significant figure in the industry as a promoter for Mid-South Wrestling and WCW, his time in JCP as a competitor was focused on establishing himself as a rugged and credible powerhouse. His ability to connect with fans made him a respected name in professional wrestling.

Bill White
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Active in the 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Lower mid-card and enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Traditional grappler with a focus on basic technical moves and ring psychology.
Signature moves: Hip toss, armbar, body slam.
Brief description: Bill White was a journeyman wrestler who appeared regularly in JCP, often competing against top stars to help establish their credibility. His experience and professionalism made him a trusted performer who could work with a variety of opponents and ensure solid in-ring action.

Billy Boy Hines
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Technical with an emphasis on mat wrestling.
Signature moves: Arm drag, dropkick, sleeper hold.
Brief description: Billy Boy Hines was a versatile competitor who contributed to the depth of JCP’s roster during the 1970s. Though not a main event player, he was known for his solid technical skills and ability to make his opponents look good in the ring.


Billy Graham (Superstar Billy Graham)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Main event; top attraction and charismatic heel.
Wrestling style: Power-based with an emphasis on showmanship.
Signature moves: Bearhug, full nelson, double ax handle.
Brief description: "Superstar" Billy Graham was a flamboyant and innovative performer who revolutionized wrestling with his physique and promo style. His time in JCP was limited compared to his runs in other territories, but he was often brought in as a special attraction for marquee matches. Graham's magnetic personality and larger-than-life presence made him one of the most influential figures in professional wrestling history.

Billy Jack Haynes
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in 1984.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card; emerging babyface.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical influences.
Signature moves: Full nelson, belly-to-belly suplex, press slam.
Brief description: Billy Jack Haynes was known for his impressive physique and strength. During his brief stint in JCP, he was presented as a strong babyface, competing in singles matches that showcased his power and charisma. While his time in JCP was short-lived, Haynes went on to have notable runs in other promotions, including the WWF.

Billy Red Lyons
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; occasional tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with a focus on clean wrestling and athleticism.
Signature moves: Dropkick, flying head scissors, abdominal stretch.
Brief description: Billy Red Lyons was a respected Canadian wrestler known for his polished in-ring style and sportsmanship. His appearances in JCP were occasional but memorable, as he brought a touch of international flair to the promotion. Lyons' influence extended beyond his wrestling career, as he later became a successful announcer and commentator.

Billy Robinson
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Main event; technical wrestling master.
Wrestling style: Catch wrestling and submission-focused technical expertise.
Signature moves: Butterfly suplex, sleeper hold, double-arm suplex.
Brief description: Billy Robinson, a world-renowned technical wrestler from England, made sporadic appearances in JCP as a special attraction. His matches were often treated as clinics in technical wrestling, showcasing his unparalleled grappling ability. Though not a regular competitor in JCP, his time in the promotion reinforced its reputation for featuring world-class talent.

Billy Travis
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Lower mid-card; tag team and singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Traditional with a mix of technical and high-energy moves.
Signature moves: Dropkick, hip toss, flying body press.
Brief description: Billy Travis was a young and promising talent who occasionally appeared in JCP, often in tag team matches. Though not heavily featured in the promotion, he was recognized for his work ethic and ability to perform consistently. Travis gained more prominence in other territories, such as Memphis Wrestling.

Billy Two Rivers
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; special attraction wrestler.
Wrestling style: Traditional with a focus on storytelling and crowd interaction.
Signature moves: Tomahawk chop, body slam, headlock.
Brief description: Billy Two Rivers was a Native American wrestler known for his unique persona and ability to engage with audiences. His appearances in JCP showcased his charisma and in-ring storytelling, making him a memorable figure in the promotion's early history.

Black Bart (Rick Harris)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular from 1984 to 1986.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; singles competitor and tag team member.
Wrestling style: Brawler with a focus on power moves and rugged tactics.
Signature moves: Texas trash compactor (leg drop from the second rope), piledriver, lariat.
Brief description: Black Bart was a tough and gritty heel wrestler who thrived in JCP during the mid-1980s. He held the NWA National Heavyweight Championship and was part of various storylines, including feuds with top babyfaces like Ron Garvin. Bart’s rough-and-tumble style made him a credible threat in both singles and tag team action.

Blackjack Mulligan (Robert Windham)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular from the late 1970s through the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Main event; top-tier heel and later a babyface.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with a commanding presence.
Signature moves: Clawhold, big boot, lariat.
Brief description: Blackjack Mulligan was a dominant force in JCP, known for his imposing size, cowboy persona, and powerful in-ring style. Initially a top heel, Mulligan later transitioned to a babyface role, engaging in memorable feuds with competitors like Ric Flair and Wahoo McDaniel. His charismatic promos and larger-than-life persona made him one of the most recognized stars in the territory. Mulligan also teamed with his son, Barry Windham, solidifying his family's legacy in professional wrestling.

Bob Armstrong
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card; occasional main event.
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based hybrid with a focus on storytelling.
Signature moves: Sleeper hold, abdominal stretch, crossbody block.
Brief description: Known as "Bullet" Bob Armstrong, he brought a southern wrestling style to JCP that connected with fans. While his appearances in JCP were not as extensive as in Southeastern territories, his reputation as a tough and charismatic competitor made him a valuable addition to any card. Armstrong was also the patriarch of the Armstrong wrestling family, contributing significantly to the industry’s legacy.

Bob Bruggers
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular in the early to mid-1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team specialist.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical fundamentals.
Signature moves: Body slam, backbreaker, suplex.
Brief description: A former football player turned wrestler, Bob Bruggers was a reliable mid-card performer in JCP. His athletic background and in-ring ability made him a strong competitor in singles and tag team matches. Unfortunately, his wrestling career was cut short by injuries sustained in the 1975 plane crash that also involved Ric Flair.

Bob Cook
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Active in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Traditional grappler with an emphasis on fundamentals and selling.
Signature moves: Arm drag, headlock takedown, dropkick.
Brief description: Bob Cook was a skilled enhancement talent in JCP, known for his crisp execution of moves and ability to make opponents look strong. He was a regular fixture on JCP programming, helping to establish rising stars through competitive matches.

Bob Ellis (Cowboy Bob Ellis)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; occasional main event attraction.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with a focus on crowd engagement.
Signature moves: Bulldog, lariat, atomic drop.
Brief description: Cowboy Bob Ellis was a charismatic competitor known for his rugged cowboy persona and straightforward brawling style. While primarily associated with other territories, he made occasional appearances in JCP, where his larger-than-life personality and crowd-pleasing matches solidified his reputation as a major wrestling attraction during his era.

Bob Emory
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Active in the 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Fundamental with a focus on selling and putting over opponents.
Signature moves: Arm drag, headlock, back elbow.
Brief description: Bob Emory was a consistent presence on JCP television, regularly competing in matches to showcase the promotion’s top stars. Though rarely victorious, his reliability and professionalism made him a valued member of the JCP roster during his tenure.

Bob Orton Sr.
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; veteran competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and rugged grappler with a focus on brawling.
Signature moves: Piledriver, body slam, sleeper hold.
Brief description: Bob Orton Sr., the patriarch of the Orton wrestling family, brought his tough, no-nonsense style to JCP during sporadic appearances in the 1960s. Known for his grit and experience, he often served as a credible opponent for younger stars, showcasing his ability to elevate talent while remaining a respected figure in the ring.

Bob Orton Jr.
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card; versatile singles and tag team wrestler.
Wrestling style: Technical with a mix of power and agility.
Signature moves: Superplex, backbreaker, forearm smash.
Brief description: Bob Orton Jr., nicknamed “Cowboy,” brought a blend of technical skill and showmanship to JCP. Known for his versatile in-ring ability and his infamous arm cast (used as a weapon in later years), Orton Jr. had a strong reputation as both a singles competitor and a tag team partner. While his time in JCP was limited compared to other promotions, his performances were consistent with his legacy as a second-generation star.

Bob Roop
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; technical and submission specialist.
Wrestling style: Amateur wrestling-based with a focus on submission holds and mat control.
Signature moves: Shoulder breaker, spinning toe hold, fireman’s carry slam.
Brief description: Bob Roop, a former amateur wrestling standout and Olympian, brought his legitimate grappling skills to JCP during his sporadic appearances. Known for his technical prowess and ability to control matches on the mat, Roop was often portrayed as a credible opponent for both rising stars and established names. His background and in-ring psychology made him a respected competitor across multiple territories.

Bobby Duncum (Sr.)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; rugged heel competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with a focus on striking and high-impact moves.
Signature moves: Bulldog, lariat, piledriver.
Brief description: Bobby Duncum Sr. was a tough, no-nonsense wrestler known for his cowboy persona and hard-hitting style. During his time in JCP, he was often positioned as a credible heel opponent for the promotion’s top babyfaces. His matches were noted for their physicality and ability to generate heat from the crowd.

Bobby Eaton
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular from 1985 to 1988 as part of the Midnight Express.
Position on the card: Main event in the tag team division; occasional singles competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, with an emphasis on precision and teamwork.
Signature moves: Alabama Jam (top-rope leg drop), swinging neckbreaker, double-team Rocket Launcher (with Dennis Condrey or Stan Lane).
Brief description: Bobby Eaton was one of the greatest tag team wrestlers in history, achieving legendary status as part of the Midnight Express, managed by Jim Cornette. Whether teaming with Dennis Condrey or Stan Lane, Eaton's technical mastery and high-flying ability made him a standout performer. The Midnight Express’s feuds with the Rock 'n' Roll Express and the Road Warriors remain some of the most memorable in JCP history.

Bobby Fulton
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1980s as part of The Fantastics.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-energy, high-flying, and technically sound.
Signature moves: Sunset flip, dropkick, double-team monkey flip (with Tommy Rogers).
Brief description: Bobby Fulton, as one-half of The Fantastics alongside Tommy Rogers, brought an exciting and fast-paced style to JCP’s tag team division. Their feud with The Midnight Express was particularly notable, delivering high-quality matches that showcased the best of tag team wrestling during the era. Fulton's charisma and in-ring work helped establish The Fantastics as one of wrestling's most beloved teams.

Bobby Jaggers
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; occasional tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawler with a focus on rugged, southern-style wrestling.
Signature moves: Elbow drop, bulldog, clothesline.
Brief description: Known as "The Hangman," Bobby Jaggers brought his rough-and-tumble style to JCP, often competing in tag team matches or as a supporting heel. While his tenure in JCP was brief compared to other territories, his grit and persona added depth to the roster during his appearances.

Bobby Red Cloud
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; special attraction wrestler.
Wrestling style: Brawler with traditional elements of storytelling.
Signature moves: Tomahawk chop, sleeper hold, body slam.
Brief description: A Native American wrestler known for his crowd connection, Bobby Red Cloud brought an energetic and fiery style to his matches. His appearances in JCP showcased his persona and solidified his role as a mid-card attraction who resonated with fans.

Bobby Shane
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card; versatile heel competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with a flair for character work and storytelling.
Signature moves: Figure-four leglock, backbreaker, knee drop.
Brief description: Bobby Shane was a charismatic heel who excelled in both singles and tag team competition. Known for his sharp in-ring ability and promo skills, Shane's appearances in JCP added a dynamic layer to the promotion's roster. Although his career was tragically cut short in 1975, Shane’s influence as a performer and innovator remains significant in wrestling history.

Bobo Brazil
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Main event; special attraction.
Wrestling style: Power-based with an emphasis on crowd engagement and storytelling.
Signature moves: Coco Butt (headbutt), bearhug, body slam.
Brief description: Bobo Brazil was one of the most influential African-American wrestlers in history and a true trailblazer in the sport. During his appearances in JCP, he was often featured as a top babyface in marquee matches against prominent heels. Brazil's charisma and iconic Coco Butt made him a fan favorite, and his contributions to breaking racial barriers in wrestling are legendary.

Bolo Mongol (Nicola Tedeschi)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event; a heel competitor often paired in tag teams.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with a focus on strikes and intimidation.
Signature moves: Bearhug, headbutt, hammerlock.
Brief description: Bolo Mongol was a prominent heel in JCP during the 1960s, often teaming with fellow Mongol characters like Geto Mongol. His menacing persona and physical style made him a key figure in feuds with top babyfaces of the era. Bolo Mongol’s role helped solidify JCP’s roster with colorful and compelling villains.

Boris Malenko
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event; charismatic heel.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based with a focus on psychological tactics.
Signature moves: Russian sickle, cobra clutch, armbar.
Brief description: Boris Malenko, known as "The Great Malenko," was a master of technical wrestling and a captivating heel. His appearances in JCP showcased his ability to manipulate crowds and elevate rivalries through his in-ring psychology and promo skills. He is also remembered as the father of wrestling legends Dean and Joe Malenko.

Brad Armstrong
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular from 1985 to 1988.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card; versatile singles and tag team wrestler.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying, with a focus on clean execution.
Signature moves: Russian leg sweep, dropkick, side suplex.
Brief description: Brad Armstrong, part of the Armstrong wrestling family, was one of the most talented technical wrestlers of his time. In JCP, he excelled in both singles and tag team competition, often competing against top stars. Despite his exceptional in-ring skills, Armstrong’s career was hampered by a lack of consistent character development. He remains highly respected for his contributions and performances in the promotion.

Brady Boone
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Lower mid-card; enhancement talent and occasional singles competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and athletic.
Signature moves: Moonsault, dropkick, crossbody.
Brief description: Brady Boone was a skilled and athletic performer who brought a dynamic, high-flying style to his matches. While primarily used as enhancement talent in JCP, his exciting moves and energy stood out during his appearances. Boone later found more recognition in other promotions like the WWF.

Brett Sawyer
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; primarily a tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-energy and technical.
Signature moves: Dropkick, flying body press, sunset flip.
Brief description: Brett Sawyer, the younger brother of "Mad Dog" Buzz Sawyer, made occasional appearances in JCP, where he competed in tag team matches and showcased his athleticism. While not as prominent as his brother, Brett was a reliable performer who contributed to the depth of JCP’s roster during his tenure.

Brian Adias (Brian Adidas)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; primarily a singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Traditional with a focus on clean technical moves.
Signature moves: Sleeper hold, dropkick, belly-to-back suplex.
Brief description: Brian Adias, a close friend of the Von Erich family, primarily competed in Texas-based promotions but occasionally wrestled in JCP. His appearances showcased his technical ability and babyface charisma, though he was not a long-term or heavily featured part of the promotion.

Brickhouse Brown
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; emerging talent.
Wrestling style: High-energy and flamboyant with a mix of power and agility.
Signature moves: Missile dropkick, elbow drop, scoop slam.
Brief description: Brickhouse Brown was a charismatic performer who brought energy and athleticism to his matches. While not a major star in JCP, his appearances highlighted his potential as an exciting babyface or cocky heel. Brown went on to achieve greater recognition in other southern promotions during the late 1980s.

Brisco Brothers (Jack and Gerald Brisco)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event; tag team specialists and technical masters.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based, with a focus on mat wrestling and in-ring psychology.
Signature moves: Figure-four leglock (Jack), Oklahoma roll, double suplex.
Brief description: Jack and Gerald Brisco were a legendary brother duo known for their technical prowess. Their appearances in JCP, though limited, highlighted their ability to put on clinics in the ring. Jack, a former NWA World Heavyweight Champion, and Gerald, his younger brother, were recognized as a dominant force in tag team wrestling. Their contributions to the sport transcended any single promotion, cementing their legacy in wrestling history.

Bronko Lubich
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; primarily as a tag team specialist.
Wrestling style: Rugged brawler with a focus on heel tactics and teamwork.
Signature moves: Backbreaker, headlock, chokehold.
Brief description: Bronko Lubich, often teaming with Aldo Bogni and managed by Homer O'Dell, was a prominent heel in JCP during the 1960s. Known for his devious in-ring style, Lubich was part of one of the most despised tag teams of the era, often feuding with babyface teams like the Becker Brothers. Lubich’s ability to generate heat helped him stand out in the Mid-Atlantic territory.

Bruce Swayze
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; often used as a solid heel competitor.
Wrestling style: Rugged brawler with heel tendencies and crowd taunting.
Signature moves: Elbow smash, knee drop, headlock.
Brief description: Bruce Swayze was a dependable mid-card heel during his appearances in JCP, bringing a brash attitude and rough in-ring style to his matches. While not a main event-level competitor, he played an important role in building heat for babyfaces in the promotion.

Bruiser Brody (Frank Goodish)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Main event; special attraction.
Wrestling style: Wild brawler with a focus on chaos and intensity.
Signature moves: Jumping knee drop, piledriver, big boot.
Brief description: Bruiser Brody was a legendary figure in professional wrestling, known for his wild, uncontrollable style and larger-than-life persona. His appearances in JCP were limited but impactful, often booked as a destructive force in grudge matches or as an intimidating heel. Brody’s reputation for unpredictability and his standout performances made him a must-see attraction wherever he wrestled.

Brute Bernard
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card; often teamed with Skull Murphy or other heels.
Wrestling style: Brawler with a focus on rough tactics and crowd intimidation.
Signature moves: Headbutt, stomps, bearhug.
Brief description: Brute Bernard was a rugged and ferocious heel who thrived in JCP as a tag team specialist and singles competitor. His menacing appearance and aggressive in-ring style made him a strong antagonist, particularly when paired with Skull Murphy. Bernard’s ability to generate heat was instrumental in creating compelling matches and feuds during his time in the promotion.

Bryan St. John
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; enhancement talent and occasional tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Traditional grappler with an emphasis on fundamentals.
Signature moves: Arm drag, hip toss, sleeper hold.
Brief description: Bryan St. John was a reliable enhancement talent during his time in JCP, often used to help establish rising stars. Though not a major figure in the promotion, his professionalism and consistency in the ring were valued assets to the roster.

Buck Robley
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; primarily as a heel competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawler with a focus on roughhouse tactics and psychological storytelling.
Signature moves: Sleeper hold, backbreaker, elbow drop.
Brief description: Buck Robley was a well-traveled veteran known for his unorthodox in-ring style and creative booking mind in various territories. His time in JCP was brief but memorable, as he brought his rugged persona and charisma to feuds that helped elevate mid-card storylines. Robley’s career spanned many promotions, and he remained respected for his versatility and contributions to wrestling.

Buddy Fuller (Edward Welch)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; occasional tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with a focus on mat wrestling and psychology.
Signature moves: Arm drag, figure-four leglock, dropkick.
Brief description: Buddy Fuller, a member of the legendary Welch wrestling family, made sporadic appearances in JCP. Known for his technical acumen and ability to tell a story in the ring, Fuller brought credibility and experience to his matches. His influence extended beyond his in-ring career as a promoter and mentor in the wrestling business.

Buddy Landel
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular from 1984 to 1985.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; often portrayed as a cocky heel.
Wrestling style: Technical and flamboyant, with an emphasis on crowd interaction.
Signature moves: Figure-four leglock, suplex, elbow drop.
Brief description: Known as "Nature Boy" Buddy Landel, he played a cocky and arrogant heel during his time in JCP, often mimicking Ric Flair's persona. Landel's charisma and in-ring ability made him a standout, and he feuded with several of the promotion’s top babyfaces. Despite his potential, personal issues cut his JCP run short, but his performances during this period demonstrated his star quality.

Buddy Roberts
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; member of The Fabulous Freebirds.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling hybrid with strong tag team psychology.
Signature moves: Swinging neckbreaker, back elbow, second-rope fist drop.
Brief description: Buddy Roberts, a key member of The Fabulous Freebirds, brought charisma and a scrappy in-ring style to his appearances in JCP. As part of the iconic Freebirds trio, Roberts was often the workhorse of the team, excelling in storytelling and selling. Though his JCP appearances were limited compared to other territories, Roberts' contributions to tag team wrestling are legendary.

Buddy Rose (Paul Perschmann)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; flamboyant heel competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with an emphasis on showmanship and crowd manipulation.
Signature moves: Inside cradle, piledriver, figure-four leglock.
Brief description: Known as "Playboy" Buddy Rose, he was a charismatic heel with exceptional technical skills. During his brief time in JCP, he showcased his ability to work the crowd and deliver high-quality matches. Rose was more prominently featured in other promotions, particularly on the West Coast, but his talent shone in any territory he entered.

Bugsy McGraw
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; eccentric and unpredictable babyface.
Wrestling style: Brawler with a wild, unorthodox approach.
Signature moves: Elbow drop, headbutt, running splash.
Brief description: Bugsy McGraw was a colorful and unpredictable character who brought energy and entertainment to his matches. His appearances in JCP showcased his wild charisma and ability to engage with the audience. While not a top star in JCP, McGraw's antics and unique persona made him a memorable figure in the territory.

Bull Ramos
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; a tough, brawling heel.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with an emphasis on brute strength.
Signature moves: Bearhug, big boot, lariat.
Brief description: Known for his intimidating size and rugged persona, Bull Ramos brought a menacing heel presence to JCP during his appearances. Often booked as a foil for popular babyfaces, Ramos was a reliable antagonist who helped elevate the drama of JCP storylines with his physicality and villainous tactics.

Butch Miller
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-1980s as part of The Sheepherders.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; tag team specialist.
Wrestling style: Brawling and hardcore, with a chaotic, wild approach.
Signature moves: Double-team battering ram (with Luke Williams), headbutt, forearm smash.
Brief description: Butch Miller, as one-half of The Sheepherders (later known as The Bushwhackers), was a dominant and violent force in the JCP tag team division. Known for their brutal matches and chaotic in-ring style, The Sheepherders feuded with teams like The Rock 'n' Roll Express and The Fantastics, leaving a lasting impression with their hard-hitting performances.

Buzz Sawyer
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event; wild and unpredictable heel.
Wrestling style: Technical with elements of high-energy brawling.
Signature moves: Powerslam, flying splash, suplex.
Brief description: "Mad Dog" Buzz Sawyer was a dynamic and intense wrestler whose chaotic energy and in-ring skills made him a standout performer. His brief time in JCP showcased his ability to deliver wild and hard-hitting matches, often against rising stars or established names. Sawyer’s reputation as an unpredictable competitor extended across multiple territories.

Buzz Tyler
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular from 1984 to 1985.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card; babyface competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with a straightforward, brawling approach.
Signature moves: Powerslam, bearhug, running clothesline.
Brief description: "Avalanche" Buzz Tyler was a powerhouse wrestler who gained a following in JCP as a reliable babyface. While not a major main event star, Tyler’s size and strength allowed him to compete against some of the promotion's top heels. His physical style and crowd-friendly persona made him a valuable addition to the roster during his tenure.

Burrhead Jones
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; comedic babyface attraction.
Wrestling style: Brawling with an emphasis on entertaining antics.
Signature moves: Headbutt, arm drag, body slam.
Brief description: Burrhead Jones was a unique performer known for his entertaining persona and crowd-pleasing style. Though often positioned in the mid-card, his comedic approach to wrestling and ability to engage with audiences made him a memorable part of JCP’s colorful roster during his appearances.

Carl Fergie
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1980s.
Position on the card: Lower mid-card; enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Traditional grappler with fundamental techniques.
Signature moves: Arm drag, suplex, body slam.
Brief description: Carl Fergie was a journeyman wrestler who made occasional appearances in JCP, often competing in televised matches to help establish other talent. While not a major figure in the promotion, his professionalism and in-ring ability made him a reliable enhancement talent.

Carlos Colon
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Special attraction; upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Brawler with technical and submission-based elements.
Signature moves: Figure-four leglock, crossbody block, sleeper hold.
Brief description: Carlos Colon, best known as a legend in Puerto Rican wrestling, occasionally appeared in JCP as a special attraction. His fiery in-ring style and ability to connect with audiences made him a compelling competitor in his JCP matches. Colon’s legacy extends far beyond JCP, as the founder of World Wrestling Council (WWC) in Puerto Rico and a pivotal figure in wrestling history.

Casey Berger
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Active in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Basic grappler with a focus on fundamentals and selling.
Signature moves: Arm drag, headlock, body slam.
Brief description: Casey Berger was a reliable enhancement talent in JCP, often seen on televised matches where he helped establish the dominance of rising stars and main event wrestlers. While not a featured performer, his consistency and professionalism were valued assets to the promotion’s roster.

Charlie Brown (Jimmy Valiant under a mask)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1983 to 1984.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event; comedic babyface character.
Wrestling style: Brawling with comedic and crowd-engaging elements.
Signature moves: Elbow drop, sleeper hold, body slam.
Brief description: Charlie Brown was a masked alter ego of Jimmy Valiant, introduced after Valiant lost a "loser leaves town" match. As Charlie Brown, Valiant continued to entertain fans with his high-energy antics and feuds with prominent heels, including members of Paul Jones’ Army. The character was a fan favorite and a creative way to keep Valiant active in JCP storylines during his masked tenure.

Charlie Cook
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; occasional singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with a mix of brawling and technical elements.
Signature moves: Bearhug, powerslam, headbutt.
Brief description: Charlie Cook was a solid mid-card performer during his appearances in JCP. Known for his strength and straightforward wrestling style, Cook competed in both singles and tag team matches, often putting up strong performances against more prominent stars.

Charlie Fulton
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Traditional grappler with a focus on fundamentals.
Signature moves: Suplex, headlock, body slam.
Brief description: Charlie Fulton was a journeyman wrestler who frequently competed in JCP as enhancement talent. His ability to work with a variety of opponents and make them look strong ensured his steady presence in the territory during his tenure.

Chavo Guerrero
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; occasional tag team and singles competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with a focus on lucha libre.
Signature moves: Moonsault, dropkick, arm drag.
Brief description: A member of the legendary Guerrero wrestling family, Chavo Guerrero brought his lucha libre style and charisma to JCP during his limited appearances. While he was not heavily featured in the promotion, his skill set and dynamic in-ring ability made him a memorable addition to the roster.

Chic Donovan
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Lower mid-card; enhancement talent and flamboyant competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with a focus on showmanship.
Signature moves: Powerslam, elbow drop, vertical suplex.
Brief description: Chic Donovan was a flashy and charismatic wrestler who frequently competed as enhancement talent in JCP. Known for his muscular physique and theatrical persona, Donovan added an entertaining flair to his matches, even when primarily used to showcase other stars.

Chief Big Heart (Don Eagle)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; babyface competitor with a Native American persona.
Wrestling style: Traditional with an emphasis on crowd connection and striking.
Signature moves: Tomahawk chop, sleeper hold, headlock.
Brief description: Chief Big Heart was a fan-favorite babyface known for his Native American-inspired gimmick and engaging in-ring style. His appearances in JCP highlighted his ability to connect with the audience, often rallying the crowd with his fighting spirit and energetic performances.

Chief Crazy Horse (Jerry Monti)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; babyface competitor with a Native American persona.
Wrestling style: Traditional, with striking and theatrical crowd engagement.
Signature moves: Tomahawk chop, sleeper hold, arm drag.
Brief description: Chief Crazy Horse captivated audiences with his Native American gimmick and fiery in-ring style. Known for his energetic comebacks and ability to rally the crowd, he competed against various heels in JCP during his appearances, solidifying his role as a mid-card attraction.

Chief Little Eagle
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and early 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; special attraction babyface wrestler.
Wrestling style: Technical with elements of striking and traditional wrestling.
Signature moves: Tomahawk chop, leg drop, headlock.
Brief description: Chief Little Eagle was a popular babyface who brought an engaging and culturally inspired style to his matches. His Native American persona resonated with fans, making him a featured competitor in mid-card matches during his time in JCP.

Chris Adams
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; skilled singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with a focus on striking and athleticism.
Signature moves: Superkick, crossbody block, vertical suplex.
Brief description: Chris Adams, known as "Gentleman" Chris Adams, made occasional appearances in JCP, showcasing his technical prowess and innovative style. Best remembered for his work in World Class Championship Wrestling, Adams’ brief time in JCP highlighted his ability to deliver high-quality matches and engage fans with his charismatic persona.

Chris Champion
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular in 1987 as part of The New Breed tag team.
Position on the card: Mid-card; tag team specialist.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with a futuristic gimmick.
Signature moves: Missile dropkick, diving crossbody, double-team maneuvers (with Sean Royal).
Brief description: Chris Champion was one-half of The New Breed, a tag team with Sean Royal that portrayed time travelers from the future. Their innovative style and unique gimmick set them apart in JCP's tag team division. While their run was relatively short, The New Breed feuded with established teams like The Rock 'n' Roll Express and brought an exciting dynamic to the promotion’s mid-card scene.

Chris Markoff
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; tag team and singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with a focus on strikes and submissions.
Signature moves: Bearhug, backbreaker, piledriver.
Brief description: Chris Markoff was a rugged and powerful wrestler who often portrayed a foreign heel. His appearances in JCP included tag team matches and occasional singles bouts, where his imposing style made him a credible threat to babyfaces. While not a major star, Markoff contributed to the promotion’s roster depth with his solid performances.

Chris Taylor
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-1970s.
Position on the card: Special attraction; upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based with a focus on amateur wrestling techniques.
Signature moves: Belly-to-belly suplex, bearhug, takedowns.
Brief description: Chris Taylor, an Olympic medalist in amateur wrestling, brought legitimacy and athleticism to his matches. His limited time in JCP capitalized on his amateur accolades, where he was often featured in special attraction bouts. Despite his short wrestling career, Taylor’s presence added a unique dimension to the roster.

Chris Tolos
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; tag team specialist with his brother, John Tolos.
Wrestling style: Technical and mat-based with a focus on teamwork.
Signature moves: Dropkick, abdominal stretch, double-team maneuvers (with John Tolos).
Brief description: Chris Tolos, one-half of the Tolos Brothers, made limited appearances in JCP, where he showcased his technical skills in both singles and tag team competition. Known for their smooth teamwork and strong fundamentals, the Tolos Brothers were respected performers across various territories.

Chuck O'Connor (John Studd)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; singles competitor and rising star.
Wrestling style: Power-based with a focus on strength and size.
Signature moves: Bearhug, body slam, big boot.
Brief description: Before achieving fame as Big John Studd, Chuck O'Connor was an up-and-coming powerhouse wrestler. His time in JCP was part of his early career, where he showcased his potential through his size and power. O'Connor's performances in JCP hinted at the success he would later achieve on a national stage.

Chuck Richards
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Active in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Fundamental grappler with a focus on selling and clean execution.
Signature moves: Arm drag, headlock, dropkick.
Brief description: Chuck Richards was a consistent enhancement talent in JCP, frequently appearing in matches to elevate other wrestlers. While not a featured competitor, his professionalism and ability to work with a variety of opponents made him a valuable member of the roster.

Ciclon Negro
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; strong heel competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling with an emphasis on power moves and strikes.
Signature moves: Bearhug, headbutt, running forearm smash.
Brief description: Ciclon Negro, known for his imposing physique and rough in-ring style, was a well-traveled heel wrestler. His time in JCP showcased his ability to engage audiences with his menacing persona and hard-hitting offense, often pitted against the promotion's popular babyfaces. Ciclon was a formidable competitor who left a mark during his appearances.

Cobra (George Takano)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; high-flying singles competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with elements of Japanese strong style.
Signature moves: Cobra clutch, flying crossbody, missile dropkick.
Brief description: Cobra, better known for his work in Japan, brought his dynamic and innovative style to JCP during his brief appearances. His matches showcased his agility and technical ability, making him a standout among the promotion's mid-card talent. While his time in JCP was short, his influence as an international talent was evident.

Cocoa Samoa
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; babyface competitor.
Wrestling style: High-energy brawler with a touch of islander flair.
Signature moves: Headbutt, flying body press, diving splash.
Brief description: Cocoa Samoa brought his islander persona and exciting in-ring style to JCP. Though not heavily featured, he provided memorable matches, especially in the mid-card, and was appreciated for his charisma and ability to connect with fans. His unique style and look made him a standout performer during his limited time in the promotion.

Cora Combs
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Special attraction in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical with a focus on mat wrestling.
Signature moves: Flying mare, arm drag, head scissors.
Brief description: A pioneer of women's wrestling, Cora Combs was one of the leading female competitors of her time. Her appearances in JCP showcased her technical expertise and ability to entertain audiences, often against fellow legends such as Mildred Burke and Mae Young. Combs helped elevate women's wrestling during an era when it was still growing in prominence.

Corsica Jean & Corsica Joe
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s as a tag team.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card tag team specialists.
Wrestling style: Technical and traditional with a focus on teamwork.
Signature moves: Double-team forearm smash, double elbow drop, abdominal stretch.
Brief description: Corsica Jean and Corsica Joe were a popular tag team known for their strong chemistry and technical ability. Their time in JCP included feuds with various babyface teams, where they were portrayed as a rugged and cunning duo. Their contributions helped shape the tag team division during the early years of televised wrestling.

Cougar Jay
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Active in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Traditional grappler with a focus on basic moves and selling.
Signature moves: Dropkick, arm drag, crossbody.
Brief description: Cougar Jay was a regular enhancement talent in JCP, often competing in televised matches to help establish other stars. While rarely victorious, his professionalism and consistency made him a respected figure among his peers, contributing to the overall depth of the roster.

Cowboy Lang
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Special attraction in the midget wrestling division.
Wrestling style: High-energy, comedic, and crowd-pleasing.
Signature moves: Dropkick, head scissors, arm drag.
Brief description: Cowboy Lang was a popular figure in midget wrestling, captivating audiences with his cowboy-themed persona and high-energy matches. His appearances in JCP often served as entertaining additions to cards, delighting fans with his agility and comedic timing. Lang was a well-known name in the midget wrestling scene and worked across various territories.

Cruel Connection (Masked Team)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Active in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement tag team.
Wrestling style: Traditional tag team wrestling with a focus on selling and teamwork.
Signature moves: Double suplex, elbow drop, double axe handle.
Brief description: The Cruel Connection was a masked tag team used primarily as enhancement talent in JCP’s tag team division. While they rarely secured victories, they were consistent and professional workers who helped showcase the abilities of more prominent tag teams such as The Rock 'n' Roll Express and The Midnight Express.

Crusher Blackwell (Jerry Blackwell)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; powerhouse heel.
Wrestling style: Power-based with a focus on brute strength and impactful strikes.
Signature moves: Running splash, bearhug, body slam.
Brief description: Jerry "Crusher" Blackwell was a physically imposing competitor whose size and agility made him stand out. In JCP, he was often booked as a dominant heel, engaging in hard-hitting matches against popular babyfaces. While his tenure in JCP was brief, Blackwell’s reputation as a formidable competitor was well-established in various territories.

Cuban Connection (Ricky Santana & Fidel Sierra)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; heel tag team.
Wrestling style: Technical with a focus on teamwork and brawling.
Signature moves: Double suplex, elbow drop, tag team arm wringer.
Brief description: The Cuban Connection was a heel tag team that leaned into political and cultural tensions to generate heat from audiences. Known for their antagonistic personas and cohesive in-ring style, they were used to build rivalries with babyface teams and elevate the drama of JCP’s tag team division.

Curtis Thompson
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Lower mid-card; singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with an athletic edge.
Signature moves: Powerslam, dropkick, vertical suplex.
Brief description: Curtis Thompson, who later found fame as part of the tag team "The State Patrol" and as Firebreaker Chip in WCW, had limited appearances in JCP. His performances showcased his potential, and his athleticism hinted at the success he would later achieve in the wrestling business.

Cyclone Anaya
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; technical and high-energy competitor.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired with an emphasis on agility and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Flying head scissors, arm drag, dropkick.
Brief description: Cyclone Anaya was one of the early pioneers of lucha libre-style wrestling in the United States. His appearances in JCP brought a unique flair to the promotion, showcasing his high-energy style and exciting moves. Anaya was a fan favorite who helped introduce lucha libre elements to American audiences during his time.

Cyclone Negro (Roberto Soto)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event; dominant heel competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling with technical elements and striking.
Signature moves: Bearhug, lariat, diving elbow drop.
Brief description: Cyclone Negro was a feared heel known for his physicality and intensity. In JCP, he often headlined cards against the promotion’s top babyfaces. His ability to generate heat and deliver brutal matches made him a standout performer during his time in the territory. Cyclone Negro’s imposing presence solidified his legacy as one of the promotion's top villains.

Dale Lewis
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; technical wrestler.
Wrestling style: Amateur wrestling-based, with a focus on submissions and grappling.
Signature moves: Double-leg takedown, sleeper hold, armbar.
Brief description: Dale Lewis, a former amateur standout, brought credibility and technical prowess to his matches in JCP. His in-ring style emphasized holds and takedowns, showcasing his legitimate athletic background. While not a top star in JCP, he was respected for his solid, no-nonsense performances.

Danny Miller
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular from the 1960s to the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card; tag team specialist and singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and mat-based with a focus on submissions.
Signature moves: Sleeper hold, abdominal stretch, dropkick.
Brief description: Danny Miller was a skilled technician who found success in both singles and tag team competition. A fan-favorite babyface, Miller often teamed with popular wrestlers such as George Becker and Johnny Weaver. His technical skills and ability to engage audiences made him a reliable performer throughout his tenure in JCP.

Dave Patterson
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Lower mid-card; primarily a tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Fundamental grappling with a focus on basic in-ring psychology.
Signature moves: Arm drag, body slam, headlock takedown.
Brief description: Dave Patterson was a journeyman wrestler who made occasional appearances in JCP. Often competing in tag team matches, Patterson contributed as a reliable performer in undercard bouts, helping to enhance the credibility of rising talent and established stars.

Dave Spearman
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Enhancement talent; occasional tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Basic and traditional, with an emphasis on selling and clean execution.
Signature moves: Suplex, headlock, dropkick.
Brief description: Dave Spearman was a consistent enhancement talent who appeared regularly on JCP television. He worked with a variety of opponents, showcasing their strengths while delivering solid in-ring performances. While not a featured star, Spearman's contributions were essential to the structure of the promotion's weekly programming.

David Isley
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Active in the mid to late 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Traditional with a focus on selling and clean technical moves.
Signature moves: Arm drag, suplex, dropkick.
Brief description: David Isley was a reliable enhancement talent in JCP, frequently appearing in televised matches to help showcase rising stars and top-tier competitors. Known for his ability to sell and put over opponents effectively, Isley contributed to the overall depth of the promotion’s roster.

David Sierra (Fidel Sierra)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-1980s as part of the Cuban Connection.
Position on the card: Mid-card; tag team specialist.
Wrestling style: Brawler with technical elements and strong teamwork.
Signature moves: Double suplex, arm drag, forearm smash.
Brief description: David Sierra, as Fidel Sierra in the Cuban Connection, brought a hard-hitting and intense style to the JCP tag team division. Partnering with Ricky Santana, Sierra portrayed a heel character that generated heat through both in-ring tactics and political overtones. The Cuban Connection feuded with several babyface teams, showcasing Sierra’s skill as a solid mid-card performer.

Dennis Condrey
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular from 1985 to 1987 as part of the Midnight Express.
Position on the card: Main event in the tag team division; prominent heel.
Wrestling style: Technical and methodical with an emphasis on teamwork.
Signature moves: Flapjack (with Bobby Eaton), swinging neckbreaker, double-team Rocket Launcher (with Eaton).
Brief description: Dennis Condrey was one-half of the legendary Midnight Express, managed by Jim Cornette. Teaming with Bobby Eaton, Condrey brought technical precision and old-school heel tactics to their matches. The Midnight Express had legendary feuds with teams like the Rock 'n' Roll Express, delivering some of the most memorable tag team matches in JCP history. Condrey’s in-ring psychology and chemistry with Eaton made him a key figure in the promotion’s tag team success.

Denny Brown
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular from the early to mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; NWA World Junior Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical and fast-paced with a focus on clean execution.
Signature moves: Flying crossbody, arm drag, sunset flip.
Brief description: Denny Brown was a standout in the junior heavyweight division, holding the NWA World Junior Heavyweight Championship multiple times during his tenure in JCP. Known for his technical prowess and agility, Brown competed in high-quality matches that highlighted the depth of JCP's roster. His contributions helped maintain the prestige of the junior heavyweight title.

Dewey Robertson
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; singles and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: Bearhug, backbreaker, running shoulder block.
Brief description: Dewey Robertson was a reliable and versatile performer in JCP, showcasing his strength and technical ability in both singles and tag team matches. Though not a main event star, he was a respected wrestler who later gained fame as "The Missing Link" in other promotions.

Diamond Lil
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s and 1980s.
Position on the card: Special attraction in the midget wrestling division.
Wrestling style: High-energy and comedic, with a focus on entertaining the crowd.
Signature moves: Dropkick, head scissors, roll-up pin.
Brief description: Diamond Lil was one of the most prominent female midget wrestlers of her time. Her appearances in JCP provided a unique and entertaining addition to the cards, often paired against or alongside stars in her division. Lil’s charisma and skill earned her recognition as a standout in midget wrestling.

Dick Lever
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and early 1960s.
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Fundamental grappling with a focus on basic holds and selling.
Signature moves: Arm drag, hip toss, body slam.
Brief description: Dick Lever was a dependable enhancement talent in the early days of JCP. His role was to elevate other wrestlers by making them look strong in competitive matches, contributing to the structure of the promotion’s early programming.

Dick Murdoch
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event; versatile competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling with a mix of technical ability and comedy.
Signature moves: Brainbuster, elbow drop, piledriver.
Brief description: Dick Murdoch, known as "Captain Redneck," was a versatile and charismatic performer who blended technical wrestling with rugged brawling. In JCP, Murdoch often engaged in feuds with top stars and delivered hard-hitting, entertaining matches. His ability to play both heel and babyface roles, combined with his in-ring prowess, made him a respected name across multiple promotions.

Dick Slater
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular from 1985 to 1987.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; often portrayed as a tough and unpredictable heel.
Wrestling style: Rugged brawling with technical elements.
Signature moves: Piledriver, Russian leg sweep, swinging neckbreaker.
Brief description: Known as "Dirty" Dick Slater, he brought his gritty and unpredictable persona to JCP during the mid-1980s. Often involved in feuds with top stars like Dusty Rhodes and Magnum T.A., Slater’s matches were physical and intense. His versatility allowed him to excel in both singles and tag team competition, making him a valuable asset to JCP’s roster.

Dick Steinborn
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; technical wrestler.
Wrestling style: Mat-based and technical with a focus on holds and counter-wrestling.
Signature moves: Abdominal stretch, figure-four leglock, suplex.
Brief description: Dick Steinborn was a skilled technician whose appearances in JCP showcased his smooth and precise in-ring style. A second-generation wrestler, Steinborn’s ability to engage fans with his technical skills made him a respected performer, though his time in JCP was limited compared to other territories.

Dino Bravo
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; tag team and singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with a mix of technical grappling.
Signature moves: Airplane spin, backbreaker, bearhug.
Brief description: Dino Bravo, a powerhouse performer from Canada, made occasional appearances in JCP during the early stages of his career. Known for his strength and technical ability, Bravo competed in both singles and tag team bouts, providing exciting matches. He later became more famous for his work in WWF, where his persona evolved into a heel character.

DJ Peterson
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Lower mid-card; singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Power and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: Powerslam, dropkick, suplex.
Brief description: DJ Peterson was a promising talent known for his athleticism and in-ring versatility. While his appearances in JCP were limited, Peterson showcased his potential through solid performances. He gained more recognition in other promotions, including the AWA, later in his career.


Don Curtis
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; tag team and singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with a focus on mat-based grappling and teamwork.
Signature moves: Abdominal stretch, double-arm suplex, flying head scissors.
Brief description: Don Curtis was a standout technical wrestler who excelled in both singles and tag team competition. Often teaming with Mark Lewin, Curtis gained a reputation for his smooth in-ring skills and ability to deliver compelling matches. His appearances in JCP highlighted his role as a respected figure in wrestling during the golden age of the sport.

Don Eagle (Carl Donald Bell)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and early 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card; babyface competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with a focus on Native American-inspired storytelling and striking.
Signature moves: Tomahawk chop, headlock, flying mare.
Brief description: Don Eagle was one of the early Native American wrestling stars, known for his charisma and in-ring skills. His appearances in JCP were part of his broader success in wrestling, where his combination of athleticism and cultural persona made him a popular draw. Eagle’s fiery babyface style resonated with fans and contributed to his legacy as a pioneering performer.

Don Fargo
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; tag team and singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawler with a mix of technical holds.
Signature moves: Piledriver, backbreaker, knee drop.
Brief description: Don Fargo, a member of the infamous Fargo Brothers, brought his rough-and-tumble style to JCP during sporadic appearances. Known for his brash persona and hard-hitting matches, Fargo was a reliable heel who contributed to the promotion’s tag team and singles divisions.

Don Kent
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; tag team and singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling with heel tactics and an aggressive in-ring demeanor.
Signature moves: Bearhug, headlock, elbow smash.
Brief description: Don Kent, known for his work as part of the Fabulous Kangaroos, occasionally appeared in JCP. His heel persona and rugged style made him a solid opponent for both rising stars and established babyfaces. Kent’s contribution to tag team wrestling in other territories extended his influence beyond his time in JCP.

Don Kernodle
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular from the late 1970s to the mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; tag team specialist and singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with power elements and a focus on psychology.
Signature moves: Suplex, elbow drop, sleeper hold.
Brief description: Don Kernodle was a key figure in JCP, often teaming with Sgt. Slaughter to form a dominant heel tag team. A native of North Carolina, Kernodle had a strong connection with the Mid-Atlantic audience, transitioning from a hated heel to a beloved babyface. His matches were notable for their storytelling and intensity, and he remains a respected figure in JCP’s history.

Don Muraco
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid to late 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event; singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical and brawling elements.
Signature moves: Piledriver, Russian leg sweep, running powerslam.
Brief description: Don Muraco, known for his strength and charisma, made occasional appearances in JCP during the early stages of his career. His performances showcased his versatility as a powerful heel and a compelling babyface. Muraco later became a household name in other promotions, particularly for his work in the WWF during the 1980s.

Don McIntyre
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card; singles competitor and occasional tag team wrestler.
Wrestling style: Technical and traditional with a focus on mat wrestling and holds.
Signature moves: Sleeper hold, body slam, headlock.
Brief description: Don McIntyre was a well-respected technical wrestler who competed in JCP during its formative years. Known for his clean, no-nonsense approach to wrestling, McIntyre was a reliable presence on the card, providing solid matches against both rising stars and established competitors.

Don Turner
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Active in the 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Fundamental with a focus on clean execution and selling.
Signature moves: Arm drag, headlock, body slam.
Brief description: Don Turner was a consistent enhancement talent in JCP, frequently appearing on television to help showcase the promotion’s rising stars and main event competitors. While rarely victorious, Turner’s professionalism and in-ring ability were key to building the credibility of JCP's weekly programming.

Don Wright
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; primarily a singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling with elements of southern wrestling psychology.
Signature moves: Suplex, forearm smash, sleeper hold.
Brief description: Don Wright, a member of the Wright wrestling family, was known for his gritty, hard-hitting style. During his appearances in JCP, Wright often competed in matches that showcased his toughness and ability to deliver crowd-pleasing bouts. His reputation extended across various southern territories.

Donna Christanello
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Special attraction in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical with an emphasis on mat wrestling and holds.
Signature moves: Flying mare, arm drag, head scissors.
Brief description: Donna Christanello was a prominent figure in women’s wrestling during her time, known for her technical skills and ability to engage audiences. She competed in JCP as part of the women's division, often participating in high-profile matches against other top stars of the era, such as Fabulous Moolah.

Dory Funk Jr.
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Main event; NWA World Heavyweight Champion during his tenure.
Wrestling style: Technical and mat-based with a focus on submissions and storytelling.
Signature moves: Spinning toe hold, vertical suplex, abdominal stretch.
Brief description: Dory Funk Jr., a legendary NWA World Heavyweight Champion, defended his title across multiple territories, including JCP. Known for his methodical and technical wrestling style, Funk Jr.’s matches were often regarded as clinics in psychology and pacing. His appearances in JCP helped elevate the territory’s status within the NWA.

Doug Gilbert
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Lower mid-card; singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with a mix of power-based moves.
Signature moves: Vertical suplex, sleeper hold, shoulder block.
Brief description: Doug Gilbert was a reliable competitor who appeared occasionally in JCP, often used in matches to elevate more prominent stars. Known for his solid fundamentals and work ethic, Gilbert contributed to the overall quality of the promotion’s undercard matches.

Doug Somers
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Lower mid-card; singles and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Traditional grappler with an emphasis on psychology and basic moves.
Signature moves: Piledriver, elbow drop, side suplex.
Brief description: Doug Somers was a skilled wrestler who later achieved greater fame as a tag team competitor in AWA. His time in JCP saw him participate in singles and tag team matches, showcasing his professionalism and ability to contribute to a variety of storylines and matches.

Doug Vines
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement talent; tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Basic and power-based, with a focus on selling and teamwork.
Signature moves: Backbreaker, body slam, double suplex (in tag matches).
Brief description: Doug Vines appeared in JCP as enhancement talent, often competing in tag team matches to help build up more prominent duos in the division. While not a featured performer, his work contributed to the success of JCP’s tag team roster.

Duke Keomuka
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event; prominent heel.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based with a focus on heel tactics.
Signature moves: Sleeper hold, nerve pinch, chop to the throat.
Brief description: Duke Keomuka was a feared heel during his time in JCP, utilizing his technical prowess and devious in-ring style to antagonize babyfaces. Known for his intense matches and psychological approach, Keomuka was a key figure in feuds with top stars of the era. He later became an influential trainer, helping shape future generations of wrestlers.

Dusty Rhodes (The American Dream)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular from 1984 to 1988.
Position on the card: Main event; top babyface and booker.
Wrestling style: Brawler with emotional storytelling and crowd connection.
Signature moves: Bionic elbow, figure-four leglock, dropkick.
Brief description: Dusty Rhodes was the heart and soul of JCP during its peak years, both as a performer and as a creative force behind the scenes. Known as "The American Dream," Dusty connected with fans through his charisma, passionate promos, and everyman persona. His feuds with Ric Flair, the Four Horsemen, and other top heels of the era produced some of the most iconic moments in wrestling history. Dusty's booking helped define JCP’s storytelling, including the legendary "Hard Times" promo and events like Starrcade.

Dutch Mantell
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card; versatile competitor in singles and tag matches.
Wrestling style: Brawling with technical elements and southern psychology.
Signature moves: Short-arm clothesline, scoop slam, sleeper hold.
Brief description: Dutch Mantell, known for his rugged style and signature whip "Shoo Baby," was a solid performer during his time in JCP. He competed in both singles and tag team bouts, often bringing intensity and storytelling to his matches. Mantell later became a respected figure in wrestling as a manager and creative mind in various promotions.

Ed Wiskoski
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s to early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, occasionally higher in specialty matches or tag-team situations.
Wrestling style: Brawler with a technical edge.
Signature moves: Belly-to-back suplex, knee drop, running forearm smash.
Brief description: Known by the ring name "Colonel DeBeers" later in his career, Ed Wiskoski made sporadic appearances in JCP, bringing his roughneck brawling style to events, including matches with local talent and as part of cross-promotional efforts. While not a staple of JCP in Mexico, his style was well-suited for heel vs. face dynamics.

Eddie Gilbert
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Early 1980s, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card to opening matches.
Wrestling style: Technical with elements of high-speed offense.
Signature moves: Dropkick, arm drag, sunset flip.
Brief description: Before becoming a significant figure in promotions like Memphis and the UWF, Eddie Gilbert honed his skills in JCP during sporadic stints. He was often used in undercard matches to showcase his potential and engage fans with his fast-paced, technical approach. Despite limited appearances in Mexico under JCP, Gilbert's future star power was evident.

Eddie Graham
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Guest appearances in the mid-to-late 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Technical with strong storytelling elements.
Signature moves: Sleeper hold, figure-four leglock, hammerlock.
Brief description: Eddie Graham, known as both a wrestler and a promoter, occasionally appeared in JCP, often as a special attraction. His matches emphasized technical proficiency and psychology, reflecting his legendary status in wrestling. Graham's guest appearances often added gravitas to events, enhancing their appeal and showcasing his renowned wrestling acumen.

Elijah Akeem
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early-to-mid 1980s.
Position on the card: Tag team division, primarily in mid-card matches.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with a focus on strength-based offense.
Signature moves: Power slam, bear hug, big boot.
Brief description: Known for his role as part of The Zambuie Express alongside Kareem Muhammad, Elijah Akeem occasionally appeared in JCP events, often in tag team matches. Their imposing presence as a heel team added depth to the tag team division. While not regulars in JCP, their sporadic appearances were notable for their intensity and dominance in the ring.

Enrique Torres
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Technical and mat-based wrestling with an emphasis on athleticism.
Signature moves: Arm drag, hip toss, abdominal stretch.
Brief description: A standout star of the 1950s, Enrique Torres brought a mix of charisma and technical prowess to his sporadic appearances in JCP. His polished in-ring style and ability to captivate audiences made him a key attraction during his tenure. While primarily associated with other territories, Torres’ time in JCP added a touch of star power and helped bolster the promotion's reputation.

Ernie Ladd
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Main event and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with a commanding presence and sharp promo skills.
Signature moves: Big boot, leg drop, overhand chop.
Brief description: Known as "The Big Cat," Ernie Ladd was a towering figure in professional wrestling, both physically and metaphorically. His sporadic appearances in JCP often placed him in marquee matchups, where his charisma and in-ring dominance made him a draw. Ladd’s ability to work both as a fearsome heel and a charismatic face added versatility to his role, and his tenure in JCP contributed to memorable rivalries and angles.

Ethel Johnson
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and special attraction in women's matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and athletic, blending high-energy maneuvers with a ground-based approach.
Signature moves: Dropkick, headscissors takedown, arm drag.
Brief description: A trailblazer in women's wrestling, Ethel Johnson was one of the first African American women to compete in professional wrestling. Her sporadic appearances in JCP showcased her dynamic athleticism and helped elevate women’s wrestling within the promotion. Known for her grace and in-ring skill, she left a lasting impression on audiences and paved the way for future generations.

Fabulous Fargos
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and early 1960s.
Position on the card: Tag team division, often featured in main events or marquee matches.
Wrestling style: Brawling with a flamboyant and chaotic approach to tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Double team strikes, atomic drop, piledriver.
Brief description: Jackie and Don Fargo (and occasionally other members, depending on the era) were one of the most influential tag teams of their time. Their sporadic appearances in JCP brought excitement and unpredictability to the tag team division. With their mix of charisma, in-ring psychology, and underhanded tactics, the Fargos were crowd favorites as heels and occasionally as babyfaces.

Fabulous Freebirds
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in 1984 and 1985.
Position on the card: Main Event and Upper Mid-card (notably as a tag team).
Wrestling style: Brawling and Southern-style tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Double DDT, Piledriver, and the Freebird Flapjack.
Brief description: The Fabulous Freebirds, comprising Michael Hayes, Terry Gordy, and Buddy Roberts (with occasional involvement of Jimmy Garvin later), were innovators of tag team wrestling and trailblazers with their use of entrance music. Their JCP appearances were brief but impactful, often challenging top-tier tag teams like The Road Warriors. Their sporadic tenure emphasized their ability to bring excitement and intensity to any card they were featured on.

Fabulous Moolah
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regularly featured during the 1970s through early 1980s.
Position on the card: Women’s Division Mainstay.
Wrestling style: Traditional technical wrestling, with a focus on mat-based control and heel tactics.
Signature moves: Backbreaker, Hair-pull Snapmare, and Boston Crab.
Brief description: The Fabulous Moolah dominated women's wrestling for decades and maintained a strong presence in JCP during her reigns as Women’s World Champion. Her matches were often booked to showcase her as a top heel, using underhanded tactics to retain her title. Moolah's influence in women's wrestling extended beyond her JCP appearances, as she trained numerous future stars in her camp.

Fantastics
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular from 1988 to 1989.
Position on the card: Mid-card to Upper Mid-card in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-energy tag team wrestling with a mix of technical moves and crowd-popping high spots.
Signature moves: Rocket Launcher, Sunset Flip, and Double Dropkick.
Brief description: The team of Bobby Fulton and Tommy Rogers became fan favorites with their charismatic, athletic performances. Known for their feuds with the Midnight Express, the Fantastics delivered several classic matches that showcased their versatility in both technical wrestling and storytelling.

Fabulous Ones
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in 1984-1985.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: Showman-style brawling with solid tag team fundamentals.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Spinning Neckbreaker, and High Crossbody.
Brief description: The Fabulous Ones, Steve Keirn and Stan Lane, were highly successful in the Southern territories and made limited appearances in JCP. Their flamboyant image and solid in-ring chemistry made them a popular attraction, but they were not prominently featured compared to their runs in other promotions.

Four Horsemen
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1985 to 1988 (core years).
Position on the card: Main Event (as a faction and in singles matches).
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling styles, with a focus on dominance and teamwork.
Signature moves: Spinebuster (Arn Anderson), Figure Four Leglock (Ric Flair), Gourdbuster (Tully Blanchard), and Slingshot Suplex (Tully Blanchard).
Brief description: The Four Horsemen, formed in 1985, became one of the most dominant and iconic factions in wrestling history. Featuring Ric Flair, Arn Anderson, Tully Blanchard, and various other members (e.g., Ole Anderson, Lex Luger, Barry Windham), the group epitomized professional wrestling excellence and villainy. They were central figures in JCP storylines, engaging in feuds with Dusty Rhodes, the Road Warriors, and Magnum T.A. Their alliance symbolized wealth, power, and superiority, often aligning with championship gold.

Flying Scotts
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to Upper Mid-card in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-impact tag team wrestling with a mix of athleticism and rugged strikes.
Signature moves: Flying Body Press, Double Team Backbreaker, and Dropkicks.
Brief description: George and Sandy Scott, the Flying Scotts, were a well-regarded tag team known for their fast-paced style and smooth teamwork. They occasionally competed in JCP during the territorial era, enhancing cards with their technical prowess and exciting aerial offense. George Scott later became a pivotal figure behind the scenes as a booker in wrestling.

Frank Hickey
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances during the 1950s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent and Occasional Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Traditional catch wrestling with a focus on ground-based maneuvers.
Signature moves: Armbar, Headlock Takedown, and Atomic Drop.
Brief description: Frank Hickey appeared sporadically in JCP during the 1950s, primarily in a supporting role. His purpose was to elevate other talent while contributing to the territorial cards. Hickey's technical foundation made him a reliable opponent for more prominent stars of the time.

Frank Jares
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Limited appearances in the early 1950s.
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor.
Wrestling style: Rugged brawling with a mix of grappling fundamentals.
Signature moves: Body Slam, Shoulder Block, and Bearhug.
Brief description: Frank Jares, a journeyman wrestler of his era, worked in various territories, including JCP during the early 1950s. His physical style made him a solid addition to mid-card bouts, though he was not a significant player in the promotion's storylines.

Frank Hickey
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances during the 1950s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent and Occasional Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Traditional catch wrestling with a focus on ground-based maneuvers.
Signature moves: Armbar, Headlock Takedown, and Atomic Drop.
Brief description: Frank Hickey appeared sporadically in JCP during the 1950s, primarily in a supporting role. His purpose was to elevate other talent while contributing to the territorial cards. Hickey's technical foundation made him a reliable opponent for more prominent stars of the time.

Frank Jares
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Limited appearances in the early 1950s.
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor.
Wrestling style: Rugged brawling with a mix of grappling fundamentals.
Signature moves: Body Slam, Shoulder Block, and Bearhug.
Brief description: Frank Jares, a journeyman wrestler of his era, worked in various territories, including JCP during the early 1950s. His physical style made him a solid addition to mid-card bouts, though he was not a significant player in the promotion's storylines.

Frank Morrell
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent and Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Brawling with occasional technical maneuvers.
Signature moves: Body Slam, Elbow Drop, and Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: Frank Morrell worked as a reliable journeyman wrestler during his time in JCP, primarily contributing to the mid-card and enhancing other stars. His versatility and professionalism made him a valuable addition to the promotion’s roster during his sporadic appearances.

Frank Sexton
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a mix of powerhouse tactics.
Signature moves: Full Nelson, Hammerlock, and Knee Lift.
Brief description: Frank Sexton was a well-respected wrestler who made occasional stops in JCP during the 1950s. Known for his technical expertise and ability to work with a variety of opponents, he was often featured in competitive matches against other top-tier talents.

Frankie Cain
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Brawling and rule-breaking heel tactics.
Signature moves: Brass Knuckles Strike, Eye Rake, and Piledriver.
Brief description: Frankie Cain, also known by his alias The Great Mephisto, was a notorious heel who used his underhanded tactics to gain an advantage. His appearances in JCP often saw him draw significant heat from the crowd, making him an effective villain in the territory.

Freddie Sweetan
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Powerslam, and Backbreaker.
Brief description: Freddie Sweetan competed in JCP primarily in tag team action, where his strength and rugged style made him a solid addition to cards. Though not a mainstay, his appearances added depth to the mid-card and tag team divisions during his tenure.

Fritz von Erich
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances during the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Main Event and Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based technical wrestling with strong heel tactics.
Signature moves: Iron Claw, Body Slam, and Bearhug.
Brief description: Fritz von Erich, known for his imposing presence and use of the Iron Claw, made notable appearances in JCP as a dominating heel. Although his primary career was centered in Texas, his JCP appearances solidified his reputation as a fierce competitor capable of drawing significant heat from fans in the territory.

The Funks (Dory Funk Jr. and Terry Funk)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from the late 1970s to the mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Main Event (both singles and tag team matches).
Wrestling style: Technical mastery (Dory) combined with unpredictable brawling (Terry).
Signature moves: Spinning Toe Hold (Dory), Piledriver (Terry), and Double Team Suplex.
Brief description: Dory Funk Jr. and Terry Funk, both former NWA World Heavyweight Champions, were major figures in professional wrestling and made impactful appearances in JCP. Their blend of styles—Dory's technical precision and Terry's chaotic brawling—helped them excel in both singles and tag team matches. The Funks were involved in numerous high-profile bouts, often facing the top stars of the promotion, such as Ric Flair and Dusty Rhodes, during their runs.

Garvin Brothers (Jimmy Garvin and Ron Garvin)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1985 to 1988.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card to Main Event (individually and as a team).
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling (Ron) combined with showmanship and flamboyance (Jimmy).
Signature moves: Hands of Stone Punch (Ron), Brainbuster (Jimmy), and Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: The Garvin Brothers brought a mix of hard-hitting realism and charismatic antics to JCP. Ron Garvin, known for his "Hands of Stone" punch, held the NWA World Heavyweight Championship, cementing his legacy. Jimmy Garvin, often paired with Precious, added character-driven flair to their appearances. They occasionally teamed up, showcasing their chemistry as brothers while also excelling in individual storylines.

Gary Hart
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic managerial appearances in the late 1970s and 1980s.
Position on the card: Managerial role for upper-mid-card and main event talent.
Wrestling style: N/A (Manager).
Signature moves: N/A (Manager).
Brief description: Gary Hart was a highly influential manager in professional wrestling, known for his cerebral approach to managing top-tier heels. In JCP, he worked with wrestlers like Abdullah the Butcher and The Great Kabuki, enhancing their mystique and providing excellent promo work. His ability to elevate talent through his managerial skills left a lasting impact on the promotion.

Gene Anderson
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from the 1960s through the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Main Event (as part of The Minnesota Wrecking Crew).
Wrestling style: Ground-based technical wrestling with a focus on tag team psychology.
Signature moves: Armbar, Double Team Hammerlock (with Ole Anderson), and Spinebuster.
Brief description: Gene Anderson, one-half of The Minnesota Wrecking Crew alongside Ole Anderson, was a cornerstone of JCP’s tag team division. Known for their methodical style and relentless focus on isolating opponents, the Andersons held multiple tag team championships. Gene's in-ring psychology and consistency made him a vital figure in JCP’s tag team scene for decades.

Gary Royal
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances during the 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent and occasional Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Traditional technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Suplex, and Arm Drag.
Brief description: Gary Royal was a journeyman wrestler who regularly competed in JCP during the 1980s. While primarily used as enhancement talent, Royal’s technical skills and ability to make his opponents look strong earned him respect among fans and peers. He occasionally participated in competitive matches, showcasing his versatility in the ring.

Gene Kiniski
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1950s and early 1960s.
Position on the card: Main Event.
Wrestling style: Power-based technical wrestling with a focus on domination.
Signature moves: Canadian Backbreaker, Shoulder Block, and Bearhug.
Brief description: A former NWA World Heavyweight Champion, Gene Kiniski was a towering figure in professional wrestling. His JCP appearances, though infrequent, were significant, as he often competed against top stars of the promotion. Known as "Canada's Greatest Athlete," Kiniski brought credibility and star power to the JCP main event scene during his appearances.

Gene Ligon
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent and occasional Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling mix.
Signature moves: Body Slam, Suplex, and Armbar.
Brief description: Gene Ligon was a dependable enhancement talent who frequently appeared on JCP programming during the 1980s. His primary role was to help establish other wrestlers, though he occasionally participated in more competitive matches. Ligon's versatility and professionalism made him a regular part of the promotion's roster.

George Becker
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from the 1950s through the early 1970s.
Position on the card: Main Event and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Traditional grappling with crowd-pleasing techniques.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Hip Toss, and Atomic Drop.
Brief description: George Becker was one of the top babyfaces in JCP history, beloved by fans for his charisma and resilience. Often teaming with Johnny Weaver, Becker became a cornerstone of the tag team division, winning multiple championships. His feuds with prominent heels of the era solidified his legacy as a JCP icon.

George Drake
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent.
Wrestling style: Traditional grappling with fundamental techniques.
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Dropkick, and Headlock.
Brief description: George Drake made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1970s, primarily as enhancement talent. His role was to help establish rising stars and provide competitive matches for mid-card and main event wrestlers.

George Cannon
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Manager.
Wrestling style: Power-based wrestling with strongman tactics.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Body Slam, and Forearm Smash.
Brief description: Known for his imposing frame and versatility, George Cannon appeared in JCP both as a wrestler and occasionally as a manager. His role often saw him in mid-card matches or helping enhance other talent, while his managerial presence added an element of intimidation to his clients' personas.

George Harris
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card wrestler and Manager.
Wrestling style: Brawling with a focus on heel tactics.
Signature moves: Eye Rake, Stomach Claw, and Knee Lift.
Brief description: George "Two Ton" Harris was a well-known heel wrestler and manager in JCP. As a wrestler, he was a solid mid-card performer who excelled in drawing heat with his underhanded tactics and oversized personality. Later in his career, Harris transitioned to managing, where he continued to generate strong reactions by guiding heel wrestlers to success.

George Scott
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances as a wrestler in the 1950s and later as a booker in the 1970s and 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card wrestler; influential booker.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on storytelling.
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Backbreaker, and Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: George Scott initially competed in JCP as one-half of the Flying Scotts tag team with his brother Sandy. While his in-ring career was successful, his most significant contributions came as a booker. Scott played a pivotal role in shaping JCP’s storytelling and elevating its prominence in the 1970s and 1980s. His creative vision helped set the stage for many iconic moments in wrestling history.

George South
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent.
Wrestling style: Traditional technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Suplex, and Arm Drag.
Brief description: George South was a respected enhancement talent who consistently worked in JCP throughout the 1980s. Known for his professionalism and ability to make his opponents look strong, South became a staple on JCP television programming. Despite primarily serving as a stepping stone for other stars, his contributions were essential to the success of the promotion's roster.

George Strickland
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent and occasional Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Grappling with a mix of brawling.
Signature moves: Headlock, Armbar, and Body Slam.
Brief description: George Strickland was a journeyman wrestler who occasionally competed in JCP during the 1950s and 1960s. While not a mainstay, his appearances added depth to the promotion's cards during his tenure.

George Wells
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based wrestling with occasional technical maneuvers.
Signature moves: Shoulder Block, Scoop Slam, and Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: George Wells, a former football player turned wrestler, made occasional appearances in JCP, often competing in mid-card bouts. His athleticism and strength made him a reliable performer, though his most notable runs occurred in other promotions.

Gino Garibaldi
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1940s and 1950s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on grappling and strikes.
Signature moves: Italian Backbreaker, Rope Choke, and Knee Drop.
Brief description: Gino Garibaldi was a prominent wrestler during the territorial era, making frequent appearances in JCP. Known for his rugged style and ability to adapt to various opponents, Garibaldi was a versatile performer who contributed to the promotion’s early success. His matches often showcased his technical skills, appealing to fans of the era.

Gladys "Killem" Gillem
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s.
Position on the card: Women's Division competitor.
Wrestling style: Rugged grappling with a focus on strength and power moves.
Signature moves: Headlock, Bearhug, and Body Slam.
Brief description: Gladys Gillem was a trailblazer in women's wrestling, known for her toughness and intense style. While she competed more prominently in other regions, her sporadic JCP appearances helped solidify her reputation as a gritty and reliable competitor in the women's division.

Giant Baba
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Special Attraction/Main Event.
Wrestling style: Technical and strong style, with a focus on methodical pacing and high-impact strikes.
Signature moves: Baba Chop, Neckbreaker Drop, and Giant Boot.
Brief description: Giant Baba, a towering figure in Japanese professional wrestling and founder of All Japan Pro Wrestling, made occasional appearances in JCP during the 1970s as part of cross-promotional events. His unique presence and international reputation made him a special attraction, often drawing significant attention from fans. Baba's matches highlighted his methodical yet impactful style, emphasizing his stature as a global wrestling legend.

Ginger The Wrestling Bear
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Special Attraction.
Wrestling style: N/A (gimmick match participant).
Signature moves: Bearhug and Grappling Maneuvers (performed under controlled conditions).
Brief description: Ginger The Wrestling Bear was a popular special attraction used by many wrestling promotions, including JCP. The bear was trained to participate in novelty matches against wrestlers in controlled and often comedic settings. Ginger's appearances brought a lighthearted and unique dynamic to JCP cards, appealing to family audiences and casual fans.

Golden Terror
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent and Occasional Mid-card (masked gimmick).
Wrestling style: Brawling with heel tactics.
Signature moves: Clawhold, Elbow Smash, and Running Knee Lift.
Brief description: Golden Terror was a masked persona used in various promotions, including JCP, primarily to fill out cards and provide competitive matches for rising stars. The character was often booked to generate heat with underhanded tactics.

Gordon McKenzie
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent.
Wrestling style: Traditional technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Dropkick, and Suplex.
Brief description: Gordon McKenzie appeared consistently as enhancement talent during his time in JCP. His role was to provide competitive matches that helped elevate the promotion's stars.

Gordon Nelson
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent and Occasional Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on mat-based grappling.
Signature moves: Armbar, Body Slam, and Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: Gordon Nelson was a skilled grappler who appeared sporadically in JCP, often competing as enhancement talent. Known for his technical abilities, Nelson helped elevate other wrestlers while occasionally competing in competitive matches.

Great Bolo
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1950s and early 1960s.
Position on the card: Main Event and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Brawling with a masked mystique and heel tactics.
Signature moves: Clawhold, Chop Block, and Shoulder Block.
Brief description: The Great Bolo, portrayed by Al Lovelock, was a prominent masked heel in JCP. Known for his menacing persona and underhanded tactics, Bolo often headlined events and competed in high-profile tag team matches. His feuds with top babyfaces drew significant heat from the audience, making him one of the most notorious heels of his era.

Great Hussein Arab (later known as The Iron Sheik)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based grappling and foreign heel tactics.
Signature moves: Camel Clutch, Suplex, and Loaded Boot Kick.
Brief description: Before becoming the Iron Sheik, the Great Hussein Arab made appearances in JCP as a foreign heel. His imposing presence and anti-American persona generated significant heat from the crowd. Though his tenure in JCP was brief, his performances added to the promotion’s rich history of villains.

Great Kabuki
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Special Attraction.
Wrestling style: Martial arts-influenced brawling with a unique mystique.
Signature moves: Asian Mist, Thrust Kick, and Nerve Hold.
Brief description: The Great Kabuki, managed by Gary Hart, brought an enigmatic and dangerous persona to JCP. Known for his eerie look and the use of the Asian Mist to blind opponents, Kabuki became a compelling heel and a significant draw during his time in the promotion. His feuds with stars like Jimmy Valiant added depth to JCP storylines.

Great Malenko
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based wrestling.
Signature moves: Russian Sickle, Leg Lock, and Neck Crank.
Brief description: Boris Malenko, often referred to as "The Great Malenko," was a skilled technical wrestler and a master of villainy. In JCP, he was a notable heel who used his charisma and in-ring psychology to stand out. His sporadic appearances were impactful, and he often worked to elevate local babyfaces in the territory.

Greg Valentine
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the late 1970s and sporadic returns in the 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Main Event.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting, technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Figure Four Leglock, Elbow Drop, and Atomic Drop.
Brief description: Greg "The Hammer" Valentine was a key figure in JCP during his tenure, known for his rugged style and memorable feuds, including clashes with Ric Flair and Wahoo McDaniel. Valentine’s skill in storytelling through in-ring psychology made him a standout performer in both singles and tag team competition.

Gypsy Joe
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent and occasional Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Brawling with unorthodox tactics.
Signature moves: Headbutt, Elbow Smash, and Double Axe Handle.
Brief description: Gypsy Joe, known for his longevity and tough-as-nails persona, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1970s. Although not a mainstay in the promotion, his rugged style and willingness to take punishment made him a memorable competitor on JCP cards.

Hans Herman
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: Power-based grappling with strong heel tactics.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Shoulder Block, and German Suplex.
Brief description: Hans Herman was a prominent heel wrestler during the 1950s, frequently competing in JCP. His intimidating persona and powerful style drew significant heat, making him a strong opponent for top babyfaces of the era.

Hans Schmidt
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Main Event.
Wrestling style: Brawling and power-based wrestling with an anti-American heel gimmick.
Signature moves: Piledriver, Knee Drop, and Double Axe Handle.
Brief description: Hans Schmidt, one of the earliest wrestlers to use an overtly anti-American gimmick, was a major draw during his appearances in JCP. His menacing in-ring presence and ability to rile up crowds made him a key figure in building feuds against patriotic babyfaces.

Hans Schnabel
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1940s and 1950s.
Position on the card: Main Event and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Grappling with a focus on heel tactics.
Signature moves: Clawhold, Backbreaker, and Armbar.
Brief description: Hans Schnabel, often paired with tag team partner Lou Newman as a menacing duo, was a well-known heel in JCP. His matches, filled with calculated heel antics, drew significant heat and were instrumental in creating exciting rivalries during the promotion’s early years.

Happy Humphrey
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s.
Position on the card: Special Attraction.
Wrestling style: Size-based grappling with an emphasis on showmanship.
Signature moves: Body Splash, Corner Avalanche, and Shoulder Block.
Brief description: Happy Humphrey, known for his massive size, was a unique draw during the 1950s. He competed in JCP as a special attraction, often in comedic or spectacle matches. His presence added novelty to the cards and drew attention from fans curious to see his unusual in-ring style.

Hard Boiled Haggerty
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Brawling with a focus on power and aggression.
Signature moves: Piledriver, Elbow Smash, and Forearm Smash.
Brief description: Known for his tough, no-nonsense demeanor, Hard Boiled Haggerty appeared in JCP as a rugged brawler who brought intensity to his matches. While his primary fame came in other territories, his occasional JCP appearances were notable for his hard-hitting style and heel persona.

Harley Race
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s and 1980s.
Position on the card: Main Event.
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based wrestling with strong psychology.
Signature moves: Diving Headbutt, Vertical Suplex, and Piledriver.
Brief description: A legendary NWA World Heavyweight Champion, Harley Race made memorable appearances in JCP defending the NWA title against the promotion's top stars. Known for his toughness and in-ring brilliance, Race was a key figure in cementing the prestige of the NWA title during his reigns, often feuding with JCP icons like Ric Flair and Dusty Rhodes.

Hawk (of the Road Warriors)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1986 to 1988.
Position on the card: Main Event (Tag Team Division).
Wrestling style: Powerhouse brawling with explosive offense.
Signature moves: Doomsday Device, Powerslam, and Military Press Slam.
Brief description: Hawk, alongside Animal as the Road Warriors, was a cornerstone of JCP's tag team division during their tenure. Their unmatched dominance, intensity, and charisma made them fan favorites, and they were involved in high-profile feuds with teams such as the Midnight Express and the Four Horsemen. Hawk's unmatched power and intensity solidified him as a larger-than-life figure in professional wrestling.

Haystacks Calhoun
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Special Attraction.
Wrestling style: Size-based brawling with crowd-pleasing antics.
Signature moves: Big Splash, Bearhug, and Corner Avalanche.
Brief description: Known for his immense size and friendly demeanor, Haystacks Calhoun was a major attraction during his appearances in JCP. His matches were often designed to showcase his unique strength and size, making him a fan favorite and a memorable figure in wrestling history.

Hector Guerrero
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1987 to 1988.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Moonsault, Dropkick, and Flying Crossbody.
Brief description: Hector Guerrero brought excitement and versatility to JCP's mid-card division, showcasing his Lucha Libre-inspired style. His ability to adapt to various opponents made him a valuable competitor, and he played a key role in introducing more high-flying action to the promotion's in-ring product.

Hercules (Hercules Hernandez)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based wrestling.
Signature moves: Full Nelson, Power Slam, and Torture Rack.
Brief description: Before gaining fame in other promotions, Hercules Hernandez competed in JCP, showcasing his impressive strength and agility. He often played the role of a heel, engaging in hard-hitting matches that helped establish his reputation as a powerhouse wrestler.

Hiro Matsuda
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based wrestling with a focus on precision.
Signature moves: Japanese Armbar, Sleeper Hold, and Hip Toss.
Brief description: Hiro Matsuda, known for his technical expertise and stoic demeanor, was a respected competitor during his JCP appearances. Often portraying a disciplined and calculating heel, Matsuda’s matches were methodical and technically sound. He was also a revered trainer, having worked with future stars like Ric Flair.

Homer O'Dell
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Manager and occasional wrestler.
Wrestling style: Managerial heel antics (occasional in-ring brawling).
Signature moves: N/A (Manager, occasional interference).
Brief description: Homer O'Dell was a flamboyant and controversial manager in JCP, known for his eccentric personality and ability to generate heat. While he occasionally stepped into the ring, his primary role was managing and elevating heel wrestlers. His wild antics and charisma made him a memorable figure during his tenure in the promotion.

Iceman King Parsons
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-energy brawling and charismatic in-ring style.
Signature moves: Butt Bump, Flying Headbutt, and Dropkick.
Brief description: Iceman King Parsons brought a unique blend of athleticism and charisma to his JCP appearances. Known for his electrifying personality and connection with the audience, Parsons was a fan favorite during his sporadic tenure in JCP, often competing against top stars in mid-card bouts.

Ida Mae Martinez
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s.
Position on the card: Women’s Division competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical grappling with a focus on quick counters.
Signature moves: Snapmare, Armdrag, and Flying Headscissors.
Brief description: Ida Mae Martinez was a talented women’s wrestler who made occasional appearances in JCP during the 1950s. Known for her athleticism and engaging performances, she was a respected competitor who helped raise the profile of women’s wrestling during her time.

Inferno #2 (of The Infernos)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Heel tactics with brawling and teamwork focus.
Signature moves: Double Team Suplex, Knee Drop, and Rope Choke.
Brief description: As part of the masked tag team "The Infernos," Inferno #2 was known for his cunning and dirty tactics. Managed by J.C. Dykes, The Infernos were a strong heel presence in JCP, frequently competing in tag team matches and drawing significant heat from fans.

Infernos (The Infernos)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Heel tactics with brawling and teamwork emphasis.
Signature moves: Double Team Suplex, Knee Drop, and Rope Choke.
Brief description: The Infernos, a masked tag team managed by J.C. Dykes, were a notorious heel team in JCP during the 1960s. Their use of dirty tactics and teamwork made them a dominant force in the tag team division, and their matches often resulted in wild crowd reactions due to their rule-breaking antics.

Iron Sheik
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s (as The Great Hussein Arab).
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based grappling and foreign heel tactics.
Signature moves: Camel Clutch, Suplex, and Loaded Boot Kick.
Brief description: The Iron Sheik, performing under his earlier persona "The Great Hussein Arab," made sporadic appearances in JCP during the late 1970s. Known for his anti-American gimmick and imposing presence, he was a heat magnet and a credible challenger for JCP’s babyfaces during his time in the promotion.

Italian Stallion
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent and occasional Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based wrestling with fundamental techniques.
Signature moves: Body Slam, Bearhug, and Suplex.
Brief description: Italian Stallion was a reliable enhancement talent in JCP throughout the 1980s. While primarily used to establish other stars, he occasionally competed in competitive matches and became known for his consistent work ethic and in-ring presence.

Ivan Koloff
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1981 to 1988.
Position on the card: Main Event and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with heel tactics.
Signature moves: Russian Sickle (Clothesline), Bearhug, and Knee Drop.
Brief description: Known as "The Russian Bear," Ivan Koloff was one of the most infamous heels in JCP during the 1980s. A former WWWF World Heavyweight Champion, Koloff brought credibility and intensity to JCP. He formed a dominant team with Nikita Koloff and Krusher Khruschev, playing a key role in storylines emphasizing Cold War tensions. Ivan's feuds with Dusty Rhodes, Magnum T.A., and other top stars cemented his place as a legendary figure in the promotion.

Jack Brisco
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s and 1980s.
Position on the card: Main Event and Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and mat-based wrestling.
Signature moves: Figure Four Leglock, Rolling Knee Bar, and Suplex.
Brief description: Jack Brisco, a former NWA World Heavyweight Champion, was widely regarded as one of the greatest technical wrestlers of his era. During his sporadic appearances in JCP, Brisco brought prestige to the cards, often engaging in high-caliber matches with top stars. His smooth grappling skills and storytelling ability elevated every match he participated in, solidifying his legendary status.

Jack Evans
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Brawling and power-based tactics.
Signature moves: Elbow Smash, Body Slam, and Knee Lift.
Brief description: Jack Evans was a rugged competitor who frequently teamed with other journeymen wrestlers in JCP’s tag team division during the 1960s. His straightforward, hard-hitting style made him a reliable addition to the mid-card, often used to support larger storylines involving top stars.

Jack Lanza
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Rugged brawling with a heel persona.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Piledriver, and Backbreaker.
Brief description: Jack Lanza, later known as "Blackjack Lanza," made occasional appearances in JCP before gaining greater fame as part of the tag team Blackjack Mulligan and Blackjack Lanza. His physical style and strong heel persona made him a reliable competitor during his JCP tenure.

Jack McDonald
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1940s and 1950s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a rugged edge.
Signature moves: Armbar, Hip Toss, and Knee Drop.
Brief description: Jack McDonald was a journeyman wrestler during the territorial era, making sporadic appearances in JCP. Known for his solid in-ring fundamentals and adaptability, he was a reliable competitor who could work with a variety of opponents across the card.

Jackie Fargo
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Main Event and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Brawling and crowd-pleasing antics.
Signature moves: Fargo Strut, Atomic Drop, and Punch Flurry.
Brief description: Jackie Fargo was a charismatic performer and a major star in the Southern territories, including JCP. His flamboyant personality and in-ring charisma made him a crowd favorite. Fargo occasionally competed in JCP, where his brawling style and showmanship drew significant fanfare, especially in tag team contests and feuds with top heels.

Jacques Goulet
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Technical grappling and heel tactics.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Elbow Smash, and Suplex.
Brief description: Jacques Goulet, often competing in tag teams, brought a European technical style to JCP. His calculated heel approach and adaptability made him a dependable addition to the mid-card during his tenure in the promotion.

Jake Roberts
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Psychological and technical wrestling with a focus on storytelling.
Signature moves: DDT, Short-Arm Clothesline, and Knee Lift.
Brief description: Before becoming a worldwide star, Jake "The Snake" Roberts made appearances in JCP, showcasing his cerebral approach to wrestling. Known for his calm yet menacing demeanor, Roberts stood out with his calculated in-ring style and his innovative use of the DDT, which quickly became one of the most feared finishers in wrestling.

James J. Dillon
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1985 to 1988.
Position on the card: Manager of the Four Horsemen.
Wrestling style: N/A (Manager).
Signature moves: N/A (Manager; occasional interference).
Brief description: James J. Dillon was the mastermind and manager behind the legendary Four Horsemen faction in JCP. His eloquence on the microphone and strategic guidance enhanced the Horsemen’s dominance during the mid-to-late 1980s. Dillon’s presence elevated the group’s status as one of the most feared and successful factions in wrestling history.

Jay Strongbow
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Traditional grappling with a Native American-inspired gimmick.
Signature moves: War Dance Chop, Sleeper Hold, and Elbow Smash.
Brief description: Jay Strongbow brought his signature Native American character to JCP during sporadic appearances in the 1960s. His matches often incorporated his "War Dance" comeback, which was a crowd-pleaser and a key part of his in-ring persona.

Jay Youngblood
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from the late 1970s to 1983.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: High-energy technical wrestling with elements of brawling.
Signature moves: Flying Tomahawk Chop, Sleeper Hold, and Crossbody.
Brief description: Jay Youngblood was a fan favorite in JCP, known for his speed and charisma. He formed a highly successful tag team with Ricky Steamboat, capturing multiple tag team championships. Their feuds with teams like Sgt. Slaughter and Don Kernodle were highlights of JCP’s tag team division, showcasing Youngblood’s athleticism and storytelling abilities.

J.C. Dykes
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Manager (primarily for The Infernos).
Wrestling style: N/A (Manager).
Signature moves: N/A (Manager; occasional interference).
Brief description: J.C. Dykes was the flamboyant and cunning manager of the masked Infernos tag team. His wild antics and ability to draw heat made him a key figure in the success of The Infernos during their run in JCP. Dykes' managerial presence added intrigue and intensity to the tag team division.

Jerry Brisco
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: Technical and mat-based wrestling.
Signature moves: Figure Four Leglock, Gutwrench Suplex, and Backbreaker.
Brief description: Jerry Brisco, part of the legendary Brisco family, was a skilled technical wrestler who occasionally appeared in JCP. Known for his smooth grappling and ability to adapt to opponents, Brisco was a respected competitor whose matches often showcased the fundamentals of wrestling.

Jerry Blackwell
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based wrestling with agility for his size.
Signature moves: Big Splash, Powerslam, and Shoulder Block.
Brief description: Jerry Blackwell, nicknamed “Crusher,” was a powerhouse wrestler who made sporadic appearances in JCP. Known for his incredible agility despite his size, Blackwell's matches were a mix of brute force and surprising athleticism, making him a unique attraction in any promotion he worked for.

Jeff Sword
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent and occasional Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Basic brawling with heel tactics.
Signature moves: Body Slam, Suplex, and Knee Drop.
Brief description: Jeff Sword frequently competed as part of a tag team with Doug Vines. Their role in JCP was primarily to enhance the credibility of more prominent teams, though Sword occasionally showed flashes of solid teamwork and resilience in the ring.

Jerry Lawler
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1980s.
Position on the card: Main Event (special appearances).
Wrestling style: Brawling and psychological storytelling.
Signature moves: Piledriver, Fist Drop, and Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: Known as "The King of Wrestling," Jerry Lawler made limited but impactful appearances in JCP during the 1980s, often as part of cross-promotional events. His charismatic mic work and in-ring psychology made him a standout, even during his brief stints. Lawler’s presence added prestige to any card he was on.

Jerry Oates
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the mid-1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with fundamental grappling techniques.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Arm Drag, and Suplex.
Brief description: Jerry Oates was a reliable and skilled mid-card competitor in JCP, often teaming with his brother Ted Oates. The Oates Brothers were known for their smooth teamwork and technical wrestling, making them a solid presence in the tag team division during their tenure.

Jerry Stubbs
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with heel tendencies.
Signature moves: Russian Leg Sweep, Suplex, and Figure Four Leglock.
Brief description: Jerry Stubbs, later known as Mr. Olympia, made sporadic appearances in JCP, showcasing his technical prowess and adaptability. While he achieved greater fame in other Southern promotions, Stubbs was a reliable performer who contributed to JCP’s mid-card and tag team scenes during his tenure.

Jesse Barr
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Amateur-inspired technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Belly-to-Belly Suplex, Armbar, and Gutwrench Suplex.
Brief description: Jesse Barr brought his amateur wrestling background to JCP, delivering technically sound matches. His role in JCP was primarily to provide competitive bouts that helped elevate rising talent, while his solid fundamentals made him a dependable worker in the promotion.

Jim Brunzell
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Flying Crossbody, and Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: Before achieving greater fame as part of the Killer Bees, Jim Brunzell competed in JCP during the late 1970s and early 1980s. Known for his incredible dropkick and athletic ability, Brunzell added energy and skill to JCP cards, often as a babyface who could excite the crowd.

Jim Cornette
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1985 to 1988.
Position on the card: Manager (primarily for the Midnight Express).
Wrestling style: N/A (Manager).
Signature moves: N/A (Manager; interference with a tennis racket).
Brief description: Jim Cornette was one of the most influential managers in JCP, managing the Midnight Express (Dennis Condrey, Bobby Eaton, and later Stan Lane). Known for his quick wit, sharp promos, and iconic tennis racket, Cornette generated immense heat and was integral to some of JCP’s most memorable tag team feuds, including battles against the Rock 'n' Roll Express.

Jim Garvin (Jimmy Garvin)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1985 to 1988.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a flamboyant heel persona.
Signature moves: Brainbuster, Sleeper Hold, and Crossbody.
Brief description: Jimmy Garvin, often accompanied by Precious, was a charismatic and flamboyant figure in JCP. He competed as both a singles wrestler and in tag teams, including memorable alliances with Michael Hayes and the Fabulous Freebirds. Known for his entertaining promos and solid in-ring ability, Garvin was a key figure in JCP storylines during his tenure.

Jim Nelson
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with basic technical skills.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Suplex, and Shoulder Block.
Brief description: Jim Nelson, later known as Boris Zhukov, competed in JCP as part of the early 1980s tag team scene. He was notably aligned with Sgt. Slaughter during his time in the promotion, often portraying a rough and tough heel. Nelson’s ability to play a supporting role in tag team rivalries made him a solid addition to JCP’s roster during his tenure.

Jimmy Garvin
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1985 to 1988.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a flamboyant heel persona.
Signature moves: Brainbuster, Sleeper Hold, and Crossbody.
Brief description: Jimmy Garvin, often accompanied by Precious, was a standout personality in JCP, known for his charisma and in-ring skills. He played a prominent role in singles competition and later joined the Fabulous Freebirds, solidifying his legacy as part of one of wrestling's most iconic groups.

Jimmy Snuka
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: High-flying and brawling.
Signature moves: Superfly Splash, Headbutt, and Chop.
Brief description: Before becoming a household name, Jimmy "Superfly" Snuka made sporadic appearances in JCP, where he dazzled audiences with his high-flying athleticism. His matches often featured intense brawls and dramatic finishes, helping to elevate the excitement of JCP’s cards during his tenure.

Jimmy Valiant
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1980 to 1988.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Brawling and crowd-pleasing antics.
Signature moves: Elbow Drop, Sleeper Hold, and Headlock.
Brief description: Known as "The Boogie Woogie Man," Jimmy Valiant was one of JCP’s most beloved babyfaces during the 1980s. His wild charisma and connection with the fans made him a constant presence in major storylines, particularly his feuds with Paul Jones and his Army. Valiant’s over-the-top personality and entertaining brawls were key components of JCP programming.

Jive Tones (Pez Whatley and Tiger Conway Jr.)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Dropkick, and Corner Splash.
Brief description: The Jive Tones, featuring Pez Whatley and Tiger Conway Jr., were a heel tag team that brought energy and entertainment to JCP’s mid-card division. Their flamboyant style and teamwork helped establish them as credible challengers in the tag team scene during their tenure.

J.J. Dillon
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1985 to 1988.
Position on the card: Manager (primarily for the Four Horsemen).
Wrestling style: N/A (Manager).
Signature moves: N/A (Manager; occasional interference).
Brief description: James J. Dillon was the mastermind behind the Four Horsemen, one of wrestling's most dominant factions. His articulate promos and strategic guidance elevated the group’s impact in JCP. Dillon’s ability to generate heat and support his wrestlers through interference made him one of the most effective managers of the era.

Joe Cox
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Brawling and heel tactics.
Signature moves: Knee Lift, Body Slam, and Elbow Smash.
Brief description: Joe Cox was a dependable heel competitor in JCP, often competing in tag team matches and mid-card bouts. Known for his rugged style, Cox brought toughness to the promotion’s roster and frequently clashed with popular babyfaces of the time.

Joe LeDuc
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with strongman elements.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Backbreaker, and Running Shoulder Block.
Brief description: Known for his brute strength and rugged persona, Joe LeDuc brought intensity to his JCP matches. His lumberjack-like character and powerful offense made him a credible threat to top stars. LeDuc’s sporadic appearances often featured hard-hitting feuds that resonated with fans.

Joe Lightfoot
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-energy technical wrestling with elements of Native American-inspired theatrics.
Signature moves: Flying Crossbody, Arm Drag, and Dropkick.
Brief description: Joe Lightfoot added energy and excitement to JCP cards with his quick-paced style and athleticism. His sporadic appearances helped round out the promotion’s mid-card, where he frequently delivered competitive matches.

Joe Scarpa (later known as Chief Jay Strongbow)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a Native American-inspired gimmick.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, War Dance Chop, and Elbow Smash.
Brief description: Joe Scarpa, known later as Chief Jay Strongbow, brought solid technical wrestling and crowd-pleasing antics to his appearances in JCP. His use of the "War Dance" comeback spot and his relatable character made him a favorite in the territories, including his runs in JCP.

Joe Savoldi
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1940s and 1950s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Grappling and technical wrestling with high-energy sequences.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Arm Drag, and Flying Crossbody.
Brief description: A versatile competitor, Joe Savoldi made periodic appearances in JCP, showcasing his agility and grappling skills. Though not a major star in the promotion, his contributions as a capable mid-carder added value to the roster during his tenure.

Joe Turco
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent and occasional Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Brawling with heel tendencies.
Signature moves: Eye Rake, Body Slam, and Elbow Smash.
Brief description: Joe Turco was a journeyman wrestler who competed in JCP as a reliable heel enhancement talent. Known for his rugged style and willingness to make other wrestlers look strong, Turco’s role was to enhance the credibility of babyface competitors.

Joel Deaton
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the mid-to-late 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent and occasional Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based wrestling with some technical fundamentals.
Signature moves: Suplex, Powerslam, and Clothesline.
Brief description: Joel Deaton worked primarily as enhancement talent in JCP, contributing to the success of more prominent stars. He occasionally teamed with other wrestlers, showing strong teamwork in tag team matches. While not a top-tier performer, Deaton was a dependable part of the promotion’s roster.

John Heath
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Technical grappling with a focus on mat-based holds.
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Headlock, and Body Slam.
Brief description: John Heath was a reliable mid-card wrestler during his appearances in JCP. Known for his solid technical abilities, Heath was often featured in competitive matches and occasionally participated in tag team bouts. His consistent work rate made him a valued addition to the promotion during his era.

John Studd (Big John Studd)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Main Event.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with an imposing presence.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Backbreaker, and Running Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Big John Studd brought his immense size and strength to JCP, often competing as a dominant heel against top babyfaces. His feuds were notable for showcasing his brute force and ability to generate significant heat. While Studd gained most of his fame elsewhere, his JCP appearances added a larger-than-life presence to the promotion's roster.

John Tatum (Hollywood John Tatum)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-to-late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling with a heel persona.
Signature moves: Suplex, Elbow Drop, and Knee Lift.
Brief description: Hollywood John Tatum was a charismatic heel known for his flamboyant personality and dirty tactics. In JCP, he primarily appeared in tag team matches, where his teamwork and antics drew heat from fans. Tatum’s colorful character made him a solid addition to the mid-card during his tenure.

John Tolos (The Golden Greek)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappling with heel tendencies.
Signature moves: Piledriver, Arm Drag, and Backbreaker.
Brief description: John Tolos, known as "The Golden Greek," was a technically gifted wrestler who brought intensity to his JCP appearances. His ability to rile up crowds with his heel tactics and polished in-ring skills made him a standout performer during his sporadic appearances in the promotion.

Johnny Ace
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent.
Wrestling style: Technical and athletic.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Arm Drag, and Suplex.
Brief description: Before achieving greater fame in Japan and later in WWE, Johnny Ace worked as enhancement talent in JCP. His athletic style and willingness to put over other wrestlers contributed to his early career development within the promotion.

Johnny Long
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Technical grappling with a mix of striking.
Signature moves: Armbar, Hip Toss, and Backbreaker.
Brief description: Johnny Long was a steady mid-card competitor in JCP who often worked in both singles and tag team matches. Known for his polished technical skills, Long was a reliable wrestler who contributed to the overall strength of the promotion’s roster during his tenure.

Johnny Valentine
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Main Event.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting brawling with strong psychology.
Signature moves: Atomic Drop, Elbow Smash, and Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: Johnny Valentine was one of the most respected and feared competitors of his era. Known for his intense and realistic style, Valentine was a major attraction in JCP, headlining cards and engaging in brutal feuds with top stars. His ability to captivate audiences through storytelling in the ring solidified his legacy as a wrestling icon.

Johnny Walker (as Mr. Wrestling II)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s and 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Main Event.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on precision and crowd connection.
Signature moves: Million Dollar Knee Lift, Sleeper Hold, and Suplex.
Brief description: Competing under the mask as Mr. Wrestling II, Johnny Walker was a fan favorite in JCP. His polished technical ability and charisma made him a standout performer during his sporadic appearances, and he was often involved in key feuds and storylines during his runs with the promotion.

Johnny Weaver
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from the 1950s through the 1980s.
Position on the card: Main Event and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Traditional grappling with storytelling emphasis.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Dropkick, and Arm Drag.
Brief description: A staple of JCP for decades, Johnny Weaver was one of the promotion’s most beloved babyfaces. Known for his technical skill and relatable persona, Weaver excelled in both singles and tag team competition. His long-running partnership with George Becker was one of the most successful in JCP history. Weaver later transitioned into commentary, remaining a key figure in the promotion.

Jonathan Boyd
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Brawling and power-based wrestling.
Signature moves: Headbutt, Double Axe Handle, and Suplex.
Brief description: As a member of the Sheepherders (later known as the Bushwhackers), Jonathan Boyd appeared in JCP as part of a violent and chaotic tag team. Known for his wild persona and brawling style, Boyd contributed to intense and memorable tag team feuds during his time in the promotion.

Jos LeDuc
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with a strongman persona.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Backbreaker, and Running Shoulder Block.
Brief description: Jos LeDuc, also known as "The Canadian Freight Train," was a hard-hitting wrestler whose powerful offense and rugged demeanor made him a standout in JCP. He was involved in memorable feuds and delivered intense performances during his tenure in the promotion.

Joyce Grable
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Women’s Division competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on counters and mat-based skills.
Signature moves: Snapmare, Flying Headscissors, and Body Slam.
Brief description: Joyce Grable was a key figure in women’s wrestling during her time in JCP, often competing in high-profile matches. Her technical skill and ability to connect with the audience made her one of the most respected competitors in the women’s division, contributing to its growth and visibility in the promotion.


Judy Grable
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Women’s Division competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical grappling with a focus on agility and counters.
Signature moves: Flying Headscissors, Monkey Flip, and Snapmare.
Brief description: Known as “The Barefoot Contessa,” Judy Grable was one of the top women’s wrestlers of her era. Her athleticism and innovative style made her a standout performer during her sporadic JCP appearances, where she competed against the likes of Fabulous Moolah.

Judy Martin
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Women’s Division competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based wrestling with heel tactics.
Signature moves: Power Slam, Backbreaker, and Elbow Drop.
Brief description: A key figure in women’s wrestling during the 1970s and 1980s, Judy Martin often played the role of a dominant heel in JCP. Her matches showcased her strength and ability to draw heat from the crowd, contributing to the promotion's women’s division.

June Byers
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s.
Position on the card: Women’s Division competitor.
Wrestling style: Traditional technical wrestling with a focus on holds and submissions.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Boston Crab, and Armbar.
Brief description: As one of the most celebrated women’s wrestlers of her time, June Byers brought credibility and skill to JCP during her sporadic appearances. Byers’ matches were technical showcases, emphasizing her role as a trailblazer in women’s wrestling.

Junkyard Dog (JYD)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-to-late 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with a connection to the crowd.
Signature moves: Thump (Powerslam), Headbutt, and Shoulder Block.
Brief description: Junkyard Dog was one of the most charismatic and beloved wrestlers of his era. While his greatest fame came in Mid-South Wrestling, his JCP appearances saw him feud with top stars, where his electric personality and crowd interaction left a lasting impact.

Kabuki (The Great Kabuki)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Special Attraction.
Wrestling style: Martial arts-influenced brawling with a unique mystique.
Signature moves: Asian Mist, Thrust Kick, and Nerve Hold.
Brief description: Managed by Gary Hart, The Great Kabuki was a mysterious and dangerous figure in JCP. Known for his use of the Asian Mist and martial arts techniques, Kabuki was a significant heel presence, engaging in memorable feuds with stars like Jimmy Valiant.

Kamala
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Special Attraction and Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with a wild, unpredictable persona.
Signature moves: Splash, Chop, and Headbutt.
Brief description: Kamala, "The Ugandan Giant," was a fearsome and imposing figure during his appearances in JCP. His gimmick and physical dominance made him a compelling opponent for top babyfaces, often booked as a monstrous heel in special attraction matches.

Kansas Jayhawks (Dutch Mantell and Bobby Jaggers)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in 1986.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Brawling with Southern-style tag team fundamentals.
Signature moves: Double Elbow Smash, Backdrop Suplex, and Rope-assisted Clothesline.
Brief description: The Kansas Jayhawks brought a rugged and brawling style to JCP’s tag team division. They were prominently featured during their time in the promotion, including feuds with The Midnight Express and other heel teams. Their no-nonsense personas and gritty in-ring work made them fan favorites during their JCP run.

Kareem Muhammad
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling.
Signature moves: Splash, Bearhug, and Big Boot.
Brief description: Kareem Muhammad, part of The Zambuie Express with Elijah Akeem, was a dominant and imposing figure in JCP’s tag team division. Known for their destructive style and heel antics, Muhammad’s team added depth to the tag team roster, often feuding with top babyface teams.

Karl Gotch
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: Submission grappling with technical precision.
Signature moves: German Suplex, Cross Armbreaker, and Double Leg Takedown.
Brief description: Known as the "God of Wrestling," Karl Gotch brought his legendary grappling expertise to JCP during sporadic appearances. His matches were showcases of technical mastery, influencing future generations of wrestlers. While his time in JCP was limited, his legacy as a pioneer of technical wrestling left a mark.

Karl Von Brauner
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with heel tactics.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Backbreaker, and Double Axe Handle.
Brief description: Karl Von Brauner, often paired with tag partners like Kurt Von Brauner, was a classic heel during his JCP appearances. Known for his "evil German" persona, Von Brauner generated significant heat and was a dependable part of the tag team division during his time in the promotion.

Karl Von Steiger
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Rugged grappling with a focus on heel antics.
Signature moves: Armbar, Elbow Smash, and Knee Lift.
Brief description: As part of the infamous "evil German" archetype, Karl Von Steiger worked primarily in tag teams during his appearances in JCP. His ability to play a menacing heel complemented his solid grappling skills, making him a reliable mid-card performer.

Kat LeRoux
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Women’s Division competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling with some technical elements.
Signature moves: Scoop Slam, Hair-pull Snapmare, and Leg Drop.
Brief description: Kat LeRoux was an energetic heel wrestler in JCP’s women’s division. Often paired with Linda Dallas as part of a villainous duo, LeRoux’s rebellious attitude and rough style made her a notable figure in the division’s tag team and singles matches.

Kay Noble
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Women’s Division competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with quick counters and submissions.
Signature moves: Snapmare, Dropkick, and Armbar.
Brief description: Kay Noble was a highly respected and talented competitor who helped elevate women’s wrestling during her time in JCP. Known for her smooth technical skills and ability to work with various opponents, Noble was a trailblazer in a field that often lacked visibility.

Keith Larson (real name: Rocky Kernodle)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the early to mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Technical and fundamental grappling.
Signature moves: Suplex, Dropkick, and Arm Drag.
Brief description: Keith Larson, the real-life brother of Don Kernodle, was a solid mid-card performer in JCP. Often seen in tag team action, he occasionally teamed with his brother and other babyfaces to feud with prominent heel teams. Larson's technical style and likable persona made him a dependable presence during his tenure.

Kelly Kiniski
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappling with power-based maneuvers.
Signature moves: Side Suplex, Shoulder Block, and Belly-to-Back Suplex.
Brief description: As the son of former NWA World Heavyweight Champion Gene Kiniski, Kelly Kiniski brought a strong wrestling pedigree to JCP. Although his career never reached the heights of his father’s, Kiniski showed promise during his appearances in the promotion, contributing to the mid-card scene.

Ken Dillinger
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent.
Wrestling style: Brawling and basic technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Body Slam, Elbow Drop, and Headlock.
Brief description: Ken Dillinger frequently worked as enhancement talent in JCP, helping to showcase the promotion’s rising stars and established talent. While rarely victorious, Dillinger’s professionalism and ability to enhance matches made him a valuable part of the roster.

Ken Patera
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-to-late 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: Power-based wrestling with an amateur background.
Signature moves: Full Nelson, Press Slam, and Bearhug.
Brief description: Ken Patera, an Olympian turned pro wrestler, made sporadic appearances in JCP, where his strength and athleticism stood out. His matches often emphasized his raw power, making him a formidable opponent for top babyfaces during his brief stints in the promotion.

Ken Timbs
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with heel tendencies.
Signature moves: Suplex, Elbow Smash, and Snapmare.
Brief description: Ken Timbs worked in JCP as a solid mid-card performer, often engaging in tag team matches. Known for his clean technical style and ability to work effectively as a heel, Timbs contributed to the depth of JCP’s roster during his tenure.

Kendall Windham
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-to-late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with some high-impact maneuvers.
Signature moves: Bulldog, Dropkick, and Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: As the younger brother of Barry Windham, Kendall Windham brought a similar style to JCP, showcasing technical prowess and athletic ability. While not as prominently featured as his brother, Kendall made his mark in the mid-card with solid performances and occasional tag team matches.

Kendo Nagasaki
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Martial arts-inspired grappling with mystique.
Signature moves: Thrust Kick, Nerve Hold, and Asian Mist.
Brief description: Kendo Nagasaki, known for his enigmatic persona and martial arts style, brought a unique flair to JCP during his appearances. His combination of mystique and solid in-ring work made him a compelling figure, particularly in feuds with babyfaces.

Kevin Sullivan
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Main Event.
Wrestling style: Brawling with psychological elements.
Signature moves: Double Stomp, Tree of Woe, and Boston Crab.
Brief description: Kevin Sullivan, often portrayed as a sadistic heel with occult overtones, brought intensity and unpredictability to his JCP appearances. His feuds with top babyfaces often incorporated violent matches and dark storylines, adding depth to the promotion's product.

Kentuckians (Grizzly Smith and Tiny Anderson)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with a rugged Southern persona.
Signature moves: Double Shoulder Block, Bearhug, and Big Boot.
Brief description: The Kentuckians were a towering and powerful tag team who competed in JCP during the 1960s. Their no-nonsense style and massive size made them formidable opponents in the tag team division, earning them popularity among Southern fans.
Killer Karl Kox
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: Rugged brawling with heel tendencies.
Signature moves: Brainbuster, Forearm Smash, and Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Killer Karl Kox was a tough, no-nonsense competitor who made sporadic appearances in JCP. Known for his gritty style and ability to generate heat, Kox feuded with many of the promotion’s top babyfaces, leaving a lasting impression during his time in the territory.

Killer Khan
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Brawling with martial arts influences.
Signature moves: Knee Drop from the Top Rope, Asian Mist, and Throat Thrust.
Brief description: Killer Khan brought a menacing presence to JCP during his sporadic appearances. Known for his unique look and devastating offense, Khan played a monstrous heel character that was often booked against popular babyfaces in grudge matches.

King Curtis Iaukea
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Brawling with theatrical elements.
Signature moves: Headbutt, Nerve Hold, and Big Boot.
Brief description: King Curtis Iaukea was an eccentric and intimidating competitor whose JCP appearances showcased his charismatic heel persona. Often paired with other heels in tag team matches, Iaukea’s hard-hitting style and wild personality made him a notable figure in his era.

King Kong Bundy
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: Power-based wrestling with a dominant heel character.
Signature moves: Avalanche Splash, Powerslam, and Bearhug.
Brief description: Before achieving greater fame in the WWF, King Kong Bundy competed in JCP as a massive and intimidating heel. His sheer size and strength made him a credible threat to top babyfaces, and his matches often highlighted his dominance in the ring.

King Kong Mosca
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with heel tactics.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Bearhug, and Big Splash.
Brief description: Angelo "King Kong" Mosca was a powerful heel in JCP, known for his brute strength and ability to generate heat. A former CFL football star, Mosca used his athleticism and hard-hitting style to feud with JCP’s top stars, including Dusty Rhodes and Ric Flair, becoming a memorable figure in the promotion.

Kinji Shibuya
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Brawling with a heel persona.
Signature moves: Throat Chop, Elbow Smash, and Nerve Hold.
Brief description: Kinji Shibuya was a classic foreign heel who drew heat with his villainous tactics and intimidating demeanor. During his JCP appearances, Shibuya often competed in tag team matches, where his striking-based offense and ability to rile up crowds made him a reliable heel competitor.

Klondike Bill
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from the 1960s through the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with a rugged persona.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Body Slam, and Running Elbow Smash.
Brief description: Klondike Bill was a fan favorite in JCP, known for his rugged style and larger-than-life personality. Often involved in tag team action, he was a reliable mid-card performer. In his later years, Bill became a respected figure backstage, contributing to the promotion’s production and logistics.

Koko Ware (Koko B. Ware)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and athletic.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Flying Headbutt, and Sunset Flip.
Brief description: Before gaining fame in the WWF, Koko Ware appeared in JCP as an athletic and entertaining mid-card wrestler. Known for his agility and charisma, Koko was a crowd favorite who brought excitement to his matches, particularly in tag team action.

Krusher Kruschev
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1984 to 1987.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based wrestling with a heel persona.
Signature moves: Russian Sickle, Powerslam, and Bearhug.
Brief description: Krusher Kruschev, portrayed by Barry Darsow, was a key member of Ivan and Nikita Koloff’s team during his time in JCP. As part of their Soviet-themed faction, Kruschev generated significant heat and was a dominant figure in both singles and tag team action, including holding the NWA World Tag Team Championship.

Kurt Von Brauner
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Brawling with heel tactics.
Signature moves: Backbreaker, Bearhug, and Knee Lift.
Brief description: Kurt Von Brauner, often teamed with Karl Von Brauner, brought his "evil German" persona to JCP, where he excelled as a heel in the tag team division. Known for his aggression and teamwork, Von Brauner was a dependable performer during his sporadic appearances in the promotion.

Kurt Von Hess
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Rugged grappling with a focus on heel tactics.
Signature moves: Elbow Smash, Sleeper Hold, and Suplex.
Brief description: Kurt Von Hess was a notable heel during his JCP appearances, often competing in tag team action. His imposing persona and dirty tactics made him a reliable adversary for babyface teams, helping to bolster the promotion’s mid-card during his time.

Lanny Poffo
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Moonsault, Flying Dropkick, and Rolling Cradle.
Brief description: Before gaining fame in other promotions as "Leaping" Lanny Poffo, he made sporadic appearances in JCP. Poffo's agility and innovative moves showcased his talent and helped him stand out in the mid-card, appealing to fans of high-energy matches.

Larry Hamilton
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent.
Wrestling style: Technical and fundamental grappling.
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Body Slam, and Suplex.
Brief description: Larry Hamilton primarily served as enhancement talent during his time in JCP, competing against rising stars and more established performers. His technical skills and professionalism made him a reliable figure in the promotion's undercard.

Larry Lane
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with some power-based maneuvers.
Signature moves: Suplex, Dropkick, and Arm Drag.
Brief description: Larry Lane competed in JCP as a solid mid-carder, frequently participating in tag team and singles matches. His clean technical style and versatility made him a dependable addition to the roster during his appearances.

Larry Sharpe
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent.
Wrestling style: Brawling with basic technical skills.
Signature moves: Elbow Smash, Body Slam, and Knee Lift.
Brief description: Best known later for his role as a trainer, Larry Sharpe competed in JCP as enhancement talent, helping elevate rising stars. His professionalism and ability to work effectively with opponents contributed to the quality of matches in which he participated.

Larry Zbyszko
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: Technical and psychological wrestling.
Signature moves: Abdominal Stretch, Sleeper Hold, and Piledriver.
Brief description: Known as "The Living Legend," Larry Zbyszko brought his masterful in-ring psychology to JCP during sporadic appearances. His feuds with top talent and ability to generate heat made him a compelling addition to the roster during his runs with the promotion.

Lars Anderson
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based grappling with technical fundamentals.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Suplex, and Shoulder Block.
Brief description: As a member of the Anderson wrestling family, Lars Anderson competed in JCP as a reliable mid-to-upper card performer. His rugged style and association with Gene and Ole Anderson helped establish him as a credible competitor in the tag team and singles divisions.

Lazer Tron
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in 1986 and 1987.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre-inspired grappling.
Signature moves: Flying Crossbody, Dropkick, and Springboard Arm Drag.
Brief description: Portrayed by Hector Guerrero, Lazer Tron was a colorful and unique character in JCP, appealing to younger audiences. His high-energy in-ring style and dynamic moves made him an entertaining figure in the mid-card, often competing in tag team and singles action.

Lee Ramsey
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent.
Wrestling style: Traditional grappling with basic technical skills.
Signature moves: Armbar, Body Slam, and Headlock.
Brief description: Lee Ramsey worked as enhancement talent in JCP, competing against both rising stars and established wrestlers. His consistent performances and ability to enhance the credibility of his opponents made him a reliable part of the roster during his tenure.

Leilani Kai
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and 1980s.
Position on the card: Women’s Division competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based grappling with technical fundamentals.
Signature moves: Scoop Slam, Suplex, and Elbow Drop.
Brief description: A standout in women’s wrestling, Leilani Kai brought her powerful style and heel persona to JCP during her sporadic appearances. Known for her ability to work with a variety of opponents, Kai added depth to the women’s division and participated in notable matches throughout her career.

Len Denton (The Grappler)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with heel tactics.
Signature moves: DDT, Sleeper Hold, and Backbreaker.
Brief description: Len Denton, best known as The Grappler, was a skilled heel who made sporadic appearances in JCP. His masked persona and technical prowess allowed him to compete effectively in both singles and tag team competition, making him a memorable figure in the promotion during his appearances.

Leo Burke
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on submissions and counters.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Suplex, and Armbar.
Brief description: A respected veteran of the territories, Leo Burke brought his extensive technical skill and in-ring psychology to JCP during his appearances. Known for his ability to work with a variety of opponents, Burke contributed as a solid mid-card competitor in the promotion.

Leroy Brown (Elijah Akeem)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling.
Signature moves: Big Splash, Bearhug, and Shoulder Block.
Brief description: Leroy Brown, later known as Elijah Akeem, was a powerful and charismatic performer in JCP. Competing both as a singles wrestler and in tag teams, his intense style and larger-than-life personality made him a standout, particularly in the tag team division.

Les Thatcher
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Technical and fundamental grappling.
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Dropkick, and Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: Les Thatcher was a well-rounded competitor during his JCP appearances, showcasing smooth technical skills and a clean wrestling style. Thatcher later became a respected trainer and commentator, leaving a lasting impact on professional wrestling.

Les Thornton
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on submissions and mat work.
Signature moves: Butterfly Suplex, Armbar, and Boston Crab.
Brief description: Les Thornton, a former NWA World Junior Heavyweight Champion, brought his technical expertise to JCP. Known for his mat-based style and endurance, Thornton delivered high-quality matches, particularly in the junior heavyweight division, during his time in the promotion.

Lex Luger
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1987 to 1988.
Position on the card: Main Event.
Wrestling style: Power-based wrestling with high-impact maneuvers.
Signature moves: Torture Rack, Powerslam, and Clothesline.
Brief description: Lex Luger quickly rose to prominence in JCP, transitioning from The Four Horsemen to becoming one of the top babyfaces of the late 1980s. Known as "The Total Package," Luger’s impressive physique and explosive in-ring style made him a key figure in major storylines, including feuds with Ric Flair and Barry Windham.

Lightning Express (Brad Armstrong and Tim Horner)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1986 to 1988.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Double Dropkick, Arm Drag, and Flying Crossbody.
Brief description: The Lightning Express was a popular babyface tag team in JCP, known for their clean-cut image and fast-paced matches. Brad Armstrong and Tim Horner's teamwork and athleticism endeared them to fans, and they were often featured in competitive matches against top heel teams.

Linda Dallas
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Women’s Division competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling with heel tactics.
Signature moves: Snapmare, Elbow Drop, and Hair-pull Slam.
Brief description: Linda Dallas was a fiery and aggressive heel in the women’s division during her appearances in JCP. Often teaming with Kat LeRoux, Dallas’s rebellious and hard-hitting style made her a standout villain in tag team and singles matches, adding depth to the division.

Little Beaver
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Special Attraction (Midget Division).
Wrestling style: High-energy grappling with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Headscissors Takedown, and Monkey Flip.
Brief description: Little Beaver was a beloved figure in midget wrestling, known for his charisma and entertaining performances. During his appearances in JCP, he was featured in special attraction matches that delighted fans of all ages, showcasing his agility and comedic timing.

Little Tokyo
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Special Attraction (Midget Division).
Wrestling style: Technical grappling with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Dropkick, and Rolling Cradle.
Brief description: Little Tokyo was a popular performer in midget wrestling, often competing in special attraction matches. Known for his charisma and solid technical abilities, he brought humor and excitement to his appearances in JCP, appealing to fans of all ages.

Lord Alfred Hayes
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Manager.
Wrestling style: Technical grappling with a gentlemanly heel persona.
Signature moves: Armbar, Suplex, and European Uppercut.
Brief description: Before becoming a beloved commentator, Lord Alfred Hayes worked as both a wrestler and manager. In JCP, he portrayed a sophisticated heel, using his polished style and sharp wit to antagonize fans and opponents alike. His appearances added a touch of British flair to the promotion’s roster.

Lord Littlebrook
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Special Attraction (Midget Division).
Wrestling style: Technical and aerial grappling with comedic timing.
Signature moves: Flying Headscissors, Arm Drag, and Body Slam.
Brief description: Lord Littlebrook was one of the most accomplished and charismatic performers in midget wrestling. His technical skills and ability to entertain made him a standout in special attraction matches during his time in JCP. Often cast as a heel, Littlebrook brought both excitement and humor to his bouts.

Long Riders (Bill and Scott Irwin)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Brawling with Southern-style tag team tactics.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Backbreaker, and Big Boot.
Brief description: The Long Riders, consisting of Bill and Scott Irwin, were a rugged and no-nonsense tag team who brought a hard-hitting style to JCP. Known for their biker personas and aggressive matches, they added depth to the tag team division during their appearances.

Lorenzo Parente
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on submissions.
Signature moves: Armbar, Boston Crab, and Hip Toss.
Brief description: Lorenzo Parente was a skilled technical wrestler whose JCP appearances highlighted his grappling ability. Known for his adaptability and clean wrestling style, Parente was a reliable mid-carder and occasional tag team competitor in the promotion.

Lou Newman
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1940s and 1950s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling mix with a heel persona.
Signature moves: Armbar, Elbow Smash, and Clawhold.
Brief description: Lou Newman was a consistent presence in JCP’s early years, often competing in tag team matches alongside Hans Schnabel as part of a heel duo. Newman’s ability to generate heat and work well as a team player made him a valuable part of the tag team division.

Lou Thesz
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and early 1960s.
Position on the card: Main Event.
Wrestling style: Technical and mat-based grappling with an emphasis on submissions.
Signature moves: Thesz Press, STF, and Double Wristlock.
Brief description: Widely regarded as one of the greatest professional wrestlers of all time, Lou Thesz appeared in JCP during his tenure as NWA World Heavyweight Champion. Known for his unmatched technical skill and legitimate toughness, Thesz’s appearances in JCP added prestige to the promotion’s cards and showcased the pinnacle of the sport during his era.

Lou Plummer
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Traditional grappling with a mix of power moves.
Signature moves: Body Slam, Bearhug, and Arm Drag.
Brief description: Lou Plummer was a dependable performer who frequently competed in JCP’s mid-card and tag team matches. Known for his consistency and ability to work with various opponents, Plummer was a valuable contributor to the promotion’s roster during his time.

Luke Graham
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: Brawling with heel tendencies.
Signature moves: Thumb to the Throat, Piledriver, and Eye Rake.
Brief description: Known as "Crazy" Luke Graham, he was a key figure in JCP as part of his sporadic appearances. His wild, unpredictable in-ring style and ability to generate heat made him a memorable heel in both singles and tag team matches. Graham often feuded with top babyfaces, leaving a lasting impact on the promotion.

Luke Williams (of The Sheepherders)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-to-late 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Hardcore brawling with chaotic teamwork.
Signature moves: Double Team Clothesline, Headbutt, and Stomps in the Corner.
Brief description: Luke Williams, as one-half of The Sheepherders (later known as The Bushwhackers), was a key player in JCP’s tag team scene during his tenure. The team’s violent, brawling style and ability to draw heat made them one of the most hated duos, engaging in brutal feuds with teams like The Rock 'n' Roll Express.

Luther Lindsay
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: Submission grappling with technical expertise.
Signature moves: Surfboard, Belly-to-Belly Suplex, and Armbar.
Brief description: A trailblazer in professional wrestling, Luther Lindsay was one of the first African American wrestlers to achieve national success. Known for his legitimate amateur wrestling background and submission skills, Lindsay was a fan favorite in JCP. His clean technical style and crowd-pleasing performances left a lasting legacy in the promotion.

Mae Young
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Women’s Division competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based grappling with technical fundamentals.
Signature moves: Snapmare, Boston Crab, and Body Slam.
Brief description: A trailblazer in women’s wrestling, Mae Young competed in JCP during her storied career. Known for her toughness and charisma, she was a major draw in the women’s division, helping to establish its prominence during her era.

Magic Dragon
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and martial arts-inspired grappling.
Signature moves: Flying Crossbody, Thrust Kick, and Top Rope Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Magic Dragon brought a unique, high-energy style to JCP. His martial arts-inspired persona and dynamic offense made him an exciting mid-card competitor during his time in the promotion.

Magnum T.A.
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1984 to 1986.
Position on the card: Main Event.
Wrestling style: Power-based grappling with technical finesse.
Signature moves: Belly-to-Belly Suplex, Dropkick, and Elbow Smash.
Brief description: Magnum T.A. was one of JCP’s brightest stars, known for his natural charisma and in-ring prowess. His feuds with Tully Blanchard, particularly their iconic “I Quit” match, were highlights of the promotion. Magnum’s career was tragically cut short due to a car accident, but his impact on JCP remains legendary.

Man Mountain Mike
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Special Attraction and Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based wrestling with a focus on size.
Signature moves: Splash, Bearhug, and Shoulder Block.
Brief description: Known for his massive size, Man Mountain Mike was a spectacle wrestler who appeared in JCP as a special attraction. His matches emphasized his size and power, making him a unique draw during his time in the promotion.

Manny Fernandez
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1984 to 1987.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Brawling with technical elements.
Signature moves: Flying Burrito (Flying Forearm Smash), Suplex, and Diving Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Manny Fernandez, "The Raging Bull," was a tough and charismatic competitor in JCP. He held the NWA World Tag Team Championship alongside Rick Rude and was known for his intense feuds with top stars like Dusty Rhodes and The Rock 'n' Roll Express. His blend of power, grit, and athleticism made him a fan favorite and a key player in the promotion.

Manuel Soto
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Flying Crossbody, and Dropkick.
Brief description: Manuel Soto brought his lucha libre style to JCP, often delivering exciting mid-card matches. Known for his quickness and technical skill, Soto helped diversify JCP’s roster and entertained fans with his high-energy performances.

Mario Milano
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Traditional grappling with a focus on submissions.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Backbreaker, and Boston Crab.
Brief description: Mario Milano was a solid performer who brought international flair to JCP. Known for his strong technical base and imposing presence, he was featured in competitive matches against a variety of opponents during his tenure in the promotion.

Mark Fleming
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on mat grappling.
Signature moves: Armbar, Suplex, and Headlock Takedown.
Brief description: Mark Fleming was a skilled enhancement talent in JCP, often competing against rising stars and established talent. Known for his legitimate wrestling background, Fleming brought a sense of realism to his matches, making him a valuable asset in showcasing other performers.

Mark Lewin
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling with psychological elements.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Elbow Smash, and Boston Crab.
Brief description: Mark Lewin was a versatile competitor whose sporadic appearances in JCP showcased his range as both a babyface and heel. Known for his ability to connect with the crowd and his storytelling skills, Lewin was a respected figure during his era in JCP.

Mark Youngblood
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1983 to 1985.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: High-energy grappling with a focus on aerial maneuvers.
Signature moves: Flying Tomahawk Chop, Dropkick, and Crossbody.
Brief description: Mark Youngblood, the younger brother of Jay Youngblood, carried on the family tradition of athletic and exciting performances in JCP. As a tag team specialist, he often competed alongside his brother, adding excitement to the promotion’s tag team division. Youngblood was known for his speed, charisma, and ability to deliver thrilling matches.

Masa Fuchi (Masanobu Fuchi)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappling with a Japanese strong style influence.
Signature moves: Backdrop Suplex, Cross Armbar, and Knee Drop.
Brief description: Masa Fuchi, a respected Japanese wrestler, appeared in JCP as part of international talent exchanges. Known for his technical expertise and stiff striking, Fuchi added variety and a strong international presence to the promotion’s roster during his brief tenure.

Masked Marvel
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1940s and 1950s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Special Attraction.
Wrestling style: Brawling and mysterious heel tactics.
Signature moves: Clawhold, Headlock, and Elbow Smash.
Brief description: The Masked Marvel was a classic masked wrestler, used as a special attraction during JCP’s early years. His mysterious identity and heel persona made him an intriguing addition to the cards, often competing in mid-card matches that highlighted his mystique.

Masked Superstar
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from the mid-to-late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Main Event.
Wrestling style: Power-based wrestling with technical elements.
Signature moves: Swinging Neckbreaker, Cobra Clutch, and Backbreaker.
Brief description: The Masked Superstar, portrayed by Bill Eadie, was a dominant and mysterious force in JCP. Known for his calculated in-ring style and cerebral approach to matches, the Masked Superstar feuded with top stars like Blackjack Mulligan and Ric Flair. His ability to blend power and precision made him one of the most formidable heels of his era.

Matt Borne
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Brawling with a mix of technical fundamentals.
Signature moves: Belly-to-Belly Suplex, Knee Drop, and Backbreaker.
Brief description: Matt Borne, who later gained fame as Doink the Clown, appeared in JCP during the early stages of his career. Known for his toughness and versatility, Borne delivered solid mid-card performances, helping to elevate the overall quality of JCP’s roster.

Matros Kirilenko
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Grappling with a focus on submission holds and power moves.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Armbar, and Russian Leg Sweep.
Brief description: Matros Kirilenko was a rugged competitor who embraced a Soviet-inspired gimmick. His appearances in JCP highlighted his powerful in-ring style, often pitting him against local favorites in matches that capitalized on Cold War-era tensions.

Maurice Vachon (Mad Dog Vachon)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Brawling with a chaotic and aggressive heel persona.
Signature moves: Piledriver, Sleeper Hold, and Stomps in the Corner.
Brief description: Mad Dog Vachon brought his wild, ferocious style to JCP during his sporadic appearances. Known for his unrelenting aggression and menacing demeanor, Vachon’s matches often showcased his ability to generate heat and captivate audiences with his unpredictability.

Michael Hayes
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1987 to 1988.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Charismatic brawling with a mix of technical fundamentals.
Signature moves: DDT, Bulldog, and Elbow Drop.
Brief description: As a member of the Fabulous Freebirds, Michael Hayes brought his flamboyant personality and dynamic in-ring style to JCP. Known for his exceptional mic skills and ability to connect with the crowd, Hayes played a key role in high-profile feuds and tag team matches, solidifying the Freebirds as one of the most iconic groups in wrestling history.

Midnight Express (Dennis Condrey & Bobby Eaton, later Bobby Eaton & Stan Lane)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1985 to 1988.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Tag Team Division (often Main Event in tag team matches).
Wrestling style: High-impact tag team wrestling with precision teamwork and heel tactics.
Signature moves: Rocket Launcher (Top Rope Splash), Double Flapjack, and Double Suplex.
Brief description: Managed by Jim Cornette, the Midnight Express was one of the most influential and successful tag teams in JCP history. Their feuds with the Rock 'n' Roll Express, The Road Warriors, and other top teams were highlights of the promotion. Known for their incredible chemistry and innovative offense, the Midnight Express set a new standard for tag team wrestling.

Midnight Rider (Dusty Rhodes under a mask)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in 1983 and 1984.
Position on the card: Main Event (Special Attraction).
Wrestling style: Brawling with power-based offense.
Signature moves: Bionic Elbow, Bulldog, and Belly-to-Belly Suplex.
Brief description: The Midnight Rider was a masked persona used by Dusty Rhodes during storylines where Rhodes was "suspended" or "banned" from competing. The character added a layer of intrigue and allowed Dusty to continue his presence in major storylines, maintaining his connection with the fans.

Mighty Igor
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based grappling with a strongman gimmick.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Backbreaker, and Shoulder Block.
Brief description: The Mighty Igor was a fan favorite, known for his lovable strongman persona and interactions with the crowd. His matches often showcased his power moves and comedic elements, making him a popular attraction during his sporadic JCP appearances.

Mike Davis
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling mix.
Signature moves: Suplex, Dropkick, and Elbow Smash.
Brief description: Mike Davis competed in JCP as both a singles wrestler and a tag team competitor. Known for his solid fundamentals, Davis added depth to the mid-card scene. He later gained greater fame as part of the Rock 'n' Roll RPMs, although his JCP tenure primarily served as a stepping stone in his career.

Mike DiBiase
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and early 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappling with a focus on submissions.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Armbar, and Boston Crab.
Brief description: Mike DiBiase, the adoptive father of Ted DiBiase, brought his technical expertise and old-school grappling style to JCP during his sporadic appearances. Known for his professionalism and endurance, DiBiase was a respected competitor who helped elevate the quality of matches on the cards.

Mike Gallagher
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Technical grappling with heel tactics.
Signature moves: Armbar, Suplex, and Knee Drop.
Brief description: Mike Gallagher, often teaming with Doc Gallagher as part of the Gallagher Brothers, was a consistent performer in tag team matches during his time in JCP. Known for his fundamental wrestling skills and heel antics, Gallagher was a reliable mid-card presence in the promotion.

Mike George
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based wrestling with technical fundamentals.
Signature moves: Powerslam, Suplex, and Shoulder Block.
Brief description: Mike George was a versatile competitor who brought a mix of power and technical ability to JCP. Known for his solid work in both singles and tag team matches, George contributed to the promotion’s depth and provided credible competition for rising stars.

Mike Graham
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and mat-based wrestling.
Signature moves: Figure Four Leglock, Suplex, and Dropkick.
Brief description: The son of legendary promoter Eddie Graham, Mike Graham showcased his technical prowess during his appearances in JCP. Known for his smooth in-ring style and grappling ability, Graham was respected for his professionalism and versatility in the ring.

Mike Jackson
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent.
Wrestling style: High-energy technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Arm Drag, and Flying Crossbody.
Brief description: Mike Jackson was a respected enhancement talent in JCP who showcased impressive technical skills and athleticism in his matches. Known for his ability to make opponents look strong, Jackson earned the respect of peers and fans alike during his tenure in the promotion.

Mike Paidousis
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Traditional grappling with a focus on submissions and mat wrestling.
Signature moves: Headlock, Armbar, and Backbreaker.
Brief description: Mike Paidousis, often referred to as “The Wrestling Greek,” brought a solid technical style to JCP. Known for his strength and mat-based approach, Paidousis contributed as a dependable mid-carder during his appearances in the promotion.

Mike Miller
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Brawling with technical fundamentals.
Signature moves: Suplex, Knee Lift, and Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Mike Miller was a tough, no-nonsense wrestler who competed in JCP during the early 1980s. While not a headliner, Miller delivered consistent performances in the mid-card, often working with both rising stars and established talent.

Mike Rotunda (also spelled Mike Rotundo)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1984 to 1985.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with power-based maneuvers.
Signature moves: Airplane Spin, Belly-to-Back Suplex, and Dropkick.
Brief description: Mike Rotunda was a key figure in JCP during his time as one-half of the U.S. Express alongside Barry Windham. Known for his amateur wrestling background and technical proficiency, Rotunda delivered strong performances in both tag team and singles matches before gaining greater fame in other promotions.

Mike Stallings
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent.
Wrestling style: Basic technical wrestling with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Body Slam, and Suplex.
Brief description: Mike Stallings frequently competed as enhancement talent in JCP, facing off against the promotion’s rising stars and established names. Known for his consistent work ethic, Stallings contributed to elevating other talent during his tenure.

Mildred Burke
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1940s and 1950s.
Position on the card: Women’s Division competitor (Main Event in women’s matches).
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with power-based offense.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Boston Crab, and Headlock.
Brief description: Mildred Burke, one of the most iconic figures in women’s wrestling, occasionally appeared in JCP during her legendary career. Known for her strength, technical ability, and pioneering role in elevating women’s wrestling, Burke was a trailblazer who inspired future generations of female wrestlers.

Minnesota Wrecking Crew (Gene and Ole Anderson)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from the 1960s to the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Main Event (Tag Team Division).
Wrestling style: Ground-and-pound technical wrestling with heel tactics.
Signature moves: Knee Crusher, Double Team Armbar, and Hammerlock Slam.
Brief description: Gene and Ole Anderson, collectively known as the Minnesota Wrecking Crew, were a dominant force in JCP’s tag team division. Their methodical, limb-targeting wrestling style and heel persona made them one of the most hated and respected teams in wrestling history. They held numerous tag team championships and were pivotal in establishing tag team wrestling as a cornerstone of JCP programming.

Miss Atlanta Lively (Ron Garvin in drag)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Special Attraction.
Wrestling style: Brawling with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Punch Flurry, Dropkick, and Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: Miss Atlanta Lively was a comedic persona used by Ron Garvin during a storyline feud against Jim Cornette and the Midnight Express. Lively’s appearances were part of a memorable angle that showcased Garvin’s versatility and added an entertaining twist to JCP’s storytelling.

Missouri Mauler (Larry Hamilton)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with heel tactics.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Backbreaker, and Elbow Smash.
Brief description: The Missouri Mauler was a rough-and-tumble heel who competed in both singles and tag team matches in JCP. Known for his physical style and ability to generate heat, he was a dependable competitor during his tenure in the promotion.

Misty Blue Simmes
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Women’s Division competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a babyface persona.
Signature moves: Snap Suplex, Crossbody, and Arm Drag.
Brief description: Misty Blue Simmes was a popular babyface in the women’s division during her time in JCP. Known for her clean wrestling style and fan-friendly image, she was a prominent figure in women’s matches, bringing excitement and energy to her performances.

Mitch Snow
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-energy brawling with technical elements.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Suplex, and Crossbody.
Brief description: Mitch Snow was an athletic and charismatic wrestler who competed in JCP’s mid-card. While not a major star, his in-ring style and connection with the audience made him a solid addition to the roster during his tenure.

MOD Squad (Mack and Jim Jeffers)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-to-late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based tag team wrestling with heel tactics.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Shoulder Block, and Double Clothesline.
Brief description: The MOD Squad, featuring Mack and Jim Jeffers as a law enforcement-themed tag team, brought a rugged brawling style to JCP. Their matching attire and teamwork made them a solid heel team that added depth to the tag team division.

Mongols (Geeto and Bolo Mongol)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with a foreign heel gimmick.
Signature moves: Double Team Backbreaker, Bearhug, and Chop.
Brief description: The Mongols were a formidable tag team who competed as foreign heels, utilizing brute strength and intimidation tactics. Managed by George "Crybaby" Cannon during parts of their career, they were involved in notable feuds with babyface teams, drawing significant heat from the crowd.

Moose Morowski
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Brawling with a focus on power moves.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Elbow Smash, and Running Splash.
Brief description: Moose Morowski was a tough and physical competitor known for his hard-hitting style. While his fame came primarily from other territories, his appearances in JCP were characterized by solid mid-card performances that contributed to the promotion's depth.

Mr. Fuji
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with martial arts influence.
Signature moves: Thrust Kick, Salt Toss (as a heel tactic), and Suplex.
Brief description: Before achieving widespread fame in the WWF, Mr. Fuji competed in JCP as part of his early career. Known for his technical skills and use of heel tactics, Fuji was an effective competitor in both singles and tag team matches during his time in the promotion.

Mr. Wrestling (Tim Woods)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Main Event and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a masked babyface persona.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Suplex, and Roll-Up Pin.
Brief description: Tim Woods, under the guise of Mr. Wrestling, was one of JCP’s most beloved babyfaces. Known for his clean technical skills and relatable persona, he was a cornerstone of the promotion during his tenure. His tag team with Johnny Weaver and feuds with top heels made him a significant figure in JCP history.

Mr. Wrestling II (Johnny Walker)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s and 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a babyface persona.
Signature moves: Million Dollar Knee Lift, Sleeper Hold, and Belly-to-Belly Suplex.
Brief description: Mr. Wrestling II, portrayed by Johnny Walker, carried on the legacy of the Mr. Wrestling name with immense popularity. His masked persona and effective use of the Knee Lift as a finisher made him a top star in various promotions, including memorable appearances in JCP. Walker’s matches often highlighted his technical prowess and ability to rally the crowd.

Mr. Saito (Masa Saito)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Strong style with a focus on grappling and strikes.
Signature moves: Saito Suplex, Nerve Hold, and Throat Chop.
Brief description: Masa Saito, competing as Mr. Saito, brought his Japanese strong style to JCP. Known for his precision and intensity, he was often paired in tag teams or positioned as a menacing heel in singles competition. His legitimate wrestling background added credibility to his in-ring persona.

Mulkey Brothers (Bill and Randy Mulkey)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent (Tag Team Division).
Wrestling style: Basic grappling with comedic and underdog elements.
Signature moves: Double Elbow Smash, Arm Drag, and Dropkick.
Brief description: The Mulkey Brothers became cult favorites in JCP despite their role as perennial enhancement talent. Known for their frequent losses, they gained a dedicated fan following, particularly during the "MulkeyMania" phenomenon. Their matches often added entertainment and showcased their opponents’ skills.

Nelson Royal
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1970s and 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Junior Heavyweight Division.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with an emphasis on mat work.
Signature moves: Abdominal Stretch, Armbar, and Suplex.
Brief description: Nelson Royal was a highly skilled wrestler and former NWA World Junior Heavyweight Champion. His technical expertise and professionalism made him a standout in the junior heavyweight division. Royal also contributed as a promoter and trainer, further enhancing his legacy in the business.

New Breed (Chris Champion and Sean Royal)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in 1986 and 1987.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Double Dropkick, Moonsault, and Flying Crossbody.
Brief description: The New Breed brought a futuristic gimmick and dynamic style to JCP, standing out in the tag team division. Known for their athleticism and charisma, they feuded with teams like The Rock 'n' Roll Express and added a fresh, exciting element to the promotion’s roster.

Nell Stewart
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s.
Position on the card: Women’s Division competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with heel tactics.
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Sleeper Hold, and Snapmare.
Brief description: Nell Stewart was a prominent heel in women’s wrestling during her sporadic appearances in JCP. Known for her sharp in-ring style and ability to generate heat, she contributed to the growth of the women’s division during her era.

Nelson Royal
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1970s and 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Junior Heavyweight Division.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with an emphasis on mat work.
Signature moves: Abdominal Stretch, Armbar, and Suplex.
Brief description: Nelson Royal was a highly skilled wrestler and former NWA World Junior Heavyweight Champion. His technical expertise and professionalism made him a standout in the junior heavyweight division. Royal also contributed as a promoter and trainer, further enhancing his legacy in the business.

Nick Bockwinkel
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Main Event (Special Attraction).
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with an emphasis on psychology and submissions.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Piledriver, and Abdominal Stretch.
Brief description: Known as one of the most cerebral and skilled wrestlers of his era, Nick Bockwinkel occasionally competed in JCP as part of his NWA-affiliated appearances. His polished technical style, eloquent promos, and heel persona made him a standout performer wherever he wrestled, and his matches in JCP brought an air of legitimacy and excellence to the cards.

Nick Kozak
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Traditional grappling with a mix of power moves.
Signature moves: Suplex, Bearhug, and Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Nick Kozak was a solid mid-card competitor who made appearances in JCP during the 1960s. Known for his strong fundamentals and ability to work both singles and tag team matches, Kozak contributed to the promotion's mid-card scene during his tenure.

Nikita Koloff
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1984 to 1988.
Position on the card: Main Event and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based wrestling with a Soviet heel persona.
Signature moves: Russian Sickle (Clothesline), Bearhug, and Backbreaker.
Brief description: Nikita Koloff was one of JCP’s top heels and later one of its most popular babyfaces. Known as "The Russian Nightmare," Nikita was a key member of Ivan Koloff's faction before transitioning to a heroic role. His feuds with Magnum T.A., Ric Flair, and other top stars cemented his legacy as one of the most important figures of the 1980s wrestling scene.

Nikolai Volkoff
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based wrestling with a foreign heel gimmick.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Powerslam, and Throat Chop.
Brief description: Before gaining worldwide fame in the WWF, Nikolai Volkoff made sporadic appearances in JCP as a menacing heel. His imposing size and strength, coupled with his Soviet-inspired gimmick, made him a strong antagonist for babyface competitors.

Norman Frederick Charles III
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a regal heel persona.
Signature moves: Suplex, Elbow Drop, and Backbreaker.
Brief description: Norman Frederick Charles III brought a sophisticated heel gimmick to JCP as part of his tag team work, often paired with Lord Jonathan Boyd. His polished style and aristocratic character made him an effective villain during his time in the promotion.

Oates Brothers (Jerry and Ted Oates)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with Southern-style teamwork.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Arm Drag, and Dropkick.
Brief description: The Oates Brothers were a popular babyface tag team in JCP, known for their solid technical skills and strong chemistry. Their matches showcased classic tag team wrestling, making them reliable performers in the division during their tenure.

Ole Anderson
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from the 1960s to the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Main Event and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Rugged technical grappling with a focus on power and psychology.
Signature moves: Armbar, Hammerlock Slam, and Knee Crusher.
Brief description: Ole Anderson was a cornerstone of JCP’s tag team division as one-half of the Minnesota Wrecking Crew with Gene Anderson and later as part of the Four Horsemen faction. Known for his intense promos and old-school wrestling style, Ole was instrumental in defining the Anderson family legacy and the dominance of the Horsemen.

Oliver Humperdink
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Manager.
Wrestling style: N/A (Manager).
Signature moves: N/A (interference with weapons or distractions).
Brief description: Sir Oliver Humperdink was a flamboyant and effective manager in JCP, often leading heel wrestlers or teams. His over-the-top personality and ability to generate heat added an extra layer of intrigue to the storylines he was involved in, helping to elevate the performers he managed.

Omar Atlas
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with lucha libre influence.
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Crossbody, and Dropkick.
Brief description: Omar Atlas brought his lucha libre background to JCP, providing a different style of wrestling to the promotion. Known for his technical ability and athleticism, Atlas delivered exciting performances during his sporadic appearances in the mid-card.

One Man Gang
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Special Attraction.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with an imposing persona.
Signature moves: 747 Splash, Big Boot, and Powerslam.
Brief description: One Man Gang was a towering and destructive heel who competed in JCP as a special attraction. His size and power made him a credible opponent for top stars, and his matches often emphasized his dominance in the ring. One Man Gang’s presence added excitement to the cards during his appearances.

Ox Baker
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Special Attraction.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with a menacing heel persona.
Signature moves: Heart Punch, Bearhug, and Elbow Smash.
Brief description: Ox Baker was a fearsome heel known for his devastating Heart Punch. His JCP appearances often involved brutal feuds and matches that highlighted his intimidating presence and brawling style. Baker’s persona as a monstrous villain made him a memorable figure during his sporadic stints in the promotion.

Pampero Firpo
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Brawling with a wild, unorthodox style.
Signature moves: Clawhold, Headbutt, and Backbreaker.
Brief description: Known as "The Wild Bull of the Pampas," Pampero Firpo was an eccentric and unpredictable competitor. His rugged style and charismatic personality made him a standout during his appearances in JCP. Firpo’s matches often emphasized his raw intensity and colorful character.

Outlaws (Tag Team)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with Southern-style teamwork.
Signature moves: Double Clothesline, Backdrop Suplex, and Shoulder Block.
Brief description: The Outlaws were a rough-and-tumble tag team that embodied the gritty, no-nonsense style of Southern wrestling. Their sporadic appearances in JCP showcased their toughness and ability to engage in hard-hitting matches against babyface teams.

Pancho Villa
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Traditional grappling with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Armbar, Headlock, and Dropkick.
Brief description: Pancho Villa was a journeyman wrestler who competed in JCP during its early years. His in-ring style, coupled with a fiery heel persona, made him a reliable mid-card performer who entertained crowds with his rugged approach.

Pat Fraley
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent.
Wrestling style: Basic technical grappling.
Signature moves: Body Slam, Elbow Smash, and Suplex.
Brief description: Pat Fraley worked as enhancement talent in JCP, helping to establish rising stars and main-event-level wrestlers. His professionalism and ability to complement his opponents' abilities made him a valuable contributor during his tenure.

Pat O'Connor
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Main Event and Special Attraction.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on submissions and holds.
Signature moves: O’Connor Roll, Abdominal Stretch, and Arm Drag.
Brief description: Pat O'Connor, a former NWA World Heavyweight Champion, brought prestige and technical mastery to JCP during his sporadic appearances. Known for his smooth grappling skills and professionalism, O’Connor was a major draw and a respected figure in wrestling history.

Pat Rose
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent.
Wrestling style: Basic technical wrestling with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Suplex, Dropkick, and Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Pat Rose worked as enhancement talent in JCP, competing against rising stars and established names. Known for his consistent performances and ability to elevate his opponents, Rose played an essential role in supporting the promotion’s roster.

Pat Tanaka
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-to-late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Martial arts-inspired technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Thrust Kick, Arm Drag, and Flying Crossbody.
Brief description: Pat Tanaka was known for his smooth in-ring style and martial arts influence. While his greatest fame came as part of teams like Badd Company and The Orient Express, his JCP appearances showcased his athleticism and potential, particularly in tag team action.

Paul Anderson
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Special Attraction.
Wrestling style: Power-based wrestling with a focus on feats of strength.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Overhead Press Slam, and Shoulder Block.
Brief description: Paul Anderson, a former Olympic weightlifting champion, appeared in JCP as a special attraction. Known as the "World’s Strongest Man," Anderson’s in-ring appearances were centered around showcasing his incredible power and physicality.

Paul Boesch
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Collaborator and Guest Promoter in the 1980s.
Position on the card: Promoter and Guest Commentator.
Wrestling style: N/A (Promoter).
Signature moves: N/A.
Brief description: Paul Boesch was a legendary wrestling promoter who collaborated with JCP during the 1980s, particularly for events in Texas. His involvement helped bridge territories and brought additional exposure to JCP. Boesch was also known for his sharp commentary and contributions to wrestling’s growth during the territorial era.

Paul DeMarco
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Rugged grappling with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Suplex, Forearm Smash, and Body Slam.
Brief description: Paul DeMarco competed as a solid mid-card performer in JCP, occasionally involved in feuds and angles that elevated his status. His rugged style and consistent performances made him a dependable presence during his tenure.

Paul Ellering
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1986 to 1988.
Position on the card: Manager (primarily for the Road Warriors).
Wrestling style: N/A (Manager).
Signature moves: N/A (interference and strategy work as a manager).
Brief description: Paul Ellering was the manager of The Road Warriors, one of the most dominant tag teams in wrestling history. Known for his strategic promos and managerial prowess, Ellering added an extra layer of credibility and mystique to the team, playing a vital role in their success during their JCP tenure.

Paul Jones
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from the 1960s to the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Main Event (as a wrestler) and Manager (later career).
Wrestling style: Technical grappling with a mix of brawling.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Abdominal Stretch, and Suplex.
Brief description: Paul Jones was a prominent figure in JCP for decades, first as a beloved babyface wrestler and later as a hated heel manager. His in-ring career included multiple championships and high-profile feuds, while his managerial tenure saw him lead "Paul Jones’ Army" in feuds against stars like Jimmy Valiant. Jones’ versatility and longevity made him a cornerstone of the promotion.

Paul Orndorff
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s and mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Main Event.
Wrestling style: Power-based grappling with technical fundamentals.
Signature moves: Piledriver, Shoulder Block, and Clothesline.
Brief description: Known as "Mr. Wonderful," Paul Orndorff brought his charisma and athleticism to JCP during his sporadic appearances. A strong competitor in both singles and tag team action, Orndorff's ability to connect with audiences and deliver intense matches made him a valuable asset during his time in the promotion.

Paul Vachon (Butcher Vachon)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with heel tactics.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Backbreaker, and Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Paul "Butcher" Vachon was part of the famous Vachon wrestling family and brought his hard-hitting style to JCP during sporadic appearances. Often wrestling as a menacing heel, Vachon competed both in singles and tag team matches, leaving a mark with his tough persona and intense in-ring work.

Pedro Morales
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Main Event.
Wrestling style: Technical grappling with fiery babyface comebacks.
Signature moves: Boston Crab, Sunset Flip, and Flying Crossbody.
Brief description: Pedro Morales, a former WWWF World Heavyweight Champion, brought his dynamic and crowd-pleasing style to JCP during select appearances. Morales was known for his incredible connection with fans and his ability to deliver high-energy matches, particularly in main-event-level bouts against top heels.

Penny Banner
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Women’s Division competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical grappling with a focus on holds and submissions.
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Headlock, and Boston Crab.
Brief description: Penny Banner was one of the most accomplished and respected women’s wrestlers of her era. Known for her technical ability and poise in the ring, Banner brought prestige and credibility to women’s wrestling during her appearances in JCP. She was a trailblazer who helped elevate the women’s division across the territories.

Pepe Lopez
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired high-flying and grappling.
Signature moves: Flying Crossbody, Dropkick, and Arm Drag.
Brief description: Pepe Lopez brought the fast-paced style of lucha libre to JCP, providing a unique and exciting dynamic to the mid-card. His athleticism and high-flying moves made him a standout during his appearances, appealing to fans who appreciated a more aerial approach to wrestling.

Pete Managoff
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1940s and 1950s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappling with a mix of brawling.
Signature moves: Suplex, Armbar, and Forearm Smash.
Brief description: Pete Managoff was a solid and well-rounded competitor during JCP’s early years. Known for his technical skills and adaptability in the ring, Managoff delivered consistent performances that contributed to the promotion’s growing popularity during the golden age of wrestling.

Pez Whatley
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1985 to 1987.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based grappling with high-energy offense.
Signature moves: Headbutt, Suplex, and Dropkick.
Brief description: Known as "Shaska" Whatley during his heel run, Pez Whatley was a charismatic and dynamic wrestler in JCP. Initially a fan favorite, Whatley later aligned with Paul Jones’ Army, adding depth to the promotion’s mid-card storylines. His energy and in-ring skills made him a memorable figure during his time in JCP.

Phil Hickerson
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with heel tendencies.
Signature moves: Body Slam, Elbow Drop, and Shoulder Block.
Brief description: Phil Hickerson was a rugged and dependable competitor who worked in JCP as both a singles and tag team wrestler. Known for his hard-hitting style, Hickerson contributed to the depth of the roster during his sporadic appearances.

Phil Robley
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Brawling with a focus on storytelling and psychology.
Signature moves: Neckbreaker, Suplex, and Knee Drop.
Brief description: "Crazy" Phil Robley was a creative and unorthodox wrestler known for his charisma and ability to work the crowd. His time in JCP highlighted his brawling style and knack for engaging storytelling, making him a valuable addition to the mid-card during his appearances.

Poffos (Angelo, Lanny, and Randy Savage)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s (Angelo) and 1970s (Lanny).
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Upper Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappling with a mix of brawling and athleticism.
Signature moves: Suplex, Flying Elbow Drop (Randy), and Moonsault (Lanny).
Brief description: Angelo Poffo and his sons, Lanny Poffo and Randy Savage, each made sporadic appearances in JCP. Angelo, a respected journeyman wrestler, appeared in JCP in the 1960s, while Lanny competed in the 1970s. Though Randy Savage did not have significant JCP tenure, the family’s collective legacy is synonymous with charisma, innovation, and professionalism in wrestling.

Pork Chop Cash
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with charisma.
Signature moves: Headbutt, Scoop Slam, and Shoulder Block.
Brief description: Pork Chop Cash was a charismatic and powerful wrestler who brought energy and enthusiasm to his matches. Whether competing as a singles wrestler or in tag teams, Cash connected with the crowd and was a solid performer during his time in JCP.

Powers of Pain (Warlord and Barbarian)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1987 to 1988.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with intimidating personas.
Signature moves: Double Shoulder Block, Powerslam, and Diving Headbutt.
Brief description: The Powers of Pain were a dominant tag team in JCP known for their incredible size and strength. Managed by Paul Jones, they were positioned as fierce rivals to The Road Warriors, engaging in intense and memorable battles. Their physicality and presence made them a major force in the tag team division during their time in the promotion.

Princess Little Cloud
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s.
Position on the card: Women’s Division competitor.
Wrestling style: Traditional technical wrestling with theatrical elements.
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Headlock, and Snapmare.
Brief description: Princess Little Cloud was a Native American-inspired character who competed in the women’s division during JCP’s early years. Her unique persona and technical skills made her a notable attraction in women’s wrestling during her sporadic appearances.

Princess Little Dove
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Women’s Division competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on grappling.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Dropkick, and Flying Crossbody.
Brief description: Princess Little Dove was another Native American-themed wrestler who competed in JCP’s women’s division. Known for her athleticism and graceful style, she brought diversity and intrigue to the women’s matches during her sporadic appearances.

Pvt. Don Kernodle
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the late 1970s and 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a blend of power and striking.
Signature moves: Suplex, Belly-to-Belly Suplex, and Armbar.
Brief description: Don Kernodle was a standout in JCP, particularly as part of Sgt. Slaughter’s tag team unit. As Pvt. Kernodle, he excelled in the tag team division, competing in high-profile feuds, including battles against Ricky Steamboat and Jay Youngblood. Kernodle’s charisma and solid in-ring skills made him a valued performer during his tenure.

Pvt. Jim Nelson
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Basic technical wrestling with a focus on teamwork.
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Backbreaker, and Elbow Smash.
Brief description: Pvt. Jim Nelson, often partnered with Don Kernodle as part of Sgt. Slaughter’s unit, contributed to the tag team division during his time in JCP. His role primarily involved supporting Kernodle and Slaughter’s angles, enhancing the promotion’s storylines and tag team action.

Ramon Torres
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with an emphasis on clean grappling.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Arm Drag, and Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: Ramon Torres was a respected journeyman wrestler known for his clean technical style and ability to engage with audiences. His sporadic appearances in JCP showcased his grappling prowess and made him a valuable addition to the promotion’s mid-card.

Professor Boris Malenko
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with heel tactics and a villainous persona.
Signature moves: Russian Leg Sweep, Suplex, and Bearhug.
Brief description: Professor Boris Malenko was one of wrestling’s most effective villains, known for his cunning heel persona and technical mastery. During his appearances in JCP, he engaged in feuds with top babyfaces and added depth to the promotion’s roster with his intense style and storytelling ability.

Randy Barber
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent.
Wrestling style: Basic technical wrestling with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Elbow Drop, and Body Slam.
Brief description: Randy Barber worked as enhancement talent in JCP, competing against rising stars and established wrestlers. His consistent in-ring performances and ability to make opponents look strong made him a valuable asset to the promotion.

Randy Mulkey
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances in the 1980s.
Position on the card: Enhancement Talent (Tag Team Division).
Wrestling style: Basic grappling with comedic and underdog elements.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Dropkick, and Armbar.
Brief description: Randy Mulkey, one-half of the Mulkey Brothers, became a cult favorite in JCP despite a lengthy losing streak. Known for their underdog status, the Mulkey Brothers gained unexpected fan support during the "MulkeyMania" phenomenon, providing entertainment and a unique dynamic to the roster.

Randy Poffo (Randy Savage)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical wrestling with a charismatic flair.
Signature moves: Flying Elbow Drop, Suplex, and Crossbody.
Brief description: Before achieving international stardom as "Macho Man" Randy Savage, Randy Poffo made occasional appearances in JCP. His matches showcased his early athleticism and charisma, foreshadowing the greatness he would achieve later in his career.

Ray Candy
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based wrestling with a babyface persona.
Signature moves: Powerslam, Bearhug, and Shoulder Block.
Brief description: Ray Candy was a charismatic and powerful competitor who often played the role of an energetic babyface in JCP. Known for his strength and likable personality, Candy contributed to the mid-card and tag team divisions during his appearances.

Ray Stevens
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a mix of high-impact brawling.
Signature moves: Bombs Away Knee Drop, Piledriver, and Elbow Smash.
Brief description: Known as "The Crippler," Ray Stevens was one of the most dynamic and talented wrestlers of his era. His sporadic appearances in JCP showcased his exceptional ability to blend technical skill and showmanship, making him a highlight of any card he competed on. Stevens’ matches were intense and captivating, cementing his legacy as one of the all-time greats.

Ray Traylor (Big Boss Man)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based wrestling with strongman elements.
Signature moves: Big Splash, Bearhug, and Spinebuster.
Brief description: Before gaining worldwide fame as Big Boss Man in the WWF, Ray Traylor made appearances in JCP as a powerful and promising young competitor. His physical presence and natural ability in the ring hinted at the larger role he would play in professional wrestling.

Red Bastien
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Flying Crossbody, and Arm Drag.
Brief description: Red Bastien was a highly skilled and athletic performer known for his innovative offense. During his appearances in JCP, Bastien’s exciting matches and high-flying abilities made him a crowd favorite and a standout in both singles and tag team competition.

Red McIntyre
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1940s and 1950s.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Armbar, Body Slam, and Elbow Smash.
Brief description: Red McIntyre was a journeyman wrestler who competed in JCP during its early years. Known for his consistency and rugged in-ring style, McIntyre was a reliable mid-card performer who helped build the promotion's foundation.

Reggie Lisowski (The Crusher)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and occasional Main Event.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with a charismatic persona.
Signature moves: Crusher Bolo Punch, Bearhug, and Body Slam.
Brief description: Known as "The Crusher," Reggie Lisowski brought his larger-than-life personality and brute strength to JCP during his sporadic appearances. A fan favorite, The Crusher's hard-hitting matches and entertaining promos made him a standout in the territory during his visits.

Rick McCord
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on speed and counters.
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Dropkick, and Suplex.
Brief description: Rick McCord was a solid mid-card performer in JCP, known for his technical abilities and energetic style. His matches were often used to showcase the skills of his opponents while providing entertaining action for the fans.

Rick McGraw
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-energy brawling with some technical elements.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Snap Suplex, and Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Rick McGraw was a fiery competitor known for his resilience and high-energy matches. Although his primary success came in other territories, McGraw's appearances in JCP showcased his toughness and ability to connect with the crowd.

Rick Rood (Ravishing Rick Rude)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1985 to 1987.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based grappling with heel tactics.
Signature moves: Rude Awakening (Neckbreaker), Powerslam, and Suplex.
Brief description: Rick Rood, later known as "Ravishing Rick Rude," was a prominent figure in JCP during his time in the tag team division. Teamed with Manny Fernandez under the management of Paul Jones, Rude was part of Paul Jones’ Army and showcased his power and charisma. His JCP run set the stage for his eventual rise as one of wrestling's most iconic heels.

Rick Rude (Ravishing Rick Rude)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Regular appearances from 1985 to 1987.
Position on the card: Upper Mid-card and Tag Team Division.
Wrestling style: Power-based grappling with heel tactics.
Signature moves: Rude Awakening (Neckbreaker), Powerslam, and Suplex.
Brief description: Rick Rude, later known as "Ravishing Rick Rude," was a prominent figure in JCP during his time in the tag team division. Teamed with Manny Fernandez under the management of Paul Jones, Rude was part of Paul Jones’ Army and showcased his power and charisma. His JCP run set the stage for his eventual rise as one of wrestling's most iconic heels.

Rick Ryder
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, mid-1980s
Position on the card: Enhancement talent
Wrestling style: Technical with a focus on basic mat work
Signature moves: Arm drag, headlock takedown, back elbow
Brief description: Rick Ryder primarily served as enhancement talent in JCP during the mid-1980s, helping to showcase rising stars and established names. While not involved in major storylines or feuds, his matches often demonstrated a solid technical foundation, emphasizing clean execution of basic moves. Ryder's role was crucial in establishing the credibility of higher-tier talent.

Rick Steiner
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1987–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Tag team division and rising mid-carder
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with a focus on suplex variations
Signature moves: Belly-to-belly suplex, Steinerline (clothesline), powerslam
Brief description: Rick Steiner debuted in JCP as part of the Varsity Club stable, managed by Kevin Sullivan. Initially a heel, Steiner quickly gained recognition for his explosive power and amateur wrestling background. Though positioned as a secondary member of the Varsity Club, his physicality and unique charisma foreshadowed the star he would become. His eventual turn as a fan-favorite, marked by a more playful personality, helped transition him to a successful tag team career.

Ricki Starr
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1960s
Position on the card: Mid-card, special attraction
Wrestling style: Flashy, dance-inspired technical style
Signature moves: Dropkick, backflip into arm drag, spinning toe hold
Brief description: Ricki Starr, known for blending ballet-inspired theatrics with technical wrestling, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1960s. His flamboyant presentation and quick-paced offense made him a unique attraction, especially during a time when larger-than-life characters were beginning to gain traction. Starr was often featured in exhibition-style matches designed to highlight his unique persona and wrestling abilities.

Ricky Harris
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, late 1970s–early 1980s
Position on the card: Enhancement talent
Wrestling style: Brawling
Signature moves: Forearm smash, body slam, shoulder tackle
Brief description: Ricky Harris appeared in JCP primarily as an enhancement talent, working matches to elevate rising stars. Harris later gained prominence outside JCP, most notably as "Black Bart," a tough, no-nonsense cowboy persona. His contributions to JCP were foundational, laying the groundwork for his future character evolution.

Ricky Hunter
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, late 1960s–1970s
Position on the card: Enhancement talent and occasional mid-carder
Wrestling style: Technical and lightweight grappling
Signature moves: Crossbody, dropkick, snapmare
Brief description: Ricky Hunter contributed to JCP through sporadic appearances, showcasing his agility and technical wrestling skills. Although he primarily wrestled as enhancement talent, Hunter occasionally moved up the card, engaging in mid-tier matches against more established stars. Outside JCP, Hunter would later gain more recognition internationally, particularly in masked roles.

Ricky Morton
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1985–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main event and tag team division
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical wrestling
Signature moves: Dropkick, sunset flip, crossbody
Brief description: Ricky Morton achieved stardom in JCP as one-half of The Rock 'n' Roll Express alongside Robert Gibson. Their high-energy matches and dramatic storytelling made them fan favorites, particularly in their heated feuds with teams like The Midnight Express. Morton was known for his ability to sell and create crowd sympathy during matches, often playing the "face in peril" role. The team held the NWA World Tag Team Championships multiple times and became iconic figures in JCP's tag team scene.

Ricky Nelson
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Early 1980s (Sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Enhancement talent
Wrestling style: Traditional and basic technical wrestling
Signature moves: Body slam, arm drag, hip toss
Brief description: Ricky Nelson was primarily used as enhancement talent in JCP during the early 1980s. His matches often showcased the abilities of higher-tier wrestlers while providing solid, foundational performances. Nelson's work contributed to the overall presentation of JCP’s growing roster during this period.

Ricky Santana
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, mid-1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor
Wrestling style: Technical with a hint of lucha libre influences
Signature moves: Flying forearm, spinning elbow, dropkick
Brief description: Ricky Santana made sporadic appearances in JCP during the mid-1980s, showcasing his technical wrestling ability and athleticism. While his role in JCP was not prominent, Santana displayed the skills that later led to greater success in other promotions, such as the WWC and WCW.

Ricky Steamboat
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1977–1985, 1989 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main eventer and mid-card early on
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying hybrid
Signature moves: Arm drag, flying crossbody, diving chop
Brief description: Ricky Steamboat was a standout in JCP, celebrated for his incredible athleticism and storytelling in the ring. Initially competing in mid-card roles, he quickly rose to prominence, becoming a key figure in the tag team division with Jay Youngblood and later as a singles competitor. Steamboat's matches with Ric Flair are legendary, epitomizing the technical artistry of professional wrestling. His return in 1989 for their series of NWA World Heavyweight Championship matches solidified his legacy as one of the greatest wrestlers in history.

Rikki Nelson
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, late 1980s
Position on the card: Enhancement talent
Wrestling style: Basic technical wrestling
Signature moves: Arm drag, dropkick, suplex
Brief description: Rikki Nelson primarily worked as enhancement talent in JCP during the late 1980s. His matches often highlighted the skills of rising stars and main-event talents. Nelson’s workmanlike approach ensured consistently solid performances in his role.

Rip Hawk
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1960s–1970s (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main eventer and tag team division
Wrestling style: Brawler with technical elements
Signature moves: Piledriver, body slam, sleeper hold
Brief description: Rip Hawk, known as "The Profile," was a prominent heel in JCP during the 1960s and 1970s. Often teaming with Swede Hanson, Hawk excelled in the tag team division, holding the NWA Mid-Atlantic Tag Team Championships. His charismatic promos and tough, brawling style made him a standout villain in the promotion. Hawk's contributions were instrumental in establishing the Mid-Atlantic territory's reputation for high-quality wrestling and compelling characters.

Rip Morgan
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1988–1989 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawler
Signature moves: Big boot, clothesline, elbow drop
Brief description: Rip Morgan debuted in JCP as a member of The New Zealand Militia, a heel tag team with Jack Victory. Known for his rough, brawling style, Morgan contributed to the tag team division’s depth. While he did not achieve significant singles success, his imposing presence and teamwork made him a reliable competitor in the late 1980s.

Rito Romero
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1950s
Position on the card: Mid-card and special attraction
Wrestling style: Technical and mat-based with a lucha libre influence
Signature moves: Romero Special (surfboard stretch), arm drag, monkey flip
Brief description: A Mexican wrestling legend, Rito Romero brought his unique mix of technical wrestling and lucha libre flair to JCP during sporadic appearances in the 1950s. Romero’s innovative style and charisma earned him respect from fans and wrestlers alike, and his matches often showcased high-level grappling with flashes of athletic creativity.

Road Warrior Animal
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1986–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main event (tag team division)
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Powerslam, shoulder block, Doomsday Device (with Road Warrior Hawk)
Brief description: Road Warrior Animal was one half of The Road Warriors, one of the most dominant and influential tag teams in wrestling history. In JCP, Animal, alongside Hawk, established themselves as unstoppable forces in the tag team division. Known for their intimidating appearance and high-impact style, The Road Warriors were a highlight of major events like Starrcade, often facing top teams in brutal, hard-hitting matches.

Road Warrior Hawk
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1986–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main event (tag team division)
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawler
Signature moves: Flying shoulder block, military press slam, Doomsday Device (with Road Warrior Animal)
Brief description: Hawk's raw power, aggression, and intense promos made him the perfect counterpart to Animal in The Road Warriors. Together, they dominated the tag team division, combining brute strength and overwhelming charisma to captivate audiences. Hawk's high-energy presence and devastating moves played a key role in the team's legendary status.

Road Warriors
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1986–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main event (tag team division)
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling tandem
Signature moves: Doomsday Device, double shoulder block, powerbomb-backbreaker combo
Brief description: As a duo, The Road Warriors revolutionized tag team wrestling in JCP with their intense physicality and unmatched presence. Managed by Paul Ellering, they held the NWA World Six-Man Tag Team Championship (alongside Dusty Rhodes) and regularly participated in marquee matches. Their ability to dominate opponents in convincing fashion set a new standard for tag team wrestling during their tenure.

Robert Gibson
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1985–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main event and tag team division
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying
Signature moves: Dropkick, neckbreaker, crossbody
Brief description: As one-half of The Rock 'n' Roll Express with Ricky Morton, Robert Gibson was a key figure in JCP's legendary tag team division. Known for his technical expertise and chemistry with Morton, Gibson contributed to iconic rivalries, especially against The Midnight Express. The duo’s high-energy matches and teamwork helped them secure multiple NWA World Tag Team Championships, cementing their status as one of the greatest tag teams in wrestling history.

Roberto Soto
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, early 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor
Wrestling style: Lucha-inspired technical wrestling
Signature moves: Flying headscissors, dropkick, sunset flip
Brief description: Roberto Soto appeared sporadically in JCP during the early 1980s, showcasing a fast-paced and athletic style influenced by lucha libre. Though not heavily featured in storylines, Soto was a reliable performer who added depth to the mid-card and brought variety to JCP’s roster.

Rock 'n' Roll Express
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1985–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main event and tag team division
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical tandem
Signature moves: Double dropkick, double suplex, stereo crossbodies
Brief description: The Rock 'n' Roll Express, consisting of Ricky Morton and Robert Gibson, were one of JCP's most beloved acts. Their dynamic mix of speed, skill, and charisma endeared them to fans, especially in their feuds with The Midnight Express. Multiple-time NWA World Tag Team Champions, they were known for their exciting matches and connection with the crowd. Their success helped elevate tag team wrestling to main-event status.

Rock 'n' Roll RPMs
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, late 1980s
Position on the card: Lower mid-card/tag team division
Wrestling style: Traditional tag team with light aerial moves
Signature moves: Double elbow drop, double body slam, second-rope elbow smash
Brief description: The Rock 'n' Roll RPMs, a heel tag team featuring Mike Davis and Tommy Lane, made sporadic appearances in JCP in the late 1980s. Though never positioned as a top-tier team, they were solid workers and often used as foils for more popular duos like The Rock 'n' Roll Express. Their entertaining antics and cohesive teamwork made them a memorable part of JCP’s tag team division.

Rocky Kernodle
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Early 1980s (Sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Enhancement talent
Wrestling style: Basic technical wrestling
Signature moves: Arm drag, hip toss, body slam
Brief description: Rocky Kernodle, brother of Don Kernodle, worked sporadically as enhancement talent in JCP. While less prominent than his brother, Rocky contributed to the promotion’s weekly programming by helping elevate rising stars through competitive matches.

Rocky King
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1984–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Enhancement talent with occasional mid-card roles
Wrestling style: High-energy and technical grappling
Signature moves: Dropkick, hip toss, running crossbody
Brief description: Rocky King was a beloved enhancement talent in JCP, known for his charisma, agility, and connection with fans. Despite often being positioned as an underdog, King occasionally earned mid-card opportunities and tag team roles, including teaming with The Road Warriors in six-man tag matches. His perseverance and spirit made him a fan favorite and a key part of JCP’s programming.

Roddy Piper
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, late 1970s–early 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical with brawling elements and sharp promo skills
Signature moves: Sleeper hold, eye poke, piledriver
Brief description: Before becoming a global star, Roddy Piper made a notable impact in JCP with his incredible charisma and ability to draw heat as a heel. While his tenure in JCP was not long-term, Piper's work on the microphone and in-ring abilities left a lasting impression. His rivalries and fiery promos helped elevate mid-card feuds, setting the stage for his future as one of wrestling's greatest antagonists.

Roger Kirby
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, late 1970s
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based wrestling
Signature moves: Suplex, neckbreaker, figure-four leglock
Brief description: Roger Kirby was a journeyman wrestler known for his technical prowess and no-nonsense style. In JCP, he competed sporadically, adding depth to the mid-card and showcasing his ability to work competitive matches against rising stars. His long career spanned multiple territories, with JCP being a small but significant chapter in his overall legacy.

Ron Bass
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1983–1987 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Upper mid-card and tag team division
Wrestling style: Brawling and powerhouse
Signature moves: Texas piledriver, clothesline, backbreaker
Brief description: "Cowboy" Ron Bass was a prominent heel in JCP, often engaging in brutal feuds with fan-favorites such as Dusty Rhodes and Barry Windham. His rugged cowboy persona and physical style made him a natural antagonist in both singles and tag team matches. While he never reached the main event consistently, Bass was a reliable performer and contributed to memorable storylines during his time in the promotion.

Ron Etchison
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1950s
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Traditional technical wrestling
Signature moves: Headlock, armbar, leg scissors
Brief description: A solid technical wrestler, Ron Etchison was known for his clean in-ring style and ability to elevate his opponents. His sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1950s contributed to the foundation of the Mid-Atlantic territory, emphasizing grappling and traditional wrestling fundamentals.

Ron Garvin
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1984–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main eventer and mid-card early on
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and technical
Signature moves: Hands of Stone punch, piledriver, sleeper hold
Brief description: Known as "The Man with the Hands of Stone," Ron Garvin rose through the ranks in JCP, eventually becoming NWA World Heavyweight Champion in 1987. His rugged, no-nonsense style and ability to connect with fans made him a popular figure. Garvin was involved in major feuds with Ric Flair, Tully Blanchard, and other Four Horsemen members, cementing his status as one of the toughest competitors in JCP.

Ron Ritchie
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Early 1980s (Sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor
Wrestling style: Technical with occasional brawling elements
Signature moves: Dropkick, suplex, abdominal stretch
Brief description: Ron Ritchie appeared sporadically in JCP during the early 1980s, where his technical skills and clean-cut babyface image helped him serve as a solid competitor in mid-card matches. Although he did not engage in major storylines, Ritchie was a reliable worker who contributed to the depth of JCP's roster.

Ron Simmons
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Late 1980s (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with explosive athleticism
Signature moves: Spinebuster, powerslam, shoulder tackle
Brief description: Ron Simmons began his professional wrestling career in JCP during the late 1980s, showcasing incredible strength and natural charisma. A standout collegiate football player, Simmons quickly adapted to wrestling and displayed potential in both singles and tag team matches. While his most significant career achievements came later in WCW, his time in JCP provided a strong foundation for his rise to prominence.

Ron Starr
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, early 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card and enhancement talent
Wrestling style: Technical with brawling influences
Signature moves: Piledriver, swinging neckbreaker, body slam
Brief description: A well-traveled journeyman, Ron Starr made sporadic appearances in JCP in the early 1980s. Known for his versatility and experience, Starr often competed in mid-card matches, helping to elevate his opponents. His career spanned multiple promotions, and while his tenure in JCP was limited, he demonstrated professionalism and skill during his appearances.

Ron Wright
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1960s
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Brawler with a focus on Southern-style heat generation
Signature moves: Sleeper hold, knee drop, hammerlock
Brief description: Ron Wright was a legendary figure in Southern wrestling territories, and his sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1960s brought a mix of gritty brawling and intense heel tactics. Wright’s ability to antagonize audiences made him a memorable presence, even in short stints, and he left a lasting impression as a skilled villain who could elicit strong reactions from the crowd.

Ronnie Garvin
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1984–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main eventer and mid-card early on
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and technical
Signature moves: Hands of Stone punch, piledriver, sleeper hold
Brief description: Known as "The Man with the Hands of Stone," Ronnie Garvin became a prominent figure in JCP. Rising from the mid-card, Garvin's tough, no-nonsense style and crowd connection eventually propelled him to the top, where he captured the NWA World Heavyweight Championship in 1987. His memorable feuds with Ric Flair and The Four Horsemen solidified his reputation as one of the toughest competitors of his era.

Roy Welch
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1940s–1950s
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional main event
Wrestling style: Traditional technical grappling
Signature moves: Headlock, armbar, body scissors
Brief description: A pioneer of the wrestling industry, Roy Welch competed sporadically in JCP during its early years, bringing his technical skills and experience to the promotion. Welch, known as a savvy competitor in and out of the ring, was also instrumental in shaping Southern wrestling through his work as a promoter. His appearances in JCP laid the groundwork for the Mid-Atlantic territory’s development.

Royal Kangaroos
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1960s
Position on the card: Tag team division
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling tandem
Signature moves: Double-team backbreaker, knee drop, atomic drop
Brief description: The Royal Kangaroos, a popular tag team featuring Jonathan Boyd and Norman Frederick Charles, brought their unique Australian-inspired gimmick to JCP sporadically in the 1960s. Their blend of technical skill and roughhouse tactics made them an entertaining act in the tag team division. Though not long-term fixtures in JCP, their distinctive characters and teamwork left a memorable impression.

Rufus R. Jones
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1970s–1980s (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Upper mid-card and tag team division
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with a focus on crowd engagement
Signature moves: Bear hug, headbutt, shoulder block
Brief description: Known as the "Freight Train," Rufus R. Jones was a beloved figure in JCP. His energetic and powerful style, combined with his charisma and connection with the fans, made him a consistent presence in the promotion's mid-card and tag team scenes. Jones often teamed with fan favorites, delivering exciting matches that emphasized his larger-than-life persona.

Russian Assassins
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1988–1989 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Tag team division
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and technical tandem
Signature moves: Double suplex, bear hug-clothesline combination, side slam
Brief description: Managed by Paul Jones, the masked duo known as the Russian Assassins (featuring Angel of Death as one member and later replaced by other talent) were a prominent heel tag team in JCP’s late 1980s storyline landscape. Their gimmick capitalized on Cold War tensions, and they were primarily used to feud with top babyface teams, showcasing their brute strength and heel tactics.

Russians
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1984–1986 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main event (tag team division)
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and technical heel tandem
Signature moves: Russian Sickle (clothesline), double suplex, bear hug
Brief description: The Russians, consisting of Ivan Koloff, Nikita Koloff, and later Krusher Khrushchev, were a dominant heel faction in JCP during the mid-1980s. Their anti-American gimmick, combined with their brutal in-ring style, made them formidable opponents for popular babyface teams like The Rock 'n' Roll Express and Dusty Rhodes. Ivan Koloff’s veteran presence and Nikita’s raw power created an intimidating dynamic that played a key role in JCP’s storylines during this era.

Sam Houston
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1985–1987 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card and light heavyweight competitor
Wrestling style: Technical with high-flying elements
Signature moves: Bulldog, dropkick, sunset flip
Brief description: Sam Houston was a young, energetic babyface who quickly gained popularity in JCP’s mid-card. Known for his lanky frame and enthusiastic performances, Houston feuded with wrestlers like Krusher Khrushchev and Black Bart. He captured the NWA Mid-Atlantic Heavyweight Championship, solidifying his role as an exciting underdog competitor.

Sam Steamboat
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1950s
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and aerial wrestling
Signature moves: Flying headscissors, dropkick, arm drag
Brief description: A talented Hawaiian wrestler, Sam Steamboat made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1950s. Known for his agility and technical prowess, Steamboat brought a dynamic style to the mid-card and laid the groundwork for future Pacific Islander stars in wrestling. Though he wasn’t a regular in JCP, his performances were well-received by fans of the era.

Samoans
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1980s
Position on the card: Tag team division
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling tandem
Signature moves: Samoan drop, headbutt, double chop
Brief description: Representing the traditional Samoan wrestling legacy, The Samoans occasionally appeared in JCP’s tag team division during the 1980s. Known for their strength, resilience, and signature no-sell of head attacks, the team was a credible force in the ring. Their physical style and presentation made them stand out in an era of colorful tag team competition.

Sandy Parker
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1970s
Position on the card: Women’s division competitor
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, body slam, leg drop
Brief description: Sandy Parker was a trailblazer in women’s wrestling during the 1970s. Her sporadic appearances in JCP showcased her toughness and technical skill in a division that often struggled for consistent spotlight. Parker’s work helped pave the way for women wrestlers to gain greater recognition in the wrestling world.

Sandy Scott
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1960s–1970s (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Tag team division and occasional mid-card singles
Wrestling style: Technical with a focus on grappling
Signature moves: Double wristlock, atomic drop, sunset flip
Brief description: Sandy Scott, often teaming with his brother George Scott, was a key figure in JCP’s tag team division during the 1960s and 1970s. Together, The Flying Scotts were a popular babyface duo known for their technical expertise and exciting matches. Scott also transitioned into a backstage role, contributing to the promotion's operations and wrestling development.

Scandor Akbar
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, late 1970s
Position on the card: Manager and occasional in-ring competitor
Wrestling style: Brawling and managerial interference
Signature moves: Fireball attack, loaded punch
Brief description: Scandor Akbar, better known for his work in other territories as a notorious heel manager, made sporadic appearances in JCP in the late 1970s. His persona as a wealthy Middle Eastern villain who used underhanded tactics brought heat to any storyline he was involved in. Akbar’s rare JCP stints as a wrestler or manager added an extra layer of tension to the promotion's matches.

Scott Casey
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, early 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor
Wrestling style: Traditional and technical with occasional brawling
Signature moves: Bulldog, elbow drop, suplex
Brief description: Scott Casey made occasional appearances in JCP during the early 1980s, bringing his no-nonsense, cowboy-inspired persona to the promotion. While not heavily featured, Casey was a skilled worker whose matches showcased a mix of toughness and technical ability. He later found more prominent roles in other territories.

Scott Irwin
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, early 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawler
Signature moves: Big boot, powerbomb, shoulder block
Brief description: Scott Irwin, known for his imposing size and strength, appeared sporadically in JCP, often as part of tag teams or to add depth to mid-card matches. Alongside his brother Bill Irwin as The Super Destroyers, Scott was a formidable presence and a credible competitor in the tag team scene.

Scott McGhee
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1984–1986 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and mat-based
Signature moves: Arm drag, dropkick, Boston crab
Brief description: A talented technical wrestler, Scott McGhee was a regular in JCP during the mid-1980s, often competing in mid-card matches and contributing to the promotion’s wrestling-focused presentation. McGhee’s clean-cut image and skillset made him a dependable babyface, and his matches often stood out for their crisp execution and storytelling.

Sean Royal
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1986–1987 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Tag team division
Wrestling style: Technical and high-impact
Signature moves: Flying forearm, snap suplex, second-rope elbow drop
Brief description: Sean Royal was one-half of the tag team The New Breed alongside Chris Champion. The New Breed brought a futuristic gimmick to JCP, portraying wrestlers from the year 2002. Their athleticism and charisma made them an entertaining addition to the tag team division, where they feuded with teams like The Rock 'n' Roll Express. Royal’s in-ring work combined speed and technical skill, making him a standout in the short-lived team.

Sgt. Jacques Goulet
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, late 1970s–early 1980s
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based
Signature moves: Bear hug, backbreaker, body slam
Brief description: Sgt. Jacques Goulet, a rugged and disciplined competitor, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the late 1970s and early 1980s. Often portrayed as a tough, militaristic heel, Goulet worked in tag team and mid-card singles matches. His hard-hitting style made him a reliable performer to bolster the roster.

Sgt. Slaughter
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, mid-1980s
Position on the card: Main event and special attraction
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with a focus on storytelling
Signature moves: Cobra Clutch, gutbuster, military press slam
Brief description: Sgt. Slaughter, already an established wrestling star, appeared sporadically in JCP during the mid-1980s. Known for his patriotic persona and larger-than-life charisma, Slaughter engaged in high-profile matches that capitalized on his immense popularity. While his tenure in JCP was not extensive, his presence was a significant draw for fans during his appearances.

Shane Douglas
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1986–1987 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor and rising talent
Wrestling style: Technical with high-flying elements
Signature moves: Belly-to-belly suplex, dropkick, backbreaker
Brief description: Shane Douglas began his career in JCP as a young and promising babyface. Known for his clean technical wrestling and resilience, Douglas worked as an underdog in the mid-card, gradually earning fan support. Although his time in JCP was brief, it helped him gain experience before achieving greater fame in other promotions.

Shaska Whatley
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1985–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card heel
Wrestling style: Brawling with technical influences
Signature moves: Elbow drop, headbutt, suplex
Brief description: Known as "Shaska Whatley" during his time in JCP, Pez Whatley transitioned to a heel persona after turning on his former friend Jimmy Valiant. Aligning with Paul Jones' Army, Whatley participated in several feuds, including a notable rivalry with Valiant. His combination of charisma and brawling ability made him a valuable member of the promotion’s mid-card and tag team scene.

Sheepherders
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Tag team division
Wrestling style: Brawling and hardcore-inspired
Signature moves: Double gutbuster, battering ram, forearm smash
Brief description: The Sheepherders, composed of Luke Williams and Butch Miller, were a chaotic and violent heel tag team in JCP. Their wild, hardcore-inspired style made them stand out in a stacked tag team division. They feuded with teams like The Rock 'n' Roll Express, using underhanded tactics and brutal offense to generate heat from the crowd. Later, the duo would transform into the fan-favorite Bushwhackers in the WWF, but their Sheepherders persona was a stark contrast, emphasizing aggression and destruction.

Sir Oliver Humperdink
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, late 1980s
Position on the card: Manager
Wrestling style: Managerial interference and psychological tactics
Signature moves: Managerial distraction, foreign object usage (on behalf of his wrestlers)
Brief description: Sir Oliver Humperdink, a flamboyant and loud-mouthed manager, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the late 1980s. Known for his colorful attire and ability to rile up crowds, Humperdink managed several notable wrestlers, using interference and cunning strategies to gain the upper hand. While his primary work was in other territories, his brief stints in JCP added charisma to the roster and elevated the wrestlers he represented.

Skip Young
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, early 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor
Wrestling style: High-energy and technical grappling
Signature moves: Dropkick, flying crossbody, sunset flip
Brief description: Skip Young, a dynamic and agile wrestler, appeared sporadically in JCP during the early 1980s. Known for his athleticism and clean-cut persona, Young delivered exciting performances that highlighted his technical and aerial abilities. While he wasn’t heavily featured in JCP, his skill set made him a valuable addition to the mid-card during his appearances.

Skull Murphy
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1960s (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card singles
Wrestling style: Brawler with heel tactics
Signature moves: Knee drop, double axe handle, chokehold
Brief description: Skull Murphy was a prominent heel in JCP during the 1960s, known for his intimidating presence and roughhouse style. Often teaming with Brute Bernard, Murphy excelled in the tag team division, where his underhanded tactics and brutal offense drew significant heat from the crowd. His role as a villainous foil helped elevate babyface teams and further established JCP's tag team scene.

Sky Low Low
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1950s–1960s
Position on the card: Midget wrestling division
Wrestling style: Technical with comedic elements
Signature moves: Head scissors, arm drag, monkey flip
Brief description: Sky Low Low, one of the most famous midget wrestlers in history, made occasional appearances in JCP during the 1950s and 1960s. Combining technical skill with lighthearted antics, he delighted audiences and became a staple of midget wrestling exhibitions. His performances added variety to JCP cards and showcased his unique charm and athleticism.

Sonny Fargo
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1950s–1960s (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor and referee
Wrestling style: Traditional and brawling
Signature moves: Body slam, hip toss, arm drag
Brief description: Sonny Fargo was a versatile performer in JCP, initially competing as a mid-card wrestler before transitioning to a referee role. Known for his no-nonsense demeanor, Fargo maintained a connection with fans due to his fair officiating and hard-hitting matches during his active wrestling years. He became a respected figure within the promotion for his contributions both inside and outside the ring.

Sonny King
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, early 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor and manager
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawler
Signature moves: Bear hug, headbutt, body slam
Brief description: Sonny King appeared sporadically in JCP during the early 1980s, showcasing his physical strength and charisma in mid-card matches. He also took on managerial roles, leveraging his commanding presence to enhance storylines. King’s versatility as both a wrestler and manager made him a valuable asset during his time in the promotion.

Southern Boys
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1990 (Sporadic appearances as part of WCW crossover)
Position on the card: Tag team division
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical tandem
Signature moves: Double dropkick, slingshot suplex, double elbow smash
Brief description: Composed of Tracy Smothers and Steve Armstrong, the Southern Boys briefly appeared in JCP as part of the transitional phase into WCW. Known for their exciting, fast-paced matches, the duo earned acclaim for their athleticism and teamwork. Their matches showcased a blend of Southern grit and innovative offense, contributing to the evolution of tag team wrestling during this era.

Spike
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1980s
Position on the card: Enhancement talent
Wrestling style: Brawling with basic technical elements
Signature moves: Headbutt, clothesline, body slam
Brief description: Spike worked sporadically as enhancement talent in JCP, primarily during the 1980s. His role focused on elevating established stars through competitive matches, and he became a reliable hand for the promotion. While not a featured performer, his contributions helped maintain the weekly programming's quality.

Stan Hansen
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, late 1970s–early 1980s
Position on the card: Main event and special attraction
Wrestling style: Brawling and powerhouse
Signature moves: Lariat, backbreaker, shoulder block
Brief description: Stan Hansen, a legendary brawler known for his stiff, hard-hitting style, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the late 1970s and early 1980s. His intense presence and devastating lariat made him a fearsome competitor. While most of Hansen’s career was centered in Japan and other U.S. territories, his matches in JCP further cemented his reputation as one of wrestling's toughest competitors.

Stan Lane
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1987–1990 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Tag team division
Wrestling style: Technical with striking elements
Signature moves: Superkick, Russian leg sweep, elbow drop
Brief description: Stan Lane joined JCP in 1987 as part of The Midnight Express, replacing Dennis Condrey and teaming with Bobby Eaton under Jim Cornette’s management. Lane's athleticism and charisma reinvigorated the already legendary tag team, leading to numerous classic matches against teams like The Rock 'n' Roll Express and The Fantastics. His blend of technical skill and striking prowess helped maintain The Midnight Express’s status as one of the top tag teams in wrestling history.

Steve Armstrong
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1990 (Sporadic appearances as part of WCW crossover)
Position on the card: Tag team division
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical
Signature moves: Flying clothesline, suplex, crossbody
Brief description: As one-half of the Southern Boys with Tracy Smothers, Steve Armstrong briefly appeared in JCP during the transitional phase into WCW. Known for their innovative tag team offense, Armstrong and Smothers brought energy and athleticism to their matches, earning recognition as a dynamic pairing. Their fast-paced style fit well into the evolving landscape of tag team wrestling.

Steve Casey
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, late 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor
Wrestling style: Technical with occasional power-based moves
Signature moves: Butterfly suplex, Boston crab, dropkick
Brief description: Steve Casey, a skilled technical wrestler from Ireland, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the late 1980s. His athleticism and European grappling style stood out in mid-card matches. While not a prominent figure in the promotion, Casey's performances were solid and showcased his versatility in the ring.

Steve Cox
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, late 1980s
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card singles
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements
Signature moves: Powerslam, suplex, running clothesline
Brief description: Steve Cox made sporadic appearances in JCP during the late 1980s, primarily working in tag team matches and mid-card singles bouts. A strong and dependable wrestler, Cox displayed flashes of potential with his blend of power moves and technical ability. His role added depth to the roster, particularly in competitive undercard matches.

Steve Keirn
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1980s
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card singles
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying
Signature moves: Crossbody, dropkick, atomic drop
Brief description: Best known as one-half of The Fabulous Ones with Stan Lane, Steve Keirn made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1980s. While his role in the promotion was limited, Keirn’s matches showcased his technical expertise and athleticism. His work in JCP helped maintain his reputation as a reliable and versatile competitor.

Steve Regal
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, mid-1980s
Position on the card: Light heavyweight and mid-card competitor
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, crossbody, diving elbow drop
Brief description: Steve Regal, also known as "Mr. Electricity," appeared sporadically in JCP during the mid-1980s. Known for his agility and quick-paced style, Regal was a reliable performer in the light heavyweight division. His charisma and energy made him a strong addition to mid-card matches, though his time in JCP was not long-term.

Steve Strong
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, late 1970s
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Bear hug, backbreaker, power slam
Brief description: Steve Strong, known for his impressive physique and powerful style, made sporadic appearances in JCP in the late 1970s. His matches often showcased his strength and dominance, though he was primarily utilized in mid-card roles to bolster the promotion’s roster.

Steve Travis
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, early 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor
Wrestling style: Technical with occasional high-flying elements
Signature moves: Dropkick, arm drag, sunset flip
Brief description: Steve Travis appeared sporadically in JCP during the early 1980s, showcasing his athleticism and technical skill in mid-card matches. Travis was known for his clean-cut babyface persona and solid in-ring work, which made him a dependable performer during his time with the promotion.

Steve Williams
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, late 1980s
Position on the card: Main event and upper mid-card
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and technical with amateur wrestling influence
Signature moves: Oklahoma Stampede (powerslam), lariat, gutwrench suplex
Brief description: "Dr. Death" Steve Williams brought his hard-hitting style and amateur wrestling credentials to JCP in sporadic appearances during the late 1980s. Known for his immense strength and toughness, Williams participated in high-profile matches and feuds that demonstrated his status as one of the top wrestlers of the era. His brief but impactful time in JCP set the stage for his success in WCW and Japan.

Sting
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1987–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Rising star and main eventer
Wrestling style: High-energy, powerhouse, and technical hybrid
Signature moves: Stinger Splash, Scorpion Deathlock, flying crossbody
Brief description: Sting debuted in JCP in 1987, quickly becoming one of the promotion’s most popular babyfaces. With his colorful face paint, unmatched charisma, and dynamic in-ring style, Sting captured the attention of fans and rose rapidly through the ranks. His breakout match against Ric Flair at Clash of the Champions I solidified his place as a future main-eventer and cornerstone of the promotion during its transition into WCW.

Super Destroyer
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, early 1980s
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card singles
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with heel tactics
Signature moves: Big boot, suplex, clothesline
Brief description: The Super Destroyer was a masked wrestler who appeared sporadically in JCP, often in tag team matches or as a menacing singles heel. Known for his size and intimidating presence, the Super Destroyer was typically used to put over babyface stars in competitive matches.

Superstar Billy Graham
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1983 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main eventer
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with a focus on charisma
Signature moves: Bear hug, full nelson, running elbow drop
Brief description: A larger-than-life figure in wrestling, Superstar Billy Graham brought his flamboyant persona and powerful style to JCP in 1983. Known for his trailblazing charisma and physique, Graham participated in high-profile matches and feuds that drew significant fan interest. His tenure in JCP added star power to the promotion, even though it was relatively short-lived.

Susan Green
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1970s–1980s
Position on the card: Women’s division competitor
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical grappling
Signature moves: Scoop slam, body scissors, backbreaker
Brief description: A respected veteran of women’s wrestling, Susan Green made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1970s and 1980s. Known for her strength and grappling skills, Green was a prominent figure in the women’s division, competing against notable opponents in both singles and tag team matches. Her contributions helped keep women’s wrestling relevant in a male-dominated era.

Swede Hanson
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1960s–1970s (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Tag team division and occasional singles main eventer
Wrestling style: Brawler with power moves
Signature moves: Piledriver, backbreaker, bear hug
Brief description: Swede Hanson was a key figure in JCP during the 1960s and 1970s, primarily known for his successful tag team with Rip Hawk. The duo held the NWA Mid-Atlantic Tag Team Championship multiple times, becoming one of the most dominant and hated heel teams of their era. Hanson’s rough, physical style and ability to connect with audiences made him a mainstay of JCP programming for over a decade.

Swedish Angel
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1940s
Position on the card: Special attraction
Wrestling style: Power-based with emphasis on size and intimidation
Signature moves: Bear hug, overhand chop, body slam
Brief description: The Swedish Angel, a towering and intimidating figure, was a special attraction in JCP during the 1940s. His unique appearance and size made him a spectacle for fans, often competing in matches that emphasized his strength and dominance. Although not a regular fixture, his presence added a sense of grandeur to early JCP events.

Sweet Brown Sugar
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, late 1970s–early 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, flying crossbody, headscissors takedown
Brief description: Sweet Brown Sugar, portrayed by Skip Young or Koko B. Ware during different periods, made sporadic appearances in JCP. Known for his high-energy performances and aerial maneuvers, Sweet Brown Sugar was a standout in mid-card matches and the tag team scene. His flashy style and connection with fans added excitement to JCP programming.

Sweet Daddy Siki
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1960s
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor
Wrestling style: Charismatic showman with technical skill
Signature moves: Neckbreaker, flying headscissors, body slam
Brief description: Sweet Daddy Siki, a charismatic and flamboyant performer, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1960s. Known for his showmanship and unique fashion sense, Siki was a trailblazer for African American wrestlers in the industry. His technical skills and magnetic personality made him a fan favorite wherever he competed.

Sweet Ebony Diamond
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, early 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, sunset flip, crossbody
Brief description: Sweet Ebony Diamond, portrayed by Rocky Johnson under a masked persona, brought his exciting and dynamic style to JCP in the early 1980s. His matches featured a mix of technical wrestling and high-flying offense, making him a memorable presence during his appearances. While his time in JCP was brief, the character added intrigue and diversity to the roster.

Sweet Georgia Brown
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1960s
Position on the card: Women’s division competitor
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical grappling
Signature moves: Arm drag, scoop slam, knee lift
Brief description: Sweet Georgia Brown was one of the earliest African American women to gain prominence in professional wrestling. During her sporadic appearances in JCP in the 1960s, she showcased her strength and resilience in the women’s division. Her pioneering career broke barriers and inspired future generations of women in wrestling.

Tank Morgan
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1960s–1970s (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional main eventer
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawler
Signature moves: Bear hug, body slam, lariat
Brief description: Tank Morgan was a rugged, no-nonsense competitor who appeared regularly in JCP during the 1960s and 1970s. Known for his physicality and toughness, Morgan competed in both singles and tag team matches, often as a heel. His hard-hitting style made him a respected figure in the promotion, and he frequently worked with top talent to deliver intense matches.

Tank Patton
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1970s
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with brawling influences
Signature moves: Shoulder block, backbreaker, bear hug
Brief description: Tank Patton was a powerful and imposing wrestler who made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1970s. Known for his brute strength and straightforward offense, Patton competed in mid-card matches, often testing the resilience of rising babyface stars.

Tapu
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1980s
Position on the card: Enhancement talent
Wrestling style: Brawling and power-based
Signature moves: Headbutt, Samoan drop, body slam
Brief description: Tapu, a wrestler of Samoan descent, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1980s. Known for his physical toughness and traditional Samoan style, he was primarily used in enhancement matches to elevate other talent.

Taras Bulba
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, late 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with martial arts influences
Signature moves: Throat thrust, chop, body slam
Brief description: Taras Bulba, portrayed by Mike Davis, adopted a menacing persona in JCP during sporadic appearances in the late 1980s. His mix of power moves and martial arts-inspired offense made him a unique character on the roster, though he remained primarily in mid-card roles.

Tarzan Tyler
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1960s
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card singles
Wrestling style: Brawling and powerhouse
Signature moves: Piledriver, backbreaker, bear hug
Brief description: Tarzan Tyler was a rugged competitor who made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1960s. Known for his heel persona and physical style, Tyler was effective in both tag team and singles competition. His brawling tactics and charisma made him a notable presence in the promotion during his tenure.

Ted Oates
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division
Wrestling style: Technical with occasional brawling elements
Signature moves: Suplex, abdominal stretch, dropkick
Brief description: Ted Oates appeared sporadically in JCP during the 1980s, often competing in tag team matches with his brother Jerry Oates. Known for his technical proficiency and solid teamwork, Oates contributed to the depth of the tag team division. While not a major player in JCP, his appearances were consistent and competitive.

Teijo Khan
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1987–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card and enhancement heel
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with martial arts influences
Signature moves: Throat thrust, side slam, knee drop
Brief description: Teijo Khan, a menacing figure with a martial arts-inspired gimmick, appeared regularly in JCP during the late 1980s. Often aligned with Paul Jones’ Army, Khan served as an intimidating presence in mid-card matches. While primarily used to put over babyface talent, his striking offense and unique character made him a memorable mid-tier heel.

Genichiro Tenryu
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, late 1980s
Position on the card: Special attraction
Wrestling style: Technical and hard-hitting with strong style influences
Signature moves: Powerbomb, enzuigiri, lariat
Brief description: Genichiro Tenryu, a legendary figure in Japanese wrestling, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the late 1980s as part of cross-promotional events. Known for his strong style and technical ability, Tenryu delivered hard-hitting and intense matches. His brief time in JCP added international prestige to the promotion’s events, and he remains one of Japan's most respected wrestlers.

Terry Funk
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1970s–1980s
Position on the card: Main eventer and special attraction
Wrestling style: Brawler and technical hybrid
Signature moves: Piledriver, spinning toe hold, neckbreaker
Brief description: A legendary figure in professional wrestling, Terry Funk made sporadic appearances in JCP, particularly during the 1970s and 1980s. Known for his ability to seamlessly blend technical wrestling with wild brawling, Funk was involved in high-profile matches and feuds, including those with Ric Flair. His contributions to JCP reinforced his status as a global wrestling icon.

Terry Garvin
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1960s
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor and tag team division
Wrestling style: Technical and flamboyant
Signature moves: Dropkick, arm drag, abdominal stretch
Brief description: Terry Garvin, known for his charisma and technical wrestling ability, appeared sporadically in JCP during the 1960s. Often competing in mid-card matches, Garvin’s smooth in-ring style and ability to captivate audiences made him a solid contributor to the promotion’s roster during his tenure.

Terry Gibbs
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, early 1980s
Position on the card: Enhancement talent
Wrestling style: Basic technical wrestling
Signature moves: Suplex, body slam, elbow drop
Brief description: Terry Gibbs worked sporadically in JCP during the early 1980s, primarily serving as enhancement talent. His role focused on elevating rising stars and established talent by providing competitive and professional matches. Gibbs was a dependable worker whose contributions helped maintain the quality of JCP’s weekly programming.

Terry Gordy
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1986–1988 (Sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Tag team division and main eventer
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with technical and brawling elements
Signature moves: Powerbomb, piledriver, lariat
Brief description: Terry Gordy, a member of the legendary Fabulous Freebirds, made sporadic appearances in JCP, often in high-profile tag team matches alongside Michael Hayes and Buddy Roberts. Gordy’s exceptional combination of size, strength, and athleticism made him one of the most dominant and respected competitors of his era. His performances in JCP added credibility and excitement to the tag team and main event scenes.

Terry Sawyer
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1970s
Position on the card: Mid-card and enhancement talent
Wrestling style: Technical with a focus on mat-based grappling
Signature moves: Arm drag, leg lock, hip toss
Brief description: Terry Sawyer appeared sporadically in JCP during the 1970s, often competing in mid-card matches. Known for his technical proficiency and clean wrestling style, Sawyer was a reliable performer who contributed to competitive matches, helping to elevate his opponents.

Terry Taylor
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1987–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card and rising talent
Wrestling style: Technical with high-flying elements
Signature moves: Five-arm (flying forearm smash), suplex, sleeper hold
Brief description: Terry Taylor brought his polished technical style and natural charisma to JCP during the late 1980s. As part of Paul Jones’ Army under the “Red Rooster” nickname, Taylor initially worked as a heel before returning to his roots as a babyface. Though his JCP run was brief, Taylor's in-ring abilities and versatility made him a consistent presence in competitive mid-card bouts.

Tex McKenzie
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1960s
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional main eventer
Wrestling style: Power-based with a cowboy persona
Signature moves: Big boot, lariat, body slam
Brief description: Tex McKenzie was a tall and charismatic competitor who brought his cowboy persona to JCP during sporadic appearances in the 1960s. Known for his powerful style and connection with fans, McKenzie participated in mid-card and occasional main-event matches. His imposing stature and energy made him a memorable figure in his era.

Thunderbolt Patterson
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1970s–1980s (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Upper mid-card and occasional main eventer
Wrestling style: Charismatic brawler with powerhouse elements
Signature moves: Headbutt, forearm smash, body slam
Brief description: Thunderbolt Patterson was known for his intense charisma, strong promos, and crowd connection. During his time in JCP, he was a staple in upper mid-card and tag team competition, often teaming with other babyfaces to battle top heels. His unique cadence and dynamic presence made him a fan favorite, and he was a trailblazer for African American wrestlers during his era.

Thunderfoot (Thunderfoot I)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1985–1987 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Tag team division and enhancement heel
Wrestling style: Brawler with technical elements
Signature moves: Loaded boot kick, backbreaker, clothesline
Brief description: Thunderfoot, portrayed by Joel Deaton, was a masked wrestler known for using a “loaded boot” to gain victories. As a member of a tag team alongside Thunderfoot II, he frequently wrestled in undercard matches, often losing to more established babyfaces. The gimmick provided a fun, heel dynamic to the tag team division.

Thunderfoot II
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1985–1987 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Tag team division and enhancement heel
Wrestling style: Brawler with basic technical wrestling
Signature moves: Loaded boot kick, suplex, elbow drop
Brief description: Thunderfoot II joined Thunderfoot (I) to form a heel tag team in JCP, relying on underhanded tactics such as the use of their loaded boots to gain heat with the crowd. While primarily enhancement talent, the team’s antics and colorful personas made them memorable performers during their time in the promotion.

Thunderfoots
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1985–1987 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Tag team division (heel)
Wrestling style: Brawling and tactical heel work
Signature moves: Double suplex, double axe handle, loaded boot-assisted strikes
Brief description: The Thunderfoots, a masked duo composed of Thunderfoot I and Thunderfoot II, were a lower-card heel team in JCP during the mid-1980s. Their gimmick revolved around the use of a loaded boot to cheat during matches, earning them heat with audiences. They were primarily used to put over babyface tag teams but delivered entertaining matches with their distinct gimmick.

Tiger Conway Jr.
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, early 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor and tag team division
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, crossbody, monkey flip
Brief description: Tiger Conway Jr. was a dynamic and exciting wrestler who appeared sporadically in JCP during the early 1980s. Known for his athleticism and smooth technical skills, Conway competed as both a singles and tag team wrestler. His performances were marked by high-energy offense and an ability to connect with audiences.

Tim Horner
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1984–1987 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor and tag team division
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying
Signature moves: Dropkick, sunset flip, crossbody
Brief description: Tim Horner was a talented technical wrestler who appeared regularly in JCP during the mid-1980s. Known for his clean-cut image and crisp in-ring ability, Horner often competed in mid-card matches and tag team bouts, sometimes teaming with Brad Armstrong. His solid technical style and likable personality made him a fan favorite in the promotion.

Tim Woods
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1960s–1970s (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main eventer and tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and mat-based grappling
Signature moves: Sleeper hold, hammerlock, arm drag
Brief description: Tim Woods, better known as "Mr. Wrestling," was one of the most respected technical wrestlers in JCP history. A staple in the promotion during the 1960s and 1970s, Woods excelled in both singles and tag team competition. His masked persona and exceptional in-ring skill made him a key figure in numerous feuds and title matches, helping to elevate the promotion’s reputation for high-quality wrestling.

Tiny Mills
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1950s
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card singles
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawler
Signature moves: Bear hug, body slam, forearm smash
Brief description: Tiny Mills was a rugged brawler known for his work in the tag team division during his sporadic appearances in JCP in the 1950s. Often teaming with Stan Kowalski as "Murder Inc.," Mills brought a physical and imposing style to his matches. His rough demeanor and no-nonsense approach made him a memorable heel during his tenure.

Todd Champion
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Late 1980s (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with basic technical elements
Signature moves: Powerslam, shoulder block, running clothesline
Brief description: Todd Champion was a rising star in JCP during the late 1980s, known for his impressive physique and athletic ability. Competing in both singles and tag team matches, Champion often teamed with Firebreaker Chip as "The Patriots" later in WCW. While his time in JCP was developmental, Champion's potential and charisma hinted at a promising future in wrestling.

Tojo Yamamoto
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1960s
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor and tag team division
Wrestling style: Brawling with martial arts elements
Signature moves: Karate chop, sleeper hold, knee lift
Brief description: Tojo Yamamoto, a notable heel in Southern wrestling territories, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1960s. Known for his martial arts-inspired offense and devious in-ring tactics, Yamamoto was a formidable opponent in both singles and tag team competition. His ability to generate heat made him an effective villain during his JCP stints.

Tolos Brothers
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1960s
Position on the card: Tag team division
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical teamwork
Signature moves: Double suplex, knee drop, forearm smash
Brief description: John and Chris Tolos, collectively known as the Tolos Brothers, were a successful tag team that made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1960s. Known for their polished teamwork and ability to mix brawling with technical wrestling, the Tolos Brothers were a strong heel tandem who helped elevate babyface teams in competitive bouts.

Tom Prichard
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, late 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card and enhancement talent
Wrestling style: Technical with a mix of high-flying elements
Signature moves: Superkick, crossbody, German suplex
Brief description: Tom Prichard, a future standout in tag team wrestling, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the late 1980s. Known for his technical prowess and athleticism, Prichard displayed flashes of the talent that would later make him a star in other promotions. His performances in JCP were primarily in competitive mid-card or enhancement roles.

Tom Renesto
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1960s
Position on the card: Tag team division and occasional singles competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling heel
Signature moves: Piledriver, knee drop, sleeper hold
Brief description: Tom Renesto, known for his work as one-half of The Masked Assassins, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1960s. As a tag team specialist, Renesto excelled in storytelling and heel tactics, making his matches memorable. His ability to draw heat and elevate babyface opponents left a lasting impression during his time in the promotion.

Tommy Angel
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1986–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Enhancement talent
Wrestling style: Technical with basic power moves
Signature moves: Dropkick, suplex, arm drag
Brief description: Tommy Angel was a consistent enhancement talent in JCP during the mid-to-late 1980s. Known for his professionalism and ability to make his opponents look strong, Angel competed against many of the promotion's rising stars and main-eventers. His clean in-ring work and reliability made him a valuable contributor to JCP programming.

Tommy Gilbert
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1970s
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling hybrid
Signature moves: Backbreaker, sleeper hold, knee lift
Brief description: Tommy Gilbert, a respected veteran of the Southern wrestling scene, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1970s. Known for his versatility and storytelling ability, Gilbert contributed to competitive mid-card matches and occasionally teamed with other wrestlers to enhance the tag team division.

Tommy Lane
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, late 1980s
Position on the card: Tag team division
Wrestling style: Traditional tag team wrestler with occasional high-flying moves
Signature moves: Double elbow drop, second-rope elbow, suplex
Brief description: Tommy Lane, best known as one-half of the Rock 'n' Roll RPMs alongside Mike Davis, made sporadic appearances in JCP in the late 1980s. As a heel tag team, the RPMs served as foils for more popular duos like The Rock 'n' Roll Express. Lane’s solid in-ring work and chemistry with Davis contributed to entertaining matches in the tag team division.

Tommy Rich
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1984–1985
Position on the card: Upper mid-card and occasional main eventer
Wrestling style: Brawling with technical elements
Signature moves: Lou Thesz press, elbow drop, sleeper hold
Brief description: Tommy "Wildfire" Rich, a former NWA World Heavyweight Champion, brought his fiery babyface persona to JCP in the mid-1980s. Rich’s charisma and ability to connect with fans made him a featured competitor during his sporadic appearances, where he worked against both mid-card and main-event talent. His tenure in JCP was short but impactful, as he remained a crowd favorite throughout his appearances.

Tommy Rogers
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1987–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Tag team division
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, flying crossbody, Russian leg sweep
Brief description: Tommy Rogers, one-half of The Fantastics alongside Bobby Fulton, was a key figure in JCP’s tag team division during the late 1980s. Known for their exciting, fast-paced matches, The Fantastics engaged in memorable feuds with The Midnight Express and other top teams. Rogers’ agility and technical ability made him a standout performer, helping to elevate tag team wrestling in JCP.

Tommy Seigler
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1960s–1970s
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and powerhouse
Signature moves: Suplex, abdominal stretch, bear hug
Brief description: Tommy Seigler, a popular babyface in the Southern territories, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1960s and 1970s. Known for his strength and technical wrestling ability, Seigler competed in both singles and tag team matches. His clean-cut image and in-ring skill earned him respect from fans and peers alike.

Toni Rose
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1960s–1970s (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Women’s division competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and mat-based grappling
Signature moves: Snapmare, armbar, knee drop
Brief description: Toni Rose was a prominent competitor in the women’s division of JCP during the 1960s and 1970s. Known for her technical wrestling skills and ability to adapt to various opponents, Rose was often involved in competitive matches against other top female wrestlers. Her contributions helped keep women’s wrestling relevant in a male-dominated era.

Tony Altimore
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1960s
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card singles
Wrestling style: Brawler with heel tactics
Signature moves: Piledriver, headlock, body slam
Brief description: Tony Altimore was a rugged heel who made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1960s. Often competing in the tag team division, Altimore brought a physical style and antagonistic persona to his matches, making him a solid heel for babyfaces to contend with.

Tony Anthony
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, late 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card and enhancement talent
Wrestling style: Brawler with technical elements
Signature moves: Shoulder block, suplex, elbow drop
Brief description: Tony Anthony, later known as the "Dirty White Boy," appeared sporadically in JCP during the late 1980s. In these early career appearances, Anthony showcased his brawling style and toughness, providing competitive matches against established stars. His later success in other promotions highlighted the potential seen during his time in JCP.

Tony Atlas
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1970s
Position on the card: Upper mid-card and occasional main eventer
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with high-energy moves
Signature moves: Gorilla press slam, headbutt, big splash
Brief description: Tony Atlas, a trailblazing African American wrestler known for his incredible physique and strength, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1970s. His high-energy style and ability to connect with fans made him a popular competitor. Though his time in JCP was limited, Atlas consistently delivered exciting performances and left a strong impression on audiences.

Tony Garea
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1970s
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor and tag team division
Wrestling style: Technical with a focus on mat-based grappling
Signature moves: Dropkick, abdominal stretch, backbreaker
Brief description: Tony Garea, a highly skilled technical wrestler and tag team specialist, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1970s. Known for his clean wrestling style and consistency in the ring, Garea often participated in competitive matches, elevating both his partners and opponents. Though his most notable work was in other promotions, his appearances in JCP showcased his talent.

Tony Parisi
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1960s
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division
Wrestling style: Technical with a mix of power moves
Signature moves: Suplex, bear hug, running forearm smash
Brief description: Tony Parisi, a versatile competitor known for his technical skills and toughness, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1960s. Parisi's ability to work both singles and tag team matches made him a valuable performer, contributing to the promotion’s mid-card and tag team divisions.

Tony Russo
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1970s
Position on the card: Enhancement talent
Wrestling style: Technical with basic grappling
Signature moves: Arm drag, headlock, body slam
Brief description: Tony Russo appeared sporadically in JCP during the 1970s, primarily as enhancement talent. Known for his solid technical skills, Russo was often tasked with putting over more prominent wrestlers, contributing to the development of rising stars in competitive matches.

Tony Zane
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1986–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Enhancement talent
Wrestling style: Brawling and power-based
Signature moves: Shoulder block, elbow drop, suplex
Brief description: Tony Zane was a consistent enhancement talent in JCP during the mid-to-late 1980s. His role focused on elevating other wrestlers by providing competitive matches, showcasing their abilities against his sturdy, physical style. Zane’s professionalism and dependability made him a regular presence on JCP programming.

Tracy Smothers
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1990 (Sporadic appearances as part of WCW crossover)
Position on the card: Tag team division
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical
Signature moves: Superkick, flying crossbody, sunset flip
Brief description: Tracy Smothers, one-half of The Southern Boys with Steve Armstrong, appeared sporadically in JCP during the transition into WCW in 1990. Known for his athleticism and dynamic tag team offense, Smothers’ work alongside Armstrong earned acclaim for its fast-paced and innovative style, contributing to the evolving tag team wrestling scene of the era.

Trent Knight
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1986–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Enhancement talent
Wrestling style: Technical with basic power moves
Signature moves: Suplex, dropkick, arm drag
Brief description: Trent Knight was a regular enhancement talent in JCP during the mid-to-late 1980s. Known for his consistent performances and willingness to make his opponents look strong, Knight competed against many of the promotion’s top stars. His professionalism and dependability made him a key figure in weekly television programming.

Tully Blanchard
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1984–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main event and upper mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical and tactical heel
Signature moves: Slingshot suplex, figure-four leglock, piledriver
Brief description: Tully Blanchard was one of the most charismatic and skilled heels in JCP, becoming a cornerstone of The Four Horsemen faction alongside Ric Flair, Arn Anderson, and others. Known for his cerebral approach to matches and ability to generate heat, Blanchard had classic feuds with Dusty Rhodes, Magnum T.A., and others. His NWA Television Championship reigns and tag team success solidified his place as one of JCP's top stars.

Velvet McIntyre
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1980s
Position on the card: Women’s division competitor
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical
Signature moves: Flying crossbody, sunset flip, dropkick
Brief description: Velvet McIntyre, known for her agility and aerial skills, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1980s. A standout in the women’s division, McIntyre often competed in competitive matches that showcased her athleticism. Her innovative style made her a fan favorite and a pioneer in women’s wrestling.

Vernon Deaton
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1985–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Enhancement talent
Wrestling style: Power-based with occasional technical elements
Signature moves: Body slam, shoulder block, elbow drop
Brief description: Vernon Deaton was a regular enhancement talent in JCP during the mid-1980s, frequently competing against rising stars and main-event wrestlers. His sturdy physique and straightforward wrestling style made him a reliable competitor for weekly television matches.

Varsity Club
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1987–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Upper mid-card and tag team division
Wrestling style: Amateur wrestling-based powerhouse
Signature moves: Belly-to-belly suplex, powerslam, double-team spinebuster
Brief description: Managed by Kevin Sullivan, the Varsity Club was a heel faction consisting of former amateur wrestling stars, including Mike Rotunda, Rick Steiner, and later Steve Williams. Their gimmick revolved around their collegiate athletic backgrounds, and they used their technical prowess and strength to dominate opponents. The Varsity Club was involved in notable feuds with fan-favorite teams, making them a prominent group in JCP during their tenure.

Vicki Williams
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1970s
Position on the card: Women’s division competitor
Wrestling style: Technical grappling with brawling elements
Signature moves: Arm drag, snapmare, dropkick
Brief description: Vicki Williams was a standout competitor in the women’s division during her sporadic appearances in JCP in the 1970s. Known for her technical ability and fiery personality, Williams often competed against top female stars, delivering entertaining and competitive matches. She was one of the prominent female wrestlers of her time, paving the way for future generations.

Vinnie Valentino
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1980s (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Enhancement talent
Wrestling style: High-energy and technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, flying crossbody, arm drag
Brief description: Vinnie Valentino appeared regularly in JCP during the 1980s, serving primarily as enhancement talent. Known for his agility and crowd-pleasing style, Valentino often worked with rising stars to showcase their abilities. His solid in-ring performances made him a reliable figure on JCP television programming.

Vittorio Apollo
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1970s
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and mat-based grappling
Signature moves: Suplex, abdominal stretch, European uppercut
Brief description: Vittorio Apollo, a skilled technical wrestler, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1970s. His methodical in-ring style and ability to work well with various opponents made him a valuable addition to the mid-card. Apollo’s performances reflected his professionalism and solid grasp of wrestling fundamentals.

Vivian Vachon
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1970s
Position on the card: Women’s division competitor
Wrestling style: Technical grappling and striking
Signature moves: Arm drag, dropkick, body slam
Brief description: Vivian Vachon, a member of the legendary Vachon wrestling family, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1970s. Known for her toughness and technical ability, she was a trailblazer for women’s wrestling, competing in high-profile matches that showcased her skill and charisma. Vachon was regarded as one of the most accomplished female wrestlers of her era.

Vladimir Petrov
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1987 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Upper mid-card and enforcer role
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with a focus on brute strength
Signature moves: Russian chain strike, bear hug, body slam
Brief description: Vladimir Petrov, portrayed as an ally of Ivan and Nikita Koloff, was introduced in JCP as part of the Russian heel faction in 1987. Petrov’s intimidating physique and raw power made him a formidable presence, often working as an enforcer in tag team and singles matches. While his tenure in JCP was short, his alignment with the Koloffs added depth to the ongoing Cold War-inspired storylines.

Von Brauners
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1960s
Position on the card: Tag team division
Wrestling style: Power-based with heel tactics
Signature moves: Double axe handle, backbreaker, double suplex
Brief description: The Von Brauners, a German heel tag team portrayed by Jimmy Brawner and Doug Donovan, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1960s. Known for their anti-American gimmick and ruthless in-ring style, they were effective villains who generated heat against fan-favorite babyface teams. Their work helped establish the credibility of JCP's tag team division during their appearances.

Wahoo McDaniel
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1974–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main eventer and upper mid-card
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and powerhouse
Signature moves: Tomahawk chop, overhead chop, Indian strap
Brief description: Wahoo McDaniel was one of JCP’s most iconic wrestlers, known for his toughness and intensity in the ring. A former NFL player, McDaniel brought a physical and no-nonsense style to his matches. He held multiple NWA titles, including the United States Heavyweight Championship, and had legendary feuds with Ric Flair, Johnny Valentine, and Magnum T.A. McDaniel’s enduring popularity and contributions to JCP made him one of the promotion’s most beloved figures.

Waldo von Erich
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1960s
Position on the card: Upper mid-card and tag team division
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with heel tactics
Signature moves: Piledriver, bear hug, big boot
Brief description: Waldo von Erich, portraying a German heel character, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1960s. Known for his menacing presence and physical style, von Erich often worked as a foil for patriotic babyfaces. His strong promo skills and heat-generating gimmick made him a valuable heel during his tenure.

Wally Dusek
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1950s
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor
Wrestling style: Technical with power-based elements
Signature moves: Body slam, headlock, arm drag
Brief description: Wally Dusek, a member of the famous Dusek wrestling family, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1950s. Known for his technical wrestling ability and experience, Dusek brought credibility to mid-card matches, often elevating younger talent. His appearances helped establish the Mid-Atlantic region’s focus on grappling and storytelling.

Warlord
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1987–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card singles
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Full nelson, powerslam, running shoulder block
Brief description: The Warlord debuted in JCP in 1987 as part of The Powers of Pain tag team alongside The Barbarian. Managed by Paul Jones, the duo quickly became a dominant heel force in the tag team division, engaging in a notable feud with The Road Warriors. Known for his immense strength and intimidating presence, Warlord was a key figure in JCP’s tag team scene before transitioning to singles competition in later promotions.

Wayne Ferris
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, late 1970s
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor
Wrestling style: Brawler with charismatic flair
Signature moves: Piledriver, swinging neckbreaker, suplex
Brief description: Wayne Ferris, who would later gain fame as "The Honky Tonk Man," appeared sporadically in JCP in the late 1970s. During this time, Ferris showcased his early potential as a charismatic and competent performer. Though he would find greater success in other promotions, his JCP appearances hinted at the personality and style that would define his later career.

Wendi Richter
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, early 1980s
Position on the card: Women’s division competitor
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical grappling
Signature moves: Powerbomb, crossbody, Boston crab
Brief description: Wendi Richter, a trailblazer in women’s wrestling, made sporadic appearances in JCP during the early 1980s. Known for her strength and determination, Richter competed in high-energy matches that showcased her athleticism and charisma. While her most prominent success came in other promotions, her appearances in JCP helped add star power to the women’s division.

Wenona Little Heart
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1970s
Position on the card: Women’s division competitor
Wrestling style: Technical with high-energy offense
Signature moves: Dropkick, headscissors takedown, armlock
Brief description: Wenona Little Heart was a dynamic competitor in the women’s division, making sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1970s. Known for her agility and resilience, she provided competitive and entertaining matches against some of the era’s top female wrestlers. Her Native American heritage and spirited performances made her a memorable figure in women’s wrestling.

Wladek Zbyszko
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1950s
Position on the card: Special attraction and mid-card competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and mat-based grappling
Signature moves: Double wristlock, armbar, body scissors
Brief description: A legendary wrestler from the early 20th century, Wladek Zbyszko made sporadic appearances in JCP during the 1950s. Known for his technical brilliance and strong European grappling style, Zbyszko was often featured as a special attraction, showcasing a classic wrestling approach that emphasized holds and counters. His presence lent prestige to the promotion during its formative years.

Youngbloods (Mark & Jay Youngblood)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1982–1984 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Tag team division
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical tandem
Signature moves: Double tomahawk chop, double dropkick, flying crossbody
Brief description: The Youngbloods, consisting of brothers Mark and Jay Youngblood, were a popular babyface tag team in JCP during the early 1980s. Known for their Native American heritage and dynamic in-ring style, they captured the NWA World Tag Team Championship multiple times. Their feuds with teams like Don Kernodle and Sgt. Slaughter showcased their high-energy offense and strong connection with the fans, making them one of the standout teams of their era.

Yukon Eric
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: Sporadic appearances, 1950s–1960s
Position on the card: Mid-card and special attraction
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with a focus on strength-based moves
Signature moves: Bear hug, body slam, overhand chop
Brief description: Yukon Eric was a beloved fan favorite known for his rugged outdoorsman persona and incredible strength. Making sporadic appearances in JCP, Eric’s larger-than-life character and imposing physique made him a draw for audiences. He competed in memorable bouts with both up-and-coming wrestlers and established stars.

Zambuie Express (Elijah Akeem & Kareem Muhammad)
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1984–1985 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Tag team division (heel)
Wrestling style: Powerhouse tandem
Signature moves: Double shoulder block, bear hug-clothesline combo, power slam
Brief description: The Zambuie Express was a dominant heel tag team managed by Paul Jones in JCP during the mid-1980s. Known for their size, strength, and intimidating presence, Akeem and Muhammad were used as enforcers in Paul Jones' Army. Their physical style and aggressive tactics made them effective villains in the tag team division, feuding with fan-favorite teams and wrestlers like Jimmy Valiant.

Zane Smith
Time in JIM CROCKETT PROMOTIONS: 1987–1988 (Regular appearances)
Position on the card: Enhancement talent
Wrestling style: Technical with basic grappling elements
Signature moves: Suplex, arm drag, headlock
Brief description: Zane Smith was a consistent enhancement talent in JCP during the late 1980s. While primarily used to put over rising stars and main-event wrestlers, Smith's clean wrestling style and reliability made him a valuable part of the promotion's weekly television programming.
